What Is To Be Done?

Burning Questions of our Movements

Vladimir Ilyich Lenin

 

 

WRITTEN: Written between the autumn of 1901 and February 1902.

PUBLISHED:  Lenin’s Selected Works, Volume 1, pp. 119 - 271. First
published as a separate work in March 1902. 

SOURCE: Lenin’s Collected Works, Foreign Languages Publishing House,
1961, Moscow, Volume 5, pp. 347-530.

TRANSLATED: Joe Fineberg and George Hanna

 

ORIGINAL TRANSCRIPTION & MARKUP: Tim Delaney (1999)

 

RE-MARKED UP & PROOFREAD BY: K. Goins (2008)

 

PUBLIC DOMAIN: Lenin Internet Archive (1999). You may freely copy,
distribute, display and perform this work; as well as make derivative
and commercial works. Please credit “Marxists Internet Archive” as your
source.

 

HTML VERSION:
http://marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1901/witbd/index.htm

 

CONVERTED TO EBOOK FORMAT BY: Sajjan Singh (2014)



 



 NOTE FROM THE LENIN INTERNET ARCHIVE


 

Lenin’s work _What Is To Be Done?_ was written at the end of 1901 and
early in 1902. In “Where To Begin”, published in _Iskra_, No. 4 (May
1901), Lenin said that the article represented “a skeleton plan to be
developed in greater detail in a pamphlet now in preparation for print”.

 

Lenin began the actual writing of the book in the autumn of 1901. In his
“Preface to the Pamphlet _Documents of the ‘Unity’ Conference_”, written
in November 1901, Lenin said that the book was in preparation “to be
published in the near future”. In December Lenin published (in _Iskra_,
No. 12) his article “A Talk with Defenders of Economism”, which he later
called a conspectus of _What Is To Be Done?_ He wrote the Preface to the
book in February 1902 and early in March the book was published by Dietz
in Stuttgart. An announcement of its publication was printed in _Iskra_,
No. 18, March 10, 1902.

 

In republishing the book in 1907 as part of the collection _Twelve
Years_, Lenin omitted Section A of Chapter V, “Who Was Offended by the
Article ‘Where To Begin,’” stating in the Preface that the book was
being published with slight abridgements, representing the omission
solely of details of the organisational relationships and minor
polemical remarks. Lenin added five footnotes to the new edition.

 

The text of this volume is that of the 1902 edition, verified with the
1907 edition.

Contents

Preface

1. Dogmatism And “Freedom of Criticism”

1.1. What Does “Freedom of Criticism” Mean?

1.2 The New Advocates of “Freedom of Criticism”

1.3 Criticism in Russia

1.4 Engels on the Importance of the Theoretical Struggle

2 The Spontaneity of the Masses and the Consciousness of the
Social-Democrats

2.1 The Beginning of the Spontaneous Upsurge

2.2 Bowing to Spontaneity. Rabochaya Misl

2.3 The Self-Emancipation Group and Rabocheye Dyelo

3 Trade-Unionist Politics and Social-Democratic Politics

3.1 Political Agitation and its Restriction by the Economists

3.2 How Martynov Rendered Plekhanov More Profound

3.3 Political Exposures and “Training in Revolutionary Activity”

3.4 What is There in Common Between Economism and Terrorism

3.5 The Working Class as Vanguard Fighter for Democracy

3.6 Once More “Slanderers”, Once More “Mystifiers”

4 The Primitiveness of the Economists and the Organization of the
Revolutionaries

4.1 What is Primitiveness?

4.2 Primitiveness and Economism

4.3 Organisation of Workers and Organisation of Revolutionaries

4.4 The Scope of Organisational Work

4.5 “Conspiratorial” Organisation and “Democratism”

4.6 Local and All-Russia Work

5 The “Plan” For an All-Russia Political Newspaper

5.1 Who Was Offended By the Article “Where to Begin”

5.2 Can A Newspaper Be a Collective Organiser?

5.3 What Type of Organisation Do We Require?

Conclusion

Appendix: The Attempt to Unite Iskra With Rabocheye Dyelo

Correction to What is to Be Done?

 



PREFACE


 

“...Party struggles lend a party strength and vitality; the greatest
proof of a party’s weakness is its diffuseness and the blurring of clear
demarcations; a party becomes stronger by purging itself...”

(From a letter of Lassalle to Marx, of June 24, 1852)

 

According to the author’s original plan, the present pamphlet was to
have been devoted to a detailed development of the ideas expressed in
the article “Where To Begin”, (_Iskra_, No. 4, May 1901).^(¹) We must
first apologise to the reader for the delay in fulfilling the promise
made in that article (and repeated in response to many private inquiries
and letters). One of the reasons for this delay was the attempt,
undertaken in June of the past year (1901), to unite all the
Social-Democratic organisations abroad. It was natural to wait for the
results of this attempt, for, had the effort proved successful, it would
perhaps have been necessary to expound _Iskra’s_ conceptions of
organisation from a somewhat different approach; in any case, such a
success promised to put an end very quickly to the existence of the two
trends in the Russian Social-Democratic movement. As the reader knows,
the attempt failed, and, as we propose to show, was bound to fail after
the new swing, of _Rabocheye Dyelo_, in its issue No. 10, towards
Economism. It was found to be absolutely essential to begin a determined
struggle against this trend, diffuse and ill-defined, but for that
reason the more persistent, the more capable of reasserting itself in
diverse forms. Accordingly, the original plan of the pamphlet was
altered and considerably enlarged.

 

Its main theme was to have been the three questions raised in the
article “Where To Begin” – the character and main content of our
political agitation; our organisational tasks; and the plan for
building, simultaneously and from various sides, a militant, all-Russia
organisation. These questions have long engaged the mind of the author,
who tried to raise them in _Rabochaya Gazeta_^(²) during one of the
unsuccessful attempts to revive that paper (see Chapter V). But the
original plan to confine the pamphlet to an analysis of only these three
questions and to set forth our views as far as possible in a positive
form, without, or almost without, entering into polemics, proved wholly
impracticable, for two reasons. On the one hand, Economism proved to be
much more tenacious than we had supposed (we employ the term Economism
in the broad sense, as explained in _Iskra_, No. 12 (December 1901), in
the article entitled “A Talk With Defenders of Economism”, which was a
synopsis, so to speak, of the present pamphlet^(³)). It became clear
beyond doubt that the differences regarding the solution of the three
questions mentioned were explainable to a far greater degree by the
basic antithesis between the two trends in the Russian Social-Democratic
movement than by differences over details. On the other hand, the
perplexity of the Economists over the practical application of our views
in _Iskra_ clearly revealed that we often speak literally in different
tongues and therefore cannot arrive at an understanding without
beginning _ab ovo_, and that an attempt must be made, in the simplest
possible style, illustrated by numerous and concrete examples,
_systematically to “clarify”_ _all_ our basic points of difference with
_all_ the Economists. I resolved to make such an attempt at
“clarification”, fully realising that it would greatly increase the size
of the pamphlet and delay its publication; I saw _no other way_ of
meeting my pledge I had made in the article “Where To Begin”. Thus, to
the apologies for the delay, I must add others for the serious literary
shortcomings of the pamphlet. I had to work _in great haste_, with
frequent interruptions by a variety of other tasks.

 

The examination of the above three questions still constitutes the main
theme of this pamphlet, but I found it necessary to begin with two
questions of a more general nature – why such an “innocent” and
“natural” slogan as “freedom of criticism” should be for us a veritable
war-cry, and why we cannot come to an understanding even on the
fundamental question of the role of Social-Democrats in relation to the
spontaneous mass movement. Further, the exposition of our views on the
character and substance of political agitation developed into an
explanation of the difference between trade-unionist politics and
Social-Democratic politics, while the exposition of our views on
organisational tasks developed into an explanation of the difference
between the amateurish methods which satisfy the Economists, and the
organisation of revolutionaries which we hold to be indispensable.
Further, I advance the “plan” for an all-Russia political newspaper with
all the more insistence because the objections raised against it are
untenable, and because no real answer has been given to the question I
raised in the article “Where To Begin” as to how we can set to work from
all sides simultaneously to create the organisation we need. Finally, in
the concluding part, I hope to show that we did all we could to prevent
a decisive break with the Economists, a break which nevertheless proved
inevitable; that _Rabocheye Dyelo_ acquired a special significance, a
“historical” significance, if you will, because it expressed fully and
strikingly, not consistent Economism, but the confusion and vacillation
which constitute the distinguishing feature of _an entire period_ in the
history of Russian Social-Democracy; and that therefore the polemic with
_Rabocheye Dyelo_, which may upon first view seem excessively detailed,
also acquires significance, for we can make no progress until we have
completely put an end to this period.

 

N. Lenin

February 1902

 



1. DOGMATISM AND “FREEDOM OF CRITICISM”


 


1.1. What Does “Freedom of Criticism” Mean?

 

“Freedom of criticism” is undoubtedly the most fashionable slogan at the
present time, and the one most frequently employed in the controversies
between socialists and democrats in all countries. At first sight,
nothing would appear to be stranger than the solemn appeals to freedom
of criticism made by one of the parties to the dispute. Have voices been
raised in the advanced parties against the constitutional law of the
majority of European countries which guarantees freedom to science and
scientific investigation? “Something must be wrong here,” will be the
comment of the onlooker who has heard this fashionable slogan repeated
at every turn but has not yet penetrated the essence of the disagreement
among the disputants; evidently this slogan is one of the conventional
phrases which, like nicknames, become legitimised by use, and become
almost generic terms.”

 

In fact, it is no secret for anyone that two trends have taken form in
present-day international^(⁴) Social-Democracy. The conflict between
these trends now flares up in a bright flame and now dies down and
smoulders under the ashes of imposing “truce resolutions”. The essence
of the “new” trend, which adopts a “critical” attitude towards “obsolete
dogmatic” Marxism, has been clearly enough presented by Bernstein
and demonstrated by Millerand.

 

Social-Democracy must change from a party of social revolution into a
democratic party of social reforms. Bernstein has surrounded this
political demand with a whole battery of well-attuned “new” arguments
and reasoning. Denied was the possibility of putting socialism on a
scientific basis and of demonstrating its necessity and inevitability
from the point of view of the materialist conception of history. Denied
was the fact of growing impoverishment, the process of proletarisation,
and the intensification of capitalist contradictions; the very concept,
“_ultimate aim_”, was declared to be unsound, and the idea of the
dictatorship of the proletariat was completely rejected. Denied was the
antithesis in principle between liberalism and socialism. Denied
was_ the theory of the class struggle,_ on the alleged grounds that it
could not be applied to a strictly democratic society governed according
to the will of the majority, etc.

 

Thus, the demand for a decisive turn from revolutionary Social-Democracy
to bourgeois social-reformism was accompanied by a no less decisive turn
towards bourgeois criticism of all the fundamental ideas of Marxism. In
view of the fact that this criticism of Marxism has long been directed
from the political platform, from university chairs, in numerous
pamphlets and in a series of learned treatises, in view of the fact that
the entire younger generation of the educated classes has been
systematically reared for decades on this criticism, it is not
surprising that the “new critical” trend in Social-Democracy should
spring up, all complete, like Minerva from the head of Jove. The content
of this new trend did not have to grow and take shape, it was
transferred bodily from bourgeois to socialist literature.

 

To proceed. If Bernstein’s theoretical criticism and political yearnings
were still unclear to anyone, the French took the trouble strikingly to
demonstrate the “new method”. In this instance, too, France has
justified its old reputation of being “the land where, more than
anywhere else, the historical class struggles were each time fought out
to a decision...” (Engels, Introduction to Marx’s Der 18
Brumaire).^(⁵) The French socialists have begun, not to theorise, but to
act. The democratically more highly developed political conditions in
France have permitted them to put “Bernsteinism into practice”
immediately, with all its consequences. Millerand has furnished an
excellent example of practical Bernsteinism; not without reason did
Bernstein and Vollmar rush so zealously to defend and laud him. Indeed,
if Social-Democracy, in essence, is merely a party of reform and must be
bold enough to admit this openly, then not only has a socialist the
right to join a bourgeois cabinet, but he must always strive to do so.
If democracy, in essence, means the abolition of class domination, then
why should not a socialist minister charm the whole bourgeois world by
orations on class collaboration? Why should he not remain in the cabinet
even after the shooting-down of workers by gendarmes has exposed, for
the hundredth and thousandth time, the real nature of the democratic
collaboration of classes? Why should he not personally take part in
greeting the tsar, for whom the French socialists now have no other name
than hero of the gallows, knout, and exile (knouteur, pendeur et
deportateur)? And the reward for this utter humiliation and
self-degradation of socialism in the face of the whole world, for the
corruption of the socialist consciousness of the working masses – the
only basis that can guarantee our victory – the reward for this is
pompous projects for miserable reforms, so miserable in fact that much
more has been obtained from bourgeois governments!

 

He who does not deliberately close his eyes cannot fail to see that the
new “critical” trend in socialism is nothing more nor less than a new
variety of opportunism. And if we judge people, not by the glittering
uniforms they don or by the high-sounding appellations they give
themselves, but by their actions and by what they actually advocate, it
will be clear that “freedom of criticism” means freedom for an
opportunist trend in Social-Democracy, freedom to convert
Social-Democracy into a democratic party of reform, freedom to introduce
bourgeois ideas and bourgeois elements into socialism.

 

“Freedom” is a grand word, but under the banner of freedom for industry
the most predatory wars were waged, under the banner of freedom of
labour, the working people were robbed. The modern use of the term
“freedom of criticism” contains the same inherent falsehood. Those who
are really convinced that they have made progress in science would not
demand freedom for the new views to continue side by side with the old,
but the substitution of the new views for the old. The cry heard today,
“Long live freedom of criticism”, is too strongly reminiscent of the
fable of the empty barrel.

 

We are marching in a compact group along a precipitous and difficult
path, firmly holding each other by the hand. We are surrounded on all
sides by enemies, and we have to advance almost constantly under their
fire. We have combined, by a freely adopted decision, for the purpose of
fighting the enemy, and not of retreating into the neighbouring marsh,
the inhabitants of which, from the very outset, have reproached us with
having separated ourselves into an exclusive group and with having
chosen the path of struggle instead of the path of conciliation. And now
some among us begin to cry out: Let us go into the marsh! And when we
begin to shame them, they retort: What backward people you are! Are you
not ashamed to deny us the liberty to invite you to take a better road!
Oh, yes, gentlemen! You are free not only to invite us, but to go
yourselves wherever you will, even into the marsh. In fact, we think
that the marsh is your proper place, and we are prepared to render you
every assistance to get there. Only let go of our hands, don’t clutch at
us and don’t besmirch the grand word freedom, for we too are “free” to
go where we please, free to fight not only against the marsh, but also
against those who are turning towards the marsh!

 


1.2 The New Advocates of “Freedom of Criticism”

 

Now, this slogan (“freedom of criticism”) has in recent times been
solemnly advanced by Rabocheye Dyelo (No. 10), organ of the Union of
Russian Social-Democrats Abroad, not as a theoretical postulate, but as
a political demand, as a reply to the question, “Is it possible to unite
the Social-Democratic organisations operating abroad?”: “For a durable
unity, there must be freedom of criticism” (p. 36).

 

From this statement two definite conclusions follow: (1) that Rabocheye
Dyelo has taken under its wing the opportunist trend in international
Social-Democracy in general, and (2) that Rabocheye Dyelo demands
freedom for opportunism in Russian Social-Democracy. Let us examine
these conclusions.

 

Rabocheye Dyelo is “particularly” displeased with the “inclination
of Iskra and Zarya to predict a rupture between the Mountain and
the Gironde in international Social-Democracy”.^(⁶)

 

Generally speaking,” writes B. Krichevsky, editor of Rabocheye Dyelo,
“this talk of the Mountain and the Gironde heard in the ranks of
Social-Democracy represents a shallow historical analogy, a strange
thing to come from the pen of a Marxist. The Mountain and the Gironde
did not represent different temperaments-, or intellectual trends, as
the historians of social thought may think, but different classes or
strata – the middle bourgeoisie, on the one hand, and the petty
bourgeoisie and the proletariat, on the other. In the modern socialist
movement, however, there is no conflict of class interests; the
socialist movement in its entirety, in all of its diverse forms
(Krichevsky’s italics), including the most pronounced Bernsteinians,
stands on the basis of the class interests of the proletariat and its
class struggle for political and economic emancipation” (pp. 32-33).

 

A bold assertion! Has not Krichevsky heard of the fact, long ago noted,
that it is precisely the extensive participation of an
“academic” stratum in the socialist movement in recent years that has
promoted such a rapid spread of Bernsteinism? And what is most important
– on what does our author found his opinion that even “the most
pronounced Bernsteinians” stand on the basis of the class struggle for
the political and economic emancipation of the proletariat? No one
knows. This determined defence of the most pronounced Bernsteinians is
not supported by any argument or reasoning whatever. Apparently, the
author believes that if he repeats what the most pronounced
Bernsteinians say about themselves his assertion requires no proof. But
can anything more “shallow” be imagined than this judgement of an entire
trend based on nothing more than what the representatives of that trend
say about themselves? Can anything more shallow be imagined than the
subsequent “homily” on the two different and even diametrically opposite
types, or paths, of party development? (Rabocheye Dyelo, pp. 34-35.) The
German Social-Democrats, in other words, recognise complete freedom of
criticism, but the French do not, and it is precisely their example that
demonstrates the “bane of intolerance”.

 

To this we can only say that the very example B. Krichevsky affords us
attests to the fact that the name Marxists is at times assumed by people
who conceive history literally in the “Ilovaisky manner”.^(⁷) To explain
the unity of the German Socialist Party and the disunity of the French
Socialist Party, there is no need whatever to go into the special
features in the history of these countries, to contrast the conditions
of military semiabsolutism in the one with republican parliamentarism in
the other, to analyse the effects of the Paris Commune and the effects
of the Exceptional Law Against the Socialists, to compare the economic
life and economic development of the two countries, or to recall that
“the unexampled growth of German Social-Democracy” was accompanied by a
strenuous struggle, unique in the history of socialism, not only against
erroneous theories (Mühlberger,
Dühring,^(⁸) the Katheder-Socialists^(⁹)), but also against erroneous
tactics (Lassalle), etc., etc. All that is superfluous! The French
quarrel among themselves because they are intolerant; the Germans are
united because they are good boys.

 

And observe, this piece of matchless profundity is designed to “refute”
the fact that puts to rout the defence of the Bernsteinians. The
question whether or not the Bernsteinians _stand _on the basis of the
class struggle of the proletariat is one that can be completely and
irrevocably answered only by historical experience. Consequently, the
example of France holds greatest significance in this respect, because
France is the only country in which the Bernsteinians attempted _to
stand_ independently, on their own feet, with the warm approval of their
German colleagues (and partly also of the Russian opportunists;
cf. _Rabocheye Dyelo_, No. 2-3, pp. 83-84). The reference to the
“intolerance” of the French, apart from its “historical” significance
(in the Nozdryov^(¹⁰) sense), turns out to be merely an attempt to –hush
up very unpleasant facts with angry invectives.

 

Nor are we inclined to make a present of the Germans to Krichevsky and
the numerous other champions of “freedom of criticism”. If the “most
pronounced Bernsteinians” are still tolerated in the ranks of the German
party, it is only to the extent that they submit to the Hanover
resolution,^(¹¹) which emphatically rejected Bernstein’s “amendments”,
and to the Lubeck resolution, which (notwithstanding the diplomatic
terms in which it is couched) contains a direct warning to Bernstein. It
is debatable, from the standpoint of the interests of the German party,
whether diplomacy was appropriate and whether, in this case, a bad peace
is better than a good quarrel; in short, opinions may differ as to the
expediency of any one of the methods employed to reject Bernsteinism,
but that the German party did reject Bernsteinism on two occasions, is a
fact no one can fail to see. Therefore, to think that the German example
confirms the thesis that “the most pronounced Bernsteinians stand on the
basis of the class struggle of the proletariat, for political and
economic emancipation”, means to fail completely to understand what is
going on under our very eyes.^(¹²)

 

Nor is that all. As we have seen, Rabocheye Dyelo demands “freedom of
criticism” and defends Bernsteinism before Russian Social-Democracy.
Apparently it convinced itself that we were unfair to our “Critics” and
Bernsteinians. But to which ones? Who? Where? When? What did the
unfairness represent? About this, not a word. Rabocheye Dyelo does not
name a single Russian Critic or Bernsteinian! We are left with but one
of two possible suppositions. Either the unfairly treated party is none
other than Rabocheye Dyelo itself (this is confirmed by the fact that in
the two articles in No. 10 reference is made only to the wrongs suffered
by Rabocheye Dyelo at the hands of Zarya and Iskra). If that is the
case, how is the strange fact to be explained thatRabocheye Dyelo, which
always vehemently dissociated itself from all solidarity with
Bernsteinism, could not defend itself without putting in a word in
defence of the “most pronounced Bernsteinians” and of freedom of
criticism? Or some third persons have been treated unfairly. If this is
the case, then what reasons may there be for not naming them?

 

We see, therefore, that Rabocheye Dyelo is continuing to play the game
of hide-and-seek it has played (as we shall show below) ever since its
founding. And let us note further this first practical application of
the vaunted “freedom of criticism”. In actual fact, not only was it
forthwith reduced to abstention from all criticism, but also to
abstention from expressing independent views altogether. The
very Rabocheye Dyelo, which avoids mentioning Russian Bernsteinism as if
it were a shameful disease (to use Starover’s^(¹³) apt expression),
proposes, for the treatment of this disease, to copy word for word the
latest German prescription for the German variety of the malady! Instead
of freedom of criticism slavish (worse: apish) imitation! The very same
social and political content of modern international opportunism reveals
itself in a variety of ways according to national peculiarities. In one
country the opportunists have long ago come out under a separate flag;
in another, they have ignored theory and in fact pursued the policy of
the Radicals-Socialists; in a third, some members of the revolutionary
party have deserted to the camp of opportunism and strive to achieve
their aims, not in open struggle for principles and for new tactics, but
by gradual, imperceptible, and, if one may so put it, unpunishable
corruption of their party; in a fourth country, similar deserters employ
the same methods in the gloom of political slavery, and with a
completely original combination of “legal” and “illegal” activity, etc.
To talk of freedom of criticism and of Bernsteinism as a condition for
uniting the Russian Social Democrats and not to explain
how Russian Bernsteinism has manifested itself and what particular
fruits it has borne, amounts to talking with the aim of saying nothing.

 

Let us ourselves try, if only in a few words, to say what Rabocheye
Dyelo did not want to say (or which was, perhaps, beyond its
comprehension).

 


1.3 Criticism in Russia

 

The chief distinguishing feature of Russia in regard to the point we are
examining is that the very beginning of the spontaneous working-class
movement, on the one hand, and of the turn of progressive public opinion
towards Marxism, on the other, was marked by the combination of
manifestly heterogeneous elements under a common flag to fight the
common enemy (the obsolete social and political world outlook). We refer
to the heyday of “legal Marxism”. Speaking generally, this was an
altogether curious phenomenon that no one in the eighties or the
beginning of the nineties would have believed possible. In a country
ruled by an autocracy, with a completely enslaved press, in a period of
desperate political reaction in which even the tiniest outgrowth of
political discontent and protest is persecuted, the theory of
revolutionary Marxism suddenly forces its way into
the censored literature and, though expounded in Aesopian language, is
understood by all the “interested”. The government had accustomed itself
to regarding only the theory of the (revolutionary) Narodnaya Volya as
dangerous, without, as is usual, observing its internal evolution, and
rejoicing at any criticism levelled against it. Quite a considerable
time elapsed (by our Russian standards) before the government realised
what had happened and the unwieldy army of censors and gendarmes
discovered the new enemy and flung itself upon him. Meanwhile, Marxist
books were published one after another, Marxist journals and newspapers
were founded, nearly everyone became a Marxist, Marxists were flattered,
Marxists were courted, and the book publishers rejoiced at the
extraordinary, ready sale of Marxist literature. It was quite natural,
therefore, that among the Marxian neophytes who were caught up in this
atmosphere, there should be more than one “author who got a swelled
head...”^(¹⁴)

 

We can now speak calmly of this period as of an event of the past. It is
no secret that the brief period in which Marxism blossomed on the
surface of our literature was called forth by an alliance between people
of extreme and of very moderate views. In point of fact, the latter were
bourgeois democrats; this conclusion (so markedly confirmed by
their subsequent “critical” development) suggested itself to some even
when the “alliance” was still intact.^(¹⁵)

 

That being the case, are not the revolutionary Social-Democrats who
entered into the alliance with the future “Critics” mainly responsible
for the subsequent “confusion”? This question, together with a reply in
the affirmative, is sometimes heard from people with too rigid a view.
But such people are entirely in the wrong. Only those who are not sure
of themselves can fear to enter into temporary alliances even with
unreliable people; not a single political party could exist without such
alliances. The combination with the legal Marxists was in its way the
first really political alliance entered into by Russian Social
-Democrats. Thanks to this alliance, an astonishingly rapid victory was
obtained over Narodism, and Marxist ideas (even though in a vulgarised
form) became very widespread. Moreover, the alliance was not concluded
altogether without “conditions”. Evidence of this is the burning by the
censor, in 1895, of the Marxist collection Material on the Question of
the Economic Development of Russia.^(¹⁶) If the literary agreement with
the legal Marxists can be compared with a political alliance, then that
book can be compared with a political treaty.

 

The rupture, of course, did not occur because the “allies” proved to be
bourgeois democrats. On the contrary, the representatives of the latter
trend are natural and desirable allies of Social-Democracy insofar as
its democratic tasks, brought to the fore by the prevailing situation in
Russia, are concerned. But an essential condition for such an alliance
must be the full opportunity for the socialists to reveal to the working
class that its interests are diametrically opposed to the interests of
the bourgeoisie. However, the Bernsteinian and “critical” trend, to
which the majority of the legal Marxists turned, deprived the socialists
of this opportunity and demoralised the socialist consciousness by
vulgarising Marxism, by advocating the theory of the blunting of social
contradictions, by declaring the idea of the social revolution and of
the dictatorship of the proletariat to be absurd, by reducing the
working-class movement and the class struggle to narrow trade-unionism
and to a “realistic” struggle for petty, gradual reforms. This was
synonymous with bourgeois democracy’s denial of socialism’s right to
independence and, consequently, of its right to existence; in practice
it meant a striving to convert the nascent working-class movement into
an appendage of the liberals.

 

Naturally, under such circumstances the rupture was necessary. But the
“peculiar” feature of Russia manifested itself in the fact that this
rupture simply meant the elimination of the Social-Democrats from the
most accessible and widespread “legal” literature. The “ex-Marxists”,
who took up the flag of “criticism” and who obtained almost a monopoly
to "demolish Marxism, entrenched themselves in this literature.
Catchwords like “Against orthodoxy” and “Long live freedom of criticism”
(now repeated by _Rabocheye Dyelo_) forthwith became the vogue, and the
fact that neither the censor nor the gendarmes could resist this vogue
is apparent from the publication of _three _Russian editions of the work
of the celebrated Bernstein (celebrated in the Herostratean sense) and
from the fact that the works of Bernstein, Mr. Prokopovich, and others
were recommended by Zubatov (_Iskra_, No. 10). A task now devolved upon
the Social Democrats that was difficult in itself and was made
incredibly more difficult by purely external obstacles – the task of
combating the new trend. This trend did not confine itself to the sphere
of literature. The turn towards “criticism” was accompanied by an
infatuation for Economism among Social-Democratic practical workers.

 

The manner in which the connection between, and interdependence of,
legal criticism and illegal Economism arose and grew is in itself an
interesting subject, one that could serve as the theme of a special
article. We need only note here that this connection undoubtedly
existed. The notoriety deservedly acquired by the _Credo _was due
precisely to the frankness with which it formulated this connection and
blurted out the fundamental political tendency of Economism – let the
workers carry on the economic struggle (it would be more correct to say
the trade unionist struggle, because the latter also embraces
specifically working class politics) and let the Marxist intelligentsia
merge with the liberals for the political “struggle.” Thus,
trade-unionist work “among the people” meant fulfilling the first part
of this task, while legal criticism meant fulfilling the second. This
statement was such an excellent weapon against Economism that, had there
been no _Credo_, it would have been worth inventing one.

 

The Credo was not invented, but it was published without the consent and
perhaps even against the will of its authors. At all events, the present
writer, who took part in dragging this new “programme” into the light of
day,^(¹⁷) has heard complaints and reproaches to the effect that copies
of the resume of the speakers’ views were distributed, dubbed the Credo,
and even published in the press together with the protest! We refer to
this episode because it reveals a very peculiar feature of our Economism
– fear of publicity. This is a feature of Economism generally, and not
of the authors of the Credo alone. It was revealed by that most
outspoken and honest advocate of Economism, Rabochaya Mysl, and
by Rabocheye Dyelo (which was indignant over the publication of
“Economist” documents in the Vademecum^(¹⁸)), as well as by the Kiev
Committee, which two years ago refused to permit the publication of
its profession de foi,^(¹⁹) together with a repudiation of it,^(²⁰) and
by many other individual representatives of Economism.

 

This fear of criticism displayed by the advocates of freedom of
criticism cannot be attributed solely to craftiness (although, on
occasion, no doubt craftiness is brought into play: it would be
improvident to expose the young and as yet frail shoots of the new
trend. to attacks by opponents). No, the majority of the Economists look
with sincere resentment (as by the very nature of Economism they must)
upon all theoretical controversies, factional disagreements, broad
political questions, plans for organising revolutionaries, etc. “Leave
all that to the people abroad!” said a fairly consistent Economist to me
one day, thereby expressing a very widespread (and again purely
trade-unionist) view; our concern is the working-class movement, the
workers, organisations here, in our localities; all the rest is merely
the invention of doctrinaires, “the overrating of ideology”, as the
authors of the letter, published in _Iskra_, No. 12, expressed it, in
unison with_Rabocheye Dyelo_, No. 10.

The question now arises: such being the peculiar features of Russian
“criticism” and Russian Bernsteinism, what should have been the task of
those who sought to oppose opportunism in deeds and not merely in words?
First, they should have made efforts to resume the theoretical work that
had barely begun in the period of legal Marxism and that fell anew on
the shoulders of the comrades working underground. Without such work the
successful growth of the movement was impossible. Secondly, they should
have actively combated the legal “criticism” that was perverting
people’s minds on a considerable scale. Thirdly, they should have
actively opposed confusion and vacillation in the practical movement,
exposing and repudiating every conscious or unconscious attempt to
degrade our programme and our tactics.

That _Rabocheye Dyelo_ did none of these things is well known; we shall
have occasion below to deal with this well-known fact in detail and from
various aspects. At the moment, however, we desire merely to show the
glaring contradiction that exists between the demand for “freedom of
criticism” and the specific features of our native criticism and Russian
Economism. It suffices but to glance at the text of the resolution in
which the Union of Russian Social Democrats Abroad endorsed the point of
view of _Rabocheye Dyelo_.

 

“In the interests of the further ideological development of
Social-Democracy, we recognise the freedom of criticism of
Social-Democratic theory in Party literature to be absolutely necessary
insofar as the criticism does not run counter to the class and
revolutionary character of this theory” (Two Conferences, p. 10).

 

And the motivation? The resolution “in its first part coincides with the
resolution of the Lubeck Party Congress on Bernstein”. . . . In the
simplicity of their souls the “Unionists” failed to observe what
a testimonium paupertatis (attestation of poverty) they betray with this
copying. ... “But ... in its second part, it restricts freedom of
criticism much more than did the Lubeck Party Congress.”

 

The resolution of the Union Abroad, then, is directed against the
Russian Bernsteinians? If it is not, then the reference to Lubeck would
be utterly absurd. But it is not true to say that it “restricts freedom
of criticism”. In adopting their Hanover resolution, the Germans, point
by point, rejected precisely the amendments proposed by Bernstein, while
in their Lubeck resolution they cautioned Bernstein personally, by
naming him. Our “free” imitators, however, make not a single allusion to
a single manifestation of specifically Russian “criticism” and Russian
Economism. In view of this omission, the bare reference to the class and
revolutionary character of the theory leaves far wider scope for
misinterpretation, particularly when the Union Abroad refuses to
identify “so-called Economism” with opportunism (Two Conferences, p. 8,
Paragraph 1). But all this, in passing. The main thing to note is that
the positions of the opportunists in relation to the revolutionary
Social-Democrats in Russia are diametrically opposed to those in
Germany. In that country, as we know, the revolutionary Social-Democrats
are in favour of preserving that which exists – the old programme and
the tactics, which are universally known and have been elucidated in all
their details by many decades of experience. But the “Critics” desire to
introduce changes, and since these Critics represent an insignificant
minority, and since they are very timid in their revisionist efforts,
one can understand the motives of the majority in confining themselves
to the dry rejection of “innovations”. In Russia, however, it is the
Critics and the Economists who are in favour of preserving that which
exists: the “Critics” want us to go on regarding them as Marxists and to
guarantee them the “freedom of criticism” they enjoyed to the full (for,
in fact, they never recognised any kind of party ties,^(²¹) and,
moreover, we never had a generally recognised party body that could
“restrict” freedom of criticism, if only by counsel); the Economists
want the revolutionaries to recognise the sovereign character of the
present movement" (Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10, p. 25), i.e., to recognise
the “legitimacy” of that which exists; they want the “ideologists” not
to try to “divert” the movement from the path that “is determined by the
interaction of material elements and material environment” (“Letter”
in Iskra, No. 12); they want to have that struggle recognised as
desirable “which it is possible for the workers to wage under the
present conditions”, and as the only possible struggle, that “which they
are actually waging at the present time” (“Separate Supplement”
to Rabochaya Mysl, p. 14). We revolutionary Social-Democrats, on the
contrary, are dissatisfied with this worship of spontaneity, i.e., of
that which exists “at the present moment”. We demand that the tactics
that have prevailed in recent years he changed; we declare that “before
we can unite, and in order that we may unite, we must first of all draw
firm and definite lines of demarcation” (see announcement of the
publication of Iskra).^(²²) In a word, the Germans stand for that which
exists and reject changes; we demand a change of that which exists, and
reject subservience thereto and reconciliation to it.

 

This “slight” difference our “free” copyists of German resolutions
failed to notice.

 


1.4 Engels on the Importance of the Theoretical Struggle

 

“Dogmatism, doctrinairism”, “ossification of the party – the inevitable
retribution that follows the violent strait-lacing of thought” – these
are the enemies against which the knightly champions of “freedom of
criticism” in _Rabocheye Dyelo_ rise up in arms. We are very glad that
this question has been placed on the order of the day and we would only
propose to add to it one other:

 

And who are the judges?

 

We have before us two publishers’ announcements. One, “The Programme of
the Periodical Organ of the Union of Russian Social Democrats Abroad
– _Rabocheye Dyelo_” (reprint from No. 1 of _Rabocheye Dyelo_), and the
other, the “Announcement of the Resumption of the Publications of the
Emancipation of Labour Group”. Both are dated 1899, when the “crisis of
Marxism” had long been under discussion. And what do we find? We would
seek in vain in the first announcement for any reference to this
phenomenon, or a definite statement of the position the new organ
intends to adopt on this question. Not a word is said about theoretical
work and the urgent tasks that now confront it, either in this programme
or in the supplements to it that were adopted by the Third Congress of
the Union Abroad in 1901 (_Two Conferences_, pp. 15-18). During this
entire time the Editorial Board of _Rabocheye Dyelo_ ignored theoretical
questions, in spite of the fact that these were questions that disturbed
the minds of all Social-Democrats the world over.

 

The other announcement, on the contrary, points first of all to the
declining interest in theory in recent years, imperatively demands
“vigilant attention to the theoretical aspect of the revolutionary
movement of the proletariat”, and calls for “ruthless criticism of the
Bernsteinian and other anti-revolutionary tendencies” in our movement.
The issues of _Zarya _to date show how this programme has been carried
out.

 

Thus, we see that high-sounding phrases against the ossification of
thought, etc., conceal unconcern and helplessness with regard to the
development of theoretical thought. The case of the Russian
Social-Democrats manifestly illustrates the general European phenomenon
(long ago noted also by the German Marxists) that the much vaunted
freedom of criticism does not imply substitution of one theory for
another, but freedom from all integral and pondered theory; it implies
eclecticism and lack of principle. Those who have the slightest
acquaintance with the actual state of our movement cannot but see that
the wide spread of Marxism was accompanied by a certain lowering of the
theoretical level. Quite a number of people with very little, and even a
total lack of theoretical training joined the movement because of its
practical significance and its practical successes. We can judge from
that how tactless Rabocheye Dyelo is when, with an air of triumph, it
quotes Marx’s statement: “Every step of real movement is more important
than a dozen programmes.”^(²³) To repeat these words in a period of
theoretical disorder is like wishing mourners at a funeral many happy
returns of the day. Moreover, these words of Marx are taken from his
letter on the Gotha Programme,^(²⁴) in which he sharply
condemns eclecticism in the formulation of principles. If you must
unite, Marx wrote to the party leaders, then enter into agreements to
satisfy the practical aims of the movement, but do not allow any
bargaining over principles, do not make theoretical “concessions”. This
was Marx’s idea, and yet there are people among us who seek-in his name
to belittle the significance of theory!

 

Without revolutionary theory there can be no revolutionary movement.
This idea cannot be insisted upon too strongly at a time when the
fashionable preaching of opportunism goes hand in hand with an
infatuation for the narrowest forms of practical activity. Yet, for
Russian Social-Democrats the importance of theory is enhanced by three
other circumstances, which are often forgotten: first, by the fact that
our Party is only in process of formation, its features are only just
becoming defined, and it has as yet far from settled accounts with the
other trends of revolutionary thought that threaten to divert the
movement from the correct path. On the contrary, precisely the very
recent past was marked by a revival of non-Social-Democratic
revolutionary trends (an eventuation regarding which Axelrod long ago
warned the Economists). Under these circumstances, what at first sight
appears to be an “unimportant” error may lead to most deplorable
consequences, and only short-sighted people can consider factional
disputes and a strict differentiation between shades of opinion
inopportune or superfluous. The fate of Russian Social-Democracy for
very many years to come may depend on the strengthening of one or the
other “shade”.

 

Secondly, the Social-Democratic movement is in its very essence an
international movement. This means, not only that we must combat
national chauvinism, but that an incipient movement in a young country
can be successful only if it makes use of the experiences of other
countries. In order to make use of these experiences it is not enough
merely to be acquainted with them, or simply to copy out the latest
resolutions. What is required is the ability to treat these experiences
critically and to test them independently. He who realises how
enormously the modern working-class movement has grown and branched out
will understand what a reserve of theoretical forces and political (as
well as revolutionary) experience is required to carry out this task.

 

Thirdly, the national tasks of Russian Social-Democracy are such as have
never confronted any other socialist party in the world. We shall have
occasion further on to deal with the political and organisational duties
which the task of emancipating the whole people from the yoke of
autocracy imposes upon us. At this point, we wish to state only that
the _role of vanguard fighter can be fulfilled only by a party that is
guided by the most advanced theory._ To have a concrete understanding of
what this means, let the reader recall such predecessors of Russian
Social Democracy as Herzen, Belinsky, Chernyshevsky, and the brilliant
galaxy of revolutionaries of the seventies; let him ponder over the
world significance which Russian literature is now acquiring; let him. .
. but be that enough!

 

Let us quote what Engels said in 1874 concerning the significance of
theory in the Social-Democratic movement. Engels recognizes, not
two forms of the great struggle of Social Democracy (political and
economic), as is the fashion among us, but three, placing the
theoretical struggle on a par with the first two. His recommendations to
the German working-class movement, which had become strong, practically
and politically, are so instructive from the standpoint of present-day
problems and controversies, that we hope the reader will not be vexed
with us for quoting a long passage from his prefatory note to Der
deutsche Bauernkrieg,^(²⁵) which has long become a great bibliographical
rarity:

 

“The German workers have two important advantages over those of the rest
of Europe. First, they belong to the most theoretical people of Europe;
and they have retained that sense of theory which the so-called
’educated’ classes of Germany have almost completely lost. Without
German philosophy, which preceded it, particularly that of Hegel, German
scientific socialism – the only scientific socialism that has ever
existed – would never have come into being. Without a sense of theory
among the workers, this scientific socialism would never have entered
their flesh and blood as much as is the case. What an immeasurable
advantage this is may be seen, on the one hand, from the indifference
towards all theory, which is one of the main reasons why the English
working-class movement crawls along so slowly in spite of the splendid
organisation of the individual unions; on the other hand, from the
mischief and confusion wrought by Proudhonism, in its original form,
among the French and Belgians, and, in the form further caricatured by
Bakunin, among the Spaniards and Italians.

 

“The second advantage is that, chronologically speaking, the Germans
were about the last to come into the workers’ movement. Just as German
theoretical socialism will never forget that it rests on the shoulders
of Saint-Simon, Fourier, and Owen – three men who, in spite of all their
fantastic notions and all their utopianism, have their place among the
most eminent thinkers of all times, and whose genius anticipated
innumerable things, the correctness of which is now being scientifically
proved by us – so the practical workers’ movement in Germany ought never
to forget that it has developed on the shoulders of the English and
French movements, that it was able simply to utilise their dearly bought
experience, and could now avoid their mistakes, which in their time were
mostly unavoidable. Without the precedent of the English trade unions
and French workers’ political struggles, without the gigantic impulse
given especially by the Paris Commune, where would we be now?

 

“It must be said to the credit of the German workers that they have
exploited the advantages of their situation with rare understanding. For
the first time since a workers’ movement has existed, the struggle is
being conducted pursuant to its three sides – the theoretical, the
political, and the practical-economic (resistance to the capitalists) –
in harmony and in its interconnections, and in a systematic way. It is
precisely in this, as it were, concentric attack, that the strength and
invincibility of the German movement lies.

 

“Due to this advantageous situation, on the one hand, and to the insular
peculiarities of the English and the forcible suppression of the French
movement, on the other, the German workers have for the moment been
placed in the vanguard of the proletarian struggle. How long events will
allow them to occupy this post of honour cannot be foretold. But let us
hope that as long as they occupy it, they will fill it fittingly. This
demands redoubled efforts in every field of struggle and agitation. In
particular, it will be the duty of the leaders to gain an ever clearer
insight into all theoretical questions, to free themselves more and more
from the influence of traditional phrases inherited from the old world
outlook, and constantly to keep in mind that socialism, since it has
become a science, demands that it be pursued as a science, i.e., that it
be studied. The task will be to spread with increased zeal among the
masses of the workers the ever more clarified understanding thus
acquired, to knit together ever more firmly the organisation both of the
party and of the trade unions....

“If the German workers progress in this way, they will not be marching
exactly at the head of the movement – it is not at all in the interest
of this movement that the workers of any particular country should march
at its head – but they will occupy an honourable place in the battle
line; and they will stand armed for battle when either unexpectedly
grave trials or momentous events demand of them increased courage,
increased determination and energy.”^(²⁶)

 

Engels’s words proved prophetic. Within a few years the German workers
were subjected to unexpectedly grave trials in the form of the
Exceptional Law Against the Socialists. And they met those trials armed
for battle and succeeded in emerging from them victorious.

 

The Russian proletariat will have to undergo trials immeasurably graver;
it will have to fight a monster compared with which an antisocialist law
in a constitutional country seems but a dwarf. History has now
confronted us with an immediate task which is the _most
revolutionary_ of all the _immediate _tasks confronting the proletariat
of any country. The fulfilment of this task, the destruction of the most
powerful bulwark, not only of European, but (it may now be said) of
Asiatic reaction, would make the Russian proletariat the vanguard of the
international revolutionary proletariat. And we have the right to count
upon acquiring this honourable title, already earned by our
predecessors, the revolutionaries of the seventies, if we succeed in
inspiring our movement, which is a thousand times broader and deeper,
with the same devoted determination and vigour.

 



2 THE SPONTANEITY OF THE MASSES AND THE CONSCIOUSNESS OF THE SOCIAL-DEMOCRATS


 

We have said that our movement, much more extensive and deep than the
movement of the seventies, must be inspired with the same devoted
determination and energy that inspired the movement at that time.
Indeed, no one, we think, has until now doubted that the strength of the
present-day movement lies in the awakening of the masses (principally,
the industrial proletariat) and that its weakness lies in the lack of
consciousness and initiative among the revolutionary leaders.

 

However, of late a staggering discovery has been made, which threatens
to disestablish all hitherto prevailing views on this question. This
discovery was made by _Rabocheye Dyelo_, which in its polemic
with _Iskra_ and _Zarya_ did not confine itself to making objections on
separate points, but tried to ascribe “general disagreements” to a more
profound cause — to the “different appraisals of
the _relative_ importance of the spontaneous and consciously
‘methodical’ element”. _Rabocheye Dyelo_ formulated its indictment as a
“_belittling of the significance of the objective or the spontaneous
element of development_”.^(²⁷) To this we say: Had the polemics
with _Iskra_ and _Zarya_ resulted in nothing more than
causing _Rabocheye Dyelo_ to hit upon these “general disagreements”,
that alone would give us considerable satisfaction, so significant is
this thesis and so clear is the light it sheds on the quintessence of
the present-day theoretical and political differences that exist among
Russian Social-Democrats.

 

For this reason the question of the relation between consciousness and
spontaneity is of such enormous general interest, and for this reason
the question must be dealt with in great detail.

 

 


2.1 The Beginning of the Spontaneous Upsurge

 

In the previous chapter we pointed out how _universally_ absorbed the
educated youth of Russia was in the theories of Marxism in the middle of
the nineties. In the same period the strikes that followed the famous
St. Petersburg industrial war of 1896 assumed a similar general
character. Their spread over the whole of Russia clearly showed the
depth of the newly awakening popular movement, and if we are to speak of
the “spontaneous element” then, of course, it is this strike movement
which, first and foremost, must be regarded as spontaneous. But there is
spontaneity and spontaneity. Strikes occurred in Russia in the seventies
and sixties (and even in the first half of the nineteenth century), and
they were accompanied by the “spontaneous” destruction of machinery,
etc. Compared with these “revolts”, the strikes of the nineties might
even be described as “conscious”, to such an extent do they mark the
progress which the working-class movement made in that period. This
shows that the “spontaneous element”, in essence, represents nothing
more nor less than consciousness in an _embryonic form_. Even the
primitive revolts expressed the awakening of consciousness to a certain
extent. The workers were losing their age-long faith in the permanence
of the system which oppressed them and began... I shall not say to
understand, but to sense the necessity for collective resistance,
definitely abandoning their slavish submission to the authorities. But
this was, nevertheless, more in the nature of outbursts of desperation
and vengeance than of _struggle_. The strikes of the nineties revealed
far greater flashes of consciousness; definite demands were advanced,
the strike was carefully timed, known cases and instances in other
places were discussed, etc. The revolts were simply the resistance of
the oppressed, whereas the systematic strikes represented the class
struggle in embryo, but only in embryo. Taken by themselves, these
strikes were simply trade union struggles, not yet Social Democratic
struggles. They marked the awakening antagonisms between workers and
employers; but the workers, were not, and could not be, conscious of the
irreconcilable antagonism of their interests to the whole of the modern
political and social system, i.e., theirs was not yet Social-Democratic
consciousness. In this sense, the strikes of the nineties, despite the
enormous progress they represented as compared with the “revolts”,
remained a purely spontaneous movement.

 

We have said that _there could not have been_ Social-Democratic
consciousness among the workers. It would have to be brought to them
from without. The history of all countries shows that the working class,
exclusively by its own effort, is able to develop only trade union
consciousness, i.e., the conviction that it is necessary to combine in
unions, fight the employers, and strive to compel the government to pass
necessary labour legislation, etc.^(²⁸) The theory of socialism,
however, grew out of the philosophic, historical, and economic theories
elaborated by educated representatives of the propertied classes, by
intellectuals. By their social status the founders of modern scientific
socialism, Marx and Engels, themselves belonged to the bourgeois
intelligentsia. In the very same way, in Russia, the theoretical
doctrine of Social-Democracy arose altogether independently of the
spontaneous growth of the working-class movement; it arose as a natural
and inevitable outcome of the development of thought among the
revolutionary socialist intelligentsia. In the period under discussion,
the middle nineties, this doctrine not only represented the completely
formulated programme of the Emancipation of Labour group, but had
already won over to its side the majority of the revolutionary youth in
Russia.

 

Hence, we had both the spontaneous awakening of the working masses,
their awakening to conscious life and conscious struggle, and a
revolutionary youth, armed with Social-Democratic theory and straining
towards the workers. In this connection it is particularly important to
state the oft-forgotten (and comparatively little-known) fact that,
although the early Social-Democrats of that period zealously carried on
economic agitation (being guided in this activity by the truly useful
indications contained in the pamphlet On Agitation,^(²⁹) then still in
manuscript), they did not regard this as their sole task. On the
contrary, from the very beginning they set for Russian Social-Democracy
the most far-reaching historical tasks, in general, and the task of
overthrowing the autocracy, in particular. Thus, towards the end of
1895, the St. Petersburg group of Social-Democrats, which founded the
League of Struggle for the Emancipation of the Working Class, prepared
the first issue of a newspaper called Rabocheye Dyelo. This issue was
ready to go to press when it was seized by the gendarmes, on the night
of December 8, 1895, in a raid on the house of one of the members of the
group, Anatoly Alexeyevich Vaneyey,^(³⁰) so that the first edition
of Rabocheye Dyelo was not destined to see the light of day. The leading
article in this issue (which perhaps thirty years hence some Russkaya
Starina^(³¹) will unearth in the archives of the Department of Police)
outlined the historical tasks of the working class in Russia and placed
the achievement of political liberty at their head. The issue also
contained an article entitled “What Are Our Ministers Thinking
About?”^(³²) which dealt with the crushing of theelementary education
committees by the police. In addition, there was some correspondence
from St. Petersburg, and from other parts of Russia (e.g., a letter on
the massacre of the workers in Yaroslavl Gubernia). This, “first
effort”, if we are not mistaken, of the Russian Social-Democrats of the
nineties was not a purely local, or less still, “Economic”, newspaper,
but one that aimed to unite the strike movement with the revolutionary
movement against the autocracy, and to win over to the side of
Social-Democracy all who were oppressed by the policy of reactionary
obscurantism. No one in the slightest degree acquainted with the state
of the movement at that period could doubt that such a paper would have
met with warm response among the workers of the capital and the
revolutionary intelligentsia and would have had a wide circulation. The
failure of the enterprise merely showed that the Social-Democrats of
that period were unable to meet the immediate requirements of the time
owing to their lack of revolutionary experience and practical training.
This must be said, too, with regard to the S. Peterburgsky Rabochy
Listok^(³³) and particularly with regard to Rabochaya Gazeta and
the Manifesto of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party, founded in
the spring of 1898. Of course, we would not dream of blaming the Social
Democrats of that time for this unpreparedness. But in order to profit
from the experience of that movement, and to draw practical lessons from
it, we must thoroughly understand the causes and significance of this or
that shortcoming. It is therefore highly important to establish the fact
that a part (perhaps even a majority) of the Social-Democrats, active in
the period of 1895-98, justly considered it possible even then, at the
very beginning of the “spontaneous” movement, to come forward with a
most extensive programme and a militant tactical line.^(³⁴) Lack of
training of the majority of the revolutionaries, an entirely natural
phenomenon, could not have roused any particular fears. Once the tasks
were correctly defined, once the energy existed for repeated attempts to
fulfil them, temporary failures represented only part misfortune.
Revolutionary experience and organisational skill are things that can be
acquired, provided the desire is there to acquire them, provided the
shortcomings are recognised, which in revolutionary activity is more
than half-way towards their removal.

 

But what was only part misfortune became full misfortune when this
consciousness began to grow dim (it was very much alive among the
members of the groups mentioned), when there appeared people—and even
Social -Democratic organs—that were prepared to regard shortcomings as
virtues, that even tried to invent a theoretical basis for their slavish
cringing before spontaneity. It is time to draw conclusions from this
trend, the content of which is incorrectly and too narrowly
characterised as Economism.

 


2.2 Bowing to Spontaneity. _Rabochaya Misl_

 

Before dealing with the literary manifestation of this subservience to
spontaneity, we should like to note the following characteristic fact
(communicated to us from the above-mentioned source), which throws light
on the conditions in which the two future conflicting trends in Russian
Social-Democracy arose and grew among the comrades working in St.
Petersburg. In the beginning of 1897, just prior to their banishment, A.
A. Vaneyev and several of his comrades attended a private
meeting^(³⁵) at which “old” and “young” members of the League of
Struggle for the Emancipation of the Working Class gathered. The
conversation centred chiefly about the question of organisation,
particularly about the “rules for the workers’ mutual benefit fund”,
which, in their final form, were published in “Listok”
Rabotnika,^(³⁶) No. 9-10, p. 46. Sharp differences immediately showed
themselves between the “old” members (“Decembrists”, as the St.
Petersburg Social Democrats jestingly called them) and several the
“young” members (who subsequently took an active part in the work
of Rabochaya Mysl), with a heated discussion ensuing. The “young”
members defended the main principles of the rules in the form in which
they were published. The “old” members contended that the prime
necessity was not this, but the consolidation of the League of Struggle
into an organisation of revolutionaries to which all the various
workers’ mutual benefit funds, students’ propaganda circles, etc.,
should be subordinated. It goes without saying that the disputing sides
far from realised at the time that these disagreements were the
beginning of a cleavage; on the contrary, they regarded them as
something isolated and casual. But this fact shows that in Russia, too,
Economism did not arise and spread without a struggle against the “old”
Social-Democrats (which the Economists of today are apt to forget). And
if, in the main, this struggle has not left “documentary” traces behind
it, it is solely because the membership of the circles then functioning
underwent such constant change that no continuity was established and,
consequently, differences in point of view were not recorded in any
documents.

 

The founding of Rabochaya Mysl brought Economism to the light of day,
but not at one stroke. We must picture to ourselves concretely the
conditions for activity and the short-lived character of the majority of
the Russian study circles (a thing that is possible only for those who
have themselves experienced it) in order to understand how much there
was of the fortuitous in the successes and failures of the new trend in
various towns, and the length of time during which neither the advocates
nor the opponents of the “new” could make up their minds — and literally
had no opportunity of so doing — as to whether this really expressed a
distinct trend or merely the lack of training of certain individuals.
For example, the first mimeographed copies of Rabochaya Mysl never
reached the great majority of Social-Democrats, and if we are able to
refer to the leading article in the first number, it is only because it
was reproduced in an article by V. I.^(³⁷) (“Listok” Rabotnika, No.
9-10, p. 47, et seq.), who, of course, did not fail to extol with more
zeal than reason the new paper, which was so different from the papers
and projects for papers mentioned above.^(³⁸) It is well worth dwelling
on this leading article because it brings out in bold relief the entire
spirit of Rabochaya Mysl and Economism generally.

 

After stating that the arm of the “blue-coats”^(³⁹) could never halt the
progress of the working-class movement, the leading article goes on to
say: “. . . The virility of the working-class movement is due to the
fact that the workers themselves are at last taking their fate into
their own hands, and out of the hands of the leaders”; this fundamental
thesis is then developed in greater detail. Actually, the leaders (i.e.,
the Social-Democrats, the organisers of the League of Struggle) were,
one might say, torn out of the hands of the workers^(⁴⁰) by the police;
yet it is made to appear that the workers were fighting against the
leaders and liberated themselves from their yoke! Instead of sounding
the call to go forward towards the consolidation of the revolutionary
organisation and the expansion of political activity, the call was
issued for a retreat to the purely trade union struggle. It was
announced that “the economic basis of the movement is eclipsed by the
effort never to forget the political ideal”, and that the watchword for
the working-class movement was “Struggle for economic conditions” (!)
or, better still, “The workers for the workers”. It was declared that
strike funds “are more valuable to the movement than a hundred other
Organisations” (compare this statement made in October 1897, with
the polemic between the “Decembrists” and the young members in the
beginning of 1897), etc. Catchwords like “We must concentrate, not on
the ’cream’ of the workers, but on the ’average’, mass worker”;
“Politics always obediently follows economics”,^(⁴¹) etc., etc., became
the fashion, exercising an irresistible influence upon the masses of the
youth who were attracted to the movement but who, in the majority of
cases, were acquainted only with such fragments of Marxism as were
expounded in legally appearing publications.

 

Political consciousness was completely overwhelmed by spontaneity — the
spontaneity of the “Social-Democrats” who repeated Mr. V. V.’s “ideas”,
the spontaneity of those workers who were carried away by the arguments
that a kopek added to a ruble was worth more than any socialism or
politics, and that they must “fight, knowing that they are fighting, not
for the sake of some future generation, but for themselves and their
children” (leader in Rabochaya Mysl, No. 1). Phrases like these have
always been a favourite weapon of the West-European bourgeois, who, in
their hatred for socialism, strove (like the German “Sozial-Politiker”
Hirsch) to transplant English trade-unionism to their native soil and to
preach to the workers that by engaging in the purely trade union
struggle^(⁴²) they would be fighting for themselves and for their
children, and not for some future generations with some future
socialism. And now the “V. V.s of Russian Social-Democracy” have set
about repeating these bourgeois phrases. It is important at this point
to note three circumstances that will be useful to our further analysis
of contemporary differences.^(⁴³)

 

In the first place, the overwhelming of political consciousness by
spontaneity, to which we referred above, also took place spontaneously.
This may sound like a pun, but, alas, it is the bitter truth. It did not
take place as a result of an open struggle between two diametrically
opposed points of view, in which one triumphed over the other; it
occurred because of the fact that an increasing number of “old”
revolutionaries were “torn away” by the gendarmes and increasing numbers
of “young” “V. V.s of Russian Social Democracy” appeared on the scene.
Everyone, who has, I shall not say participated in, but at least
breathed the atmosphere of, the present-day Russian movement, knows
perfectly well that this is precisely the case. And if, nevertheless, we
insist strongly that the reader be fully clear on this generally known
fact, if we cite, for explicitness, as it were, the facts of the first
edition of Rabocheye Dyelo and of the polemic between the “old” and the
“young” at the beginning of 1897, we do this because the people who
vaunt their “democracy” speculate on the ignorance of these facts on the
part of the broad public (or of the very young generation). We shall
return to this point further on.

Secondly, in the very first literary expression of Economism we observe
the exceedingly curious phenomenon — highly characteristic for an
understanding of all the differences prevailing among present-day Social
Democrats — that the adherents of the “labour movement pure and simple”,
worshippers of the closest “organic” contacts (Rabocheye Dyelo’s term)
with the proletarian struggle, opponents of any non-worker
intelligentsia (even a socialist intelligentsia), are compelled, in
order to defend their positions, to resort to the arguments of
the bourgeois “pure trade-unionists”. This shows that from the very
outset Rabochaya Mysl began — unconsciously — to implement the programme
of the Credo. This shows (something Rabocheye Dyelocannot grasp)
that all worship of the spontaneity of the working class movement, all
belittling of the role of “the conscious element”, of the role of
Social-Democracy, means, quite independently of whether he who belittles
that role desires it or not, a strengthening of the influence of
bourgeois ideology upon the workers. All those who talk about
“overrating the importance of ideology”,^(⁴⁴) about exaggerating the
role of the conscious element,^(⁴⁵) etc., imagine that the labour
movement pure and simple can elaborate, and will elaborate, an
independent ideology for itself, if only the workers “wrest their fate
from the hands of the leaders”. But this is a profound mistake. To
supplement what has been said above, we shall quote the following
profoundly true and important words of Karl Kautsky on the new draft
programme of the Austrian Social-Democratic Party:^(⁴⁶)

 

“Many of our revisionist critics believe that Marx asserted that
economic development and the class struggle create, not only the
conditions for socialist production, but also, and directly,
the consciousness [K. K.’s italics] of its necessity. And these critics
assert that England, the country most highly developed capitalistically,
is more remote than any other from this consciousness. Judging by the
draft, one might assume that this allegedly orthodox Marxist view, which
is thus refuted, was shared by the committee that drafted the Austrian
programme. In the draft programme it is stated: ‘The more capitalist
development increases the numbers of the proletariat, the more the
proletariat is compelled and becomes fit to fight against capitalism.
The proletariat becomes conscious of the possibility and of the
necessity for socialism.’ In this connection socialist consciousness
appears to be a necessary and direct result of the proletarian class
struggle. But this is absolutely untrue. Of course, socialism, as a
doctrine, has its roots in modern economic relationships just as the
class struggle of the proletariat has, and, like the latter, emerges
from the struggle against the capitalist-created poverty and misery of
the masses. But socialism and the class struggle arise side by side and
not one out of the other; each arises under different conditions. Modern
socialist consciousness can arise only on the basis of profound
scientific knowledge. Indeed, modern economic science is as much a
condition for socialist production as, say, modern technology, and the
proletariat can create neither the one nor the other, no matter how much
it may desire to do so; both arise out of the modern social process. The
vehicle of science is not the proletariat, but the bourgeois
intelligentsia [K. K.’s italics]: it was in the minds of individual
members of this stratum that modern socialism originated, and it was
they who communicated it to the more intellectually developed
proletarians who, in their turn, introduce it into the proletarian class
struggle where conditions allow that to be done. Thus, socialist
consciousness is something introduced into the proletarian class
struggle from without [von Aussen Hineingetragenes] and not something
that arose within it spontaneously [urwüchsig]. Accordingly, the old
Hainfeld programme quite rightly stated that the task of
Social-Democracy is to imbue the proletariat (literally: saturate the
proletariat) with the consciousness of its position and the
consciousness of its task. There would be no need for this if
consciousness arose of itself from the class struggle. The new draft
copied this proposition from the old programme, and attached it to the
proposition mentioned above. But this completely broke the line of
thought...”

 

Since there can be no talk of an independent ideology formulated by the
working masses themselves in the process of their movement,^(⁴⁷) the
only choice is — either bourgeois or socialist ideology. There is no
middle course (for mankind has not created a “third” ideology, and,
moreover, in a society torn by class antagonisms there can never be a
non-class or an above-class ideology). Hence, to belittle the socialist
ideology in any way, to turn aside from it in the slightest degree means
to strengthen bourgeois ideology. There is much talk of spontaneity. But
the spontaneous development of the working-class movement leads to its
subordination to bourgeois ideology, to its development along the lines
of the Credo programme; for the spontaneous working-class movement is
trade-unionism, is Nur-Gewerkschaftlerei, and trade unionism means the
ideological enslavement of the workers by the bourgeoisie. Hence, our
task, the task of Social-Democracy, is to combat spontaneity, to
divert the working-class movement from this spontaneous, trade-unionist
striving to come under the wing of the bourgeoisie, and to bring it
under the wing of revolutionary Social Democracy. The sentence employed
by the authors of the Economist letter published in Iskra, No. 12, that
the efforts of the most inspired ideologists fail to divert the
working-class movement from the path that is determined by the
interaction of the material elements and the material environment is
therefore tantamount to renouncing socialism. If these authors were
capable of fearlessly, consistently, and thoroughly considering what
they say, as everyone who enters the arena of literary and public
activity should be, there would be nothing left for them but to “fold
their useless arms over their empty breasts” and surrender the field of
action to the Struves and Prokopoviches, who are dragging the
working-class movement “along the line of least resistance”, i.e., along
the line of bourgeois trade-unionism, or to the Zubatovs, who are
dragging it along the line of clerical and gendarme “ideology”.

 

Let us recall the example of Germany. What was the historic service
Lassalle rendered to the German working-class movement? It was that
he diverted that movement from the path of progressionist trade-unionism
and co-operativism towards which it had been spontaneously moving (with
the benign assistance of Schulze-Delitzsch and his like). To fulfil such
a task it was necessary to do something quite different from talking of
underrating the spontaneous element, of tactics-as-process, of the
interaction between elements and environment, etc. A fierce struggle
against spontaneity was necessary, and only after such a struggle,
extending over many years, was it possible, for instance, to convert the
working population of Berlin from a bulwark of the progressionist party
into one of the finest strongholds of Social-Democracy. This struggle is
by no means over even today (as might seem to those who learn the
history of the German movement from Prokopovich, and its philosophy from
Struve). Even now the German working class is, so to speak, split up
among a number of ideologies. A section of the workers is organised in
Catholic and monarchist trade unions; another section is organised in
the Hirsch-Duncker^(⁴⁸) unions, founded by the bourgeois worshippers of
English trade-unionism; the third is organised in Social-Democratic
trade unions. The last-named group is immeasurably more numerous than
the rest, but the Social-Democratic ideology was able to achieve this
superiority, and will be able to maintain it, only in an unswerving
struggle against all other ideologies.

 

But why, the reader will ask, does the spontaneous movement, the
movement along the line of least resistance, lead to the domination of
bourgeois ideology? For the simple reason that bourgeois ideology is far
older in origin than socialist ideology, that it is more fully
developed, and that it has at its disposal immeasurably more means of
dissemination.^(⁴⁹) And the younger the socialist movement in any given
country, the more vigorously it must struggle against all attempts to
entrench non-socialist ideology, and the more resolutely the workers
must be warned against the bad counsellors who shout against “overrating
the conscious element”, etc. The authors of the Economist letter, in
unison with Rabocheye Dyelo, inveigh against the intolerance that is
characteristic of the infancy of the movement. To this we reply: Yes,
our movement is indeed in its infancy, and in order that it may grow up
faster, it must become imbued with intolerance against those who retard
its growth by their subservience to spontaneity. Nothing is so
ridiculous and harmful as pretending that we are “old hands” who have
long ago experienced all the decisive stages of the struggle.

 

Thirdly, the first issue of Rabochaya Mysl shows that the term
“Economism” (which, of course, we do not propose to abandon, since, in
one way or another, this designation has already established itself)
does not adequately convey the real character of the new
trend. Rabochaya Mysl does not altogether repudiate the political
struggle; the rules for a workers’ mutual benefit fund published in its
first issue contain a reference to combating the government. Rabochaya
Mysl believes, however, that “politics always obediently follows
economics” (Rabocheye Dyelo varies this thesis when it asserts in its
programme that “in Russia more than in any other country, the economic
struggle is inseparable from the political struggle”). If by politics is
meant Social-Democratic politics, then the theses of Rabochaya Mysl
and Rabocheye Dyelo are utterly incorrect. The economic struggle of the
workers is very often connected (although not inseparably) with
bourgeois politics, clerical politics, etc., as we have seen. Rabocheye
Dyelo’s theses are correct, if by politics is meant trade union
politics, viz., the common striving of all workers to secure from the
government measures for alleviating the distress to which their
condition gives rise, but which do not abolish that condition, i.e.,
which do not remove the subjection of labour to capital. That striving
indeed is common to the English trade-unionists, who are hostile to
socialism, to the Catholic workers, to the “Zubatov” workers, etc. There
is politics and politics. Thus, we see that Rabochaya Mysl does not so
much deny the political struggle, as it bows to its spontaneity, to its
unconsciousness. While fully recognising the political struggle (better:
the political desires and demands of the workers), which arises
spontaneously from the working-class movement itself, it absolutely
refuses independently to work out a specifically Social-Democratic
politics corresponding to the general tasks of socialism and to
present-day conditions in Russia. Further on we shall show
that Rabocheye Dyelo commits the same error.

 


2.3 The Self-Emancipation Group^(⁵⁰) and _Rabocheye Dyelo_

 

We have dealt at such length with the little-known and now almost
forgotten leading article in the first issue of Rabochaya Mysl because
it was the first and most striking expression of that general stream of
thought which afterwards emerged into the light of day in innumerable
streamlets. V. I. was perfectly right when, in praising the first issue
and the leading article of Rabochaya Mysl, he said that the article had
been written in a “sharp and fervent” manner (“Listok” Rabotnika, No.
9-10, p. 49). Every man with convictions who thinks he has something new
to say writes “fervently” and in such a way as to make his views stand
out in bold relief. Only those who are accustomed to sitting between two
stools lack “fervour”; only such people are able to praise the fervour
of Rabochaya Mysl one day and attack the “fervent polemics” of its
opponents the next.

 

We shall not dwell on the “Separate Supplement” to Rabochaya Mysl (below
we shall have occasion, on various points, to refer to this work, which
expresses the ideas of the Economists more consistently than any other)
but shall briefly mention the “Appeal of the Self-Emancipation of the
Workers Group” (March 1899, reprinted in the London Nakanune,^(⁵¹) No.
7, July 1899). The authors of the “Appeal” rightly say that “the workers
of Russia are only just awakening, are just beginning to look about
them, and are instinctively clutching at the first available means of
struggle”. Yet they draw from this the same false conclusion as that
drawn by Rabochaya Mysl, forgetting that the instinctive is the
unconscious (the spontaneous) to the aid of which socialists must come;
that the “first available means of struggle” will always be, in modern
society, the trade union means of struggle, and the “first available”
ideology the bourgeois (trade union) ideology. Similarly, these authors
do not “repudiate” politics, they merely (merely!) echo Mr. V. V. that
politics is the superstructure, and therefore, “political agitation must
be the superstructure to the agitation carried on in favour of the
economic struggle; it must arise on the basis of this struggle and
follow in its wake”.

 

As for Rabocheye Dyelo, it began its activity with the “defence” of the
Economists. It stated a downright untruth in its opening issue (No. 1,
pp. 141-42) in claiming that it “does not know to which young comrades
Axelrod referred” when he warned the Economists in his well-known
pamphlet.^(⁵²) In the polemic that flared up with Axelrod and Plekhanov
over this untruth,Rabocheye Dyelo had to admit that “in form of
perplexity, it sought to defend all the younger Social-Democrats abroad
from this unjust accusation” (the charge of narrowness levelled by
Axelrod at the Economists). In reality this accusation was completely
justified, and Rabocheye Dyelo knew perfectly well that, among others,
it applied also to V. I., a member of its Editorial Board. Let me note
in passing that in this polemic Axelrod was entirely right and Rabocheye
Dyelo entirely wrong in their respective interpretations of my
pamphlet The Tasks of the Russian Social-Democrats.^(⁵³) The pamphlet
was written in 1897, before the appearance of Rabochaya Mysl, when I
thought, rightly, that the original tendency of the St. Petersburg
League of Struggle, which I characterised above, was dominant. And this
tendency was dominant at least until the middle of 1898.
Consequently, Rabocheye Dyelo had no right whatever, in its attempt to
deny the existence and danger of Economism, to refer to a pamphlet that
expressed views forced out by Economist views in St. Petersburg in
1897-98.^(⁵⁴)

But Rabocheye Dyelo not only “defended” the Economists, it itself
constantly fell into their fundamental errors. The source of this
confusion is to be found in the ambiguity of the interpretation given to
the following thesis of the Rabocheye Dyelo programme: “We consider that
the most important phenomenon of Russian life, the one that will
mainly determine the tasks [our italics] and the character of the
publication activity of the Union, is the mass working-class
movement [Rabocheye Dyelo’s italics] which has arisen in recent years.”
That the mass movement is a most important phenomenon is a fact not to
be disputed. But the crux of the matter is, how is one to understand the
statement that the mass working class movement will “determine the
tasks”? It may be interpreted in one of two ways. Either it means bowing
to the spontaneity of this movement, i.e., reducing the role of
Social-Democracy to mere subservience to the working-class movement as
such (the interpretation of Rabochaya Mysl, the Self-Emancipation Group,
and other Economists), or it means that the mass movement places before
us new theoretical, political, and organisational tasks, far more
complicated than those that might have satisfied us in the period before
the rise of the mass movement. Rabocheye Dyelo inclined and still
inclines towards the first interpretation, for it has said nothing
definite about any new tasks, but has argued constantly as though the
“mass movement” relieves us of the necessity of clearly understanding
and fulfilling the tasks it sets before us. We need only point out
that Rabocheye Dyelo considered that it was impossible to set the
overthrow of the autocracy as the first task of the mass working-class
movement, and that it degraded this task (in the name of the mass
movement) to that of a struggle for immediate political demands (Reply,
p. 25).

 

We shall pass over the article by B. Krichevsky, editor of Rabocheye
Dyelo, entitled “The Economic and the Political Struggle in the Russian
Movement”, published in No. 7 of that paper, in which these very
mistakes^(⁵⁵) are repeated, and proceed directly to Rabocheye Dyelo, No.
10. We shall not, of course, enter in detail into the various objections
raised by Krichevsky and Martynov against Zarya and Iskra. We are here
interested solely in the basis of principles on which Rabocheye Dyelo,
in its tenth issue, took its stand. Thus, we shall not examine the
strange fact that Rabocheye Dyelo saw a “diametrical contradiction”
between the proposition:

 

“Social-Democracy does not, tie its hands, it does not restrict its
activities to some one preconceived plan or method of political
struggle; it recognises all means of struggle as long as they correspond
to the forces at-the disposal of the Party,” etc. (Iskra, No. 1)^(⁵⁶).

 

and the proposition:

 

“Without a strong organisation skilled in waging political struggle
under all circumstances and at all times, there can be no question of
that systematic plan of action, illumined by firm principles and
steadfastly carried out, which alone is worthy of the name of tactics”
(Iskra, No. 4)^(⁵⁷).

 

To confound recognition, in principle, of all means of struggle, of all
plans and methods, provided they are expedient, with the demand at a
given political moment to be guided by a strictly observed plan is
tantamount, if we are to talk of tactics, to confounding the recognition
by medical science of various methods of treating diseases with the
necessity for adopting a certain definite method of treatment for a
given disease. The point is, however, that Rabocheye Dyelo, itself the
victim of a disease which we have called bowing to spontaneity, refuses
to recognise any “method of treatment” for that disease. Hence, it has
made the remarkable discovery that “tactics-as-plan contradicts the
fundamental spirit of Marxism” (No. 10, p. 18), that tactics are “a
process of growth of Party tasks, which grow together with the Party”
(p. 11, Rabocheye Dyelo’s italics). This remark has every chance of
becoming a celebrated maxim, a permanent monument to the Rabocheye
Dyelo “trend”. To the question, whither? the leading organ replies:
Movement is a process of changing the distance between the
starting-point and subsequent points of the movement. This matchless
example of profundity is not merely a curiosity (were it that, it would
not be worth dealing with at length), but the programme of a whole
trend, the very programme which R. M. (in the “Separate Supplement”
to Rabochaya Mysl) expressed in the words: That struggle is desirable
which is possible, and the struggle which is possible is that which is
going on at the given moment. This is precisely the trend of unbounded
opportunism, which passively adapts itself to spontaneity.

 

“Tactics-as-plan contradicts the essence of Marxism!” But this is a
slander of Marxism; it means turning Marxism into the caricature held up
by the Narodniks in their struggle against us. It means belittling the
initiative and energy of class-conscious fighters, whereas Marxism, on
the contrary, gives a gigantic impetus to the initiative and energy of
the Social-Democrat, opens up for him the widest perspectives, and (if
one may so express it) places at his disposal the mighty force of many
millions of workers “spontaneously” rising for the struggle. The entire
history of international Social-Democracy teems with plans advanced now
by one, now by another political leader, some confirming the
far-sightedness and the correct political and organisational views of
their authors and others revealing their short-sightedness and their
political errors. At the time when Germany was at one of the crucial
turning-points in its history — the formation of the Empire, the opening
of the Reichstag, and the granting of universal suffrage — Liebknecht
had one plan for Social-Democratic politics and work in general, and
Schweitzer had another. When the anti-socialist law came down on the
heads of the German socialists, Most and Hasselmann had one plan — they
were prepared then and there to call for violence and terror; Hochbert,
Schramm, and (partly) Bernstein had another — they began to preach to
the Social-Democrats that they themselves had provoked the enactment of
the law by being unreasonably bitter and revolutionary, and must now
earn forgiveness by their exemplary conduct. There was yet a third plan,
proposed by those who prepared and carried out the publication of an
illegal organ. It is easy, of course, with hindsight, many years after
the struggle over the selection of the path to be followed, and after
history has pronounced its verdict as to the expediency of the path
selected, to utter profound maxims about the growth of Party tasks,
which grow together with the Party. But at a time of
confusion,^(⁵⁸) when the Russian “Critics” and Economists are degrading
Social-Democracy to the level of trade-unionism, and when the terrorists
are strongly advocating the adoption of “tactics-as-plan” that repeats
the old mistakes, at such a time, to confine oneself to profundities of
this kind, means simply to issue to oneself a “certificate of poverty”.
At a time when many Russian Social-Democrats suffer from a lack of
initiative and energy, from an inadequate “scope of political
propaganda, agitation, and organisation,”^(⁵⁹)  from a lack of “plans”
for a broader organisation of revolutionary work, at such a time, to
declare that “tactics-as-plan” contradicts the essence of Marxism means
not only to vulgarise Marxism in the realm of theory, but to drag the
Party backward in practice.

 

Rabocheye Dyelo goes on to sermonise:

 

“The task of the revolutionary Social-Democrat is only to accelerate
objective development by his conscious work, not to obviate it or
substitute his own subjective plans for this development. Iskra knows
all this in theory; but the enormous importance which Marxism justly
attaches to conscious revolutionary work causes it in practice, owing to
its doctrinaire view of tactics, to belittle the significance of the
objective or the spontaneous element of development”(p. 18).

 

Another example of the extraordinary theoretical confusion worthy of Mr.
V. V. and his fraternity. We would ask our philosopher: how may a
designer of subjective plans “belittle” objective development? Obviously
by losing sight of the fact that this objective development creates or
strengthens, destroys or weakens certain classes, strata, or groups,
certain nations or groups of nations, etc., and in this way serves to
determine a given international political alignment of forces, or the
position adopted by revolutionary parties, etc. If the designer of plans
did that, his guilt would not be that he belittled the spontaneous
element, but, on the contrary, that he belittled the conscious element,
for he would then show that he lacked the “consciousness” properly to
understand objective development. Hence, the very talk of “estimating
the relative significance” (Rabocheye Dyelo’s italics) of spontaneity
and consciousness itself reveals a complete lack of “consciousness”. If
certain “spontaneous elements of development” can be grasped at all by
human understanding, then an incorrect estimation of them will be
tantamount to “belittling the conscious element”. But if they cannot be
grasped, then we do not know them, and therefore cannot speak of them.
What then is Krichevsky discussing? If he thinks that Iskra’s
“subjective plans” are erroneous (as he in fact declares them to be), he
should have shown what objective facts they ignore, and only then
charged Iskra with lacking political consciousness for ignoring them,
with “belittling the conscious element”, to use his own words. If,
however, displeased with subjective plans, he can bring forward no
argument other than that of “belittling the spontaneous element” (!), he
merely shows: (1) that, theoretically, he understands Marxism a
la Kareyev and Mikhailovsky, who have been sufficiently ridiculed by
Beltov;^(⁶⁰) and (2) that, practically, he is quite satisfied with the
“spontaneous elements of development” that have drawn our legal Marxists
towards Bernsteinism and our Social-Democrats towards Economism, and
that he is “full of wrath” against those who have determined at all
costs to divert Russian Social-Democracy from the path of “spontaneous”
development.

 

Further, there follow things that are positively droll. “Just as human
beings will reproduce in the old-fashioned way despite all the
discoveries of natural science, so the birth of a new social order will
come about, in the future too, mainly as a result of elemental
outbursts, despite all the discoveries of social science and the
increase in the number of conscious fighters” (p. 19). Just as our
grandfathers in their old-fashioned wisdom used to say, Anyone can bring
children into the world, so today the “modern socialists” (a la Nartsis
Tuporylov)^(⁶¹) say in their wisdom, Anyone can participate in the
spontaneous birth of a new social order. We too hold that anyone can.
All that is required for participation of that kind is to yield to
Economism when Economism reigns and to terrorism when terrorism arises.
Thus, in the spring of this year, when it was so important to utter a
note of warning against infatuation with terrorism, Rabocheye
Dyelo stood in amazement, confronted by a problem that was “new” to it.
And now, six months after, when the problem has become less topical, it
presents us at one and the same time with the declaration: “We think
that it is not and should not be the task of Social-Democracy to
counteract the rise of terroristic sentiments” (Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10,
p. 23), and with the Conference resolution: “The Conference regards
systematic and aggressive terror as being inopportune” (Two Conferences,
p. 18). How beautifully clear and coherent this is! Not to counteract,
but to declare inopportune, and to declare it in such a way that
unsystematic and defensive terror does not come within the scope of the
“resolution”. It must be admitted that such a resolution is extremely
safe and is fully insured against error, just as a man who talks, but
says nothing, insures himself against error. All that is needed to frame
such a resolution is an ability to keep at the tail end of the movement.
When Iskra ridiculed Rabocheye Dyelo for declaring the question of
terror to be new,^(⁶²) the latter angrily accused Iskra of “having the
incredible effrontery to impose upon the Party organisation solutions of
tactical questions proposed by a group of emigrant writers more than
fifteen years ago” (p. 24). Effrontery. Indeed, and what an
overestimation of the conscious element — first to resolve questions
theoretically beforehand, and then to try to convince the organisation,
the Party, and the masses of the correctness of this solution!^(⁶³) How
much better it would be to repeat the elements and, without “imposing”
anything upon anybody, swing with every “turn” — whether in the
direction of Economism or in the direction of terrorism. Rabocheye
Dyelo even generalises this great precept of worldly wisdom and
accuses Iskra and Zarya of “setting up their programme against the
movement, like a spirit hovering over the formless chaos” (p. 29). But
what else is the function of Social-Democracy if not to be a “spirit”
that not only hovers over the spontaneous movement, but also raises this
movement to the level of “its programme”? Surely, it is not its function
to drag at the tail of the movement. At best, this would be of no
service to the movement; at worst, it would be exceedingly
harmful. Rabocheye Dyelo, however, not only follows this
“tactics-as-process”, but elevates it to a principle, so that it would
be more correct to describe its tendency not as opportunism, but
as tail-ism (from the word tail). And it must be admitted that those who
are determined always to follow behind the movement and be its tail are
absolutely and forever guaranteed against “belittling the spontaneous
element of development”.

 

 

And so, we have become convinced that the fundamental error committed by
the “new trend” in Russian Social-Democracy is its bowing to spontaneity
and its failure to understand that the spontaneity of the masses demands
a high degree of consciousness from us Social-Democrats. The greater the
spontaneous upsurge of the masses and the more widespread the movement,
the more rapid, incomparably so, the demand for greater consciousness in
the theoretical, political and organisational work of Social-Democracy.

 

The spontaneous upsurge of the masses in Russia proceeded (and
continues) with such rapidity that the young Social Democrats proved
unprepared to meet these gigantic tasks. This unpreparedness is our
common misfortune, the misfortune of _all_ Russian Social-Democrats. The
upsurge of the masses proceeded and spread with uninterrupted
continuity; it not only continued in the places where it began, but
spread to new localities and to new strata of the population (under the
influence of the working class movement, there was a renewed ferment
among the student youth, among the intellectuals generally, and even
among the peasantry). Revolutionaries, however, _lagged behind_ this
upsurge, both in their “theories” and in their activity; they failed to
establish a constant and continuous organisation capable
of _leading_ the whole movement.

 

In Chapter I, we established that _Rabocheye Dyelo_ belittled our
theoretical tasks and that it “spontaneously” repeated the fashionable
catchword “freedom of criticism”; those who repeated this catchword
lacked the “consciousness” to understand that the positions of the
opportunist “Critics” and those of the revolutionaries in Germany and in
Russia are diametrically opposed.

 

In the following chapters, we shall show how this bowing to spontaneity
found expression in the sphere of the political tasks and in the
organisational work of Social-Democracy.

 



3 TRADE-UNIONIST POLITICS AND SOCIAL-DEMOCRATIC POLITICS


 

We shall again begin by praising Rabocheye Dyelo. “Literature of
Exposure and the Proletarian Struggle” is the title Martynov gave the
article on his differences with Iskra published in Rabocheye Dyelo, No.
10. He formulated the substance of the differences as follows: “We
cannot confine ourselves solely to exposing the system that stands in
its (the working-class party’s) path of development. We must also react
to the immediate and current interests of the proletariat.... Iskra . .
. is in fact an organ of revolutionary opposition that exposes the state
of affairs in our country, particularly the political state of
affairs.... We, however, work and shall continue to work for the cause
of the working class in close organic contact with the proletarian
struggle” (p. 63). One cannot help being grateful to Martynov for this
formula. It is of outstanding general interest, because substantially it
embraces not only our disagreements with Rabocheye Dyelo, but the
general disagreement between ourselves and the Economists on the
political struggle. We have shown that the Economists do not altogether
repudiate “politics”, but that they are constantly straying from the
Social-Democratic to the trade-unionist conception of politics. Martynov
strays in precisely this way, and we shall therefore take his views as
a model of Economist error on this question. As we shall endeavour to
prove, neither the authors of the “Separate Supplement” to Rabochaya
Mysl nor the authors of the manifesto issued by the Self-Emancipation
Group, nor the authors of the Economist letter published in Iskra, No.
12, will have any right to complain against this choice.

 


3.1 Political Agitation and its Restriction by the Economists

 

Everyone knows that the economic^(⁶⁴) struggle of the Russian workers
underwent widespread development and consolidation simultaneously with
the production of “literature” exposing economic (factory and
occupational) conditions. The “leaflets” were devoted mainly to the
exposure of the factory system, and very soon a veritable passion for
exposures was roused among the workers. As soon as the workers realised
that the Social-Democratic study circles desired to, and could, supply
them with a new kind of leaflet that told the whole truth about their
miserable existence, about their unbearably hard toil, and their lack of
rights, they began to send in, actually flood us with, correspondence
from the factories and workshops. This “exposure literature” created a
tremendous sensation, not only in the particular factory exposed in the
given leaflet, but in all the factories to which news of the, revealed
facts spread. And since the poverty and want among the workers in the
various enterprises and in the various trades are much the same, the
“truth about the life of the workers” stirred everyone. Even among the
most backward workers, a veritable passion arose to “get into print” — a
noble passion for this rudimentary form of war against the whole of the
present social system which is based upon robbery and oppression. And in
the overwhelming majority of cases these “leaflets” were in truth a
declaration of war, because the exposures served greatly to agitate the
workers; they evoked among them common demands for the removal of the
most glaring outrages and roused in them a readiness to support the
demands with strikes. Finally, the employers themselves were compelled
to recognise the significance of these leaflets as a declaration of war,
so much so that in a large number of cases they did not even wait for
the outbreak of hostilities. As is always the case, the mere publication
of these exposures made them effective, and they acquired the
significance of a strong moral influence. On more than one occasion, the
mere appearance of a leaflet proved sufficient to secure the
satisfaction of all or part of the demands put forward. In a word,
economic (factory) exposures were and remain an important lever in the
economic struggle. And they will continue to retain this significance as
long as there is capitalism, which makes it necessary for the workers to
defend themselves. Even in the most advanced countries of Europe it can
still be seen that the exposure of abuses in some backward trade, or in
some forgotten branch of domestic industry, serves as a starting-point
for the awakening of class-consciousness, for the beginning of a trade
union struggle, and for the spread of socialism.^(⁶⁵)

 

The overwhelming majority of Russian Social-Democrats have of late been
almost entirely absorbed by this work of organising the exposure of
factory conditions. Suffice it to recall Rabochaya Mysl to see the
extent to which they have been absorbed by it — so much so, indeed, that
they have lost sight of the fact that this, taken by itself, is in
essence still not Social-Democratic work, but merely trade union work.
As a matter of fact, the exposures merely dealt with the relations
between the workers in a given trade and their employers, and all they
achieved was that the sellers of labour power learned to sell their
“commodity” on better terms and to fight the purchasers over a purely
commercial deal. These exposures could have served (if properly utilised
by an organisation of revolutionaries) as a beginning and a component
part of Social-Democratic activity; but they could also have led (and,
given a worshipful attitude towards spontaneity, were bound to lead) to
a “purely trade union” struggle and to a non-Social-Democratic
working-class movement. Social-Democracy leads the struggle of the
working class, not only for better terms for the sale of labour-power,
but for the abolition of the social system that compels the propertyless
to sell themselves to the rich. Social-Democracy represents the working
class, not in its relation to a given group of employers alone, but in
its relation to all classes of modern society and to the state as an
organised political force. Hence, it follows that not only must
Social-Democrats not confine themselves exclusively to the economic
struggle, but that they must not allow the organisation of economic
exposures to become the predominant part of their activities. We must
take up actively the political education of the working class and the
development of its political
consciousness. Now that Zarya and Iskra have made the first attack upon
Economism, “all are agreed” on this (although some agree only in words,
as we shall soon see).

 

The question arises, what should political education consist in? Can it
be confined to the propaganda of working-class hostility to the
autocracy? Of course not. It is not enough to explain to the workers
that they are politically oppressed (any more than it is to explain to
them that their interests are antagonistic to the interests of the
employers). Agitation must be conducted with regard to every concrete
example of this oppression (as we have begun to carry on agitation round
concrete examples of economic oppression). Inasmuch as this oppression
affects the most diverse classes of society, inasmuch as it manifests
itself in the most varied spheres of life and activity — vocational,
civic, personal, family, religious, scientific, etc., etc. — is it not
evident that we shall not be fulfilling our task of developing the
political consciousness of the workers if we do not undertake the
organisation of the political exposure of the autocracy in all its
aspects? In order to carry on agitation round concrete instances of
oppression, these instances must be exposed (as it is necessary to
expose factory abuses in order to carry on economic agitation).

 

One might think this to be clear enough. It turns out, however, that it
is only in words that “all” are agreed on the need to develop political
consciousness, in all its aspects. It turns out that Rabocheye Dyelo,
for example, far from tackling the task of organising (or making a start
in organising) comprehensive political exposure, is even trying to drag
Iskra, which has undertaken this task, away from it. Listen to the
following: “The political struggle of the working class is merely [it is
certainly not ‘merely’] the most developed, wide, and effective form of
economic struggle” (programme of Rabocheye Dyelo, published in issue No.
1, p. 3). “The Social-Democrats are now confronted with the task of
lending the economic struggle itself, as far as possible, a political
character” (Martynov, Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10, p. 42). “The economic
struggle is the most widely applicable means of drawing the masses into
active political struggle” (resolution adopted by the Conference of the
Union Abroad and “amendments” thereto, Two Conferences, pp. 11 and 17).
As the reader will observe, all these theses permeate Rabocheye
Dyelo from its very first number to the latest “Instructions to the
Editors”, and all of them evidently express a single view regarding
political agitation and struggle. Let us examine this view from the
standpoint of the opinion prevailing among all Economists, that
political agitation must follow economic agitation. Is it true that, in
general,^(⁶⁶) the economic struggle “is the most widely
applicable means” of drawing the masses into the political struggle? It
is entirely untrue. Any and every manifestation of police tyranny and
autocratic outrage, not only in connection with the economic struggle,
is not one whit less “widely applicable” as a means of “drawing in” the
masses. The rural superintendents and the flogging of peasants, the
corruption of the officials and the police treatment of the “common
people” in the cities, the fight against the famine-stricken and the
suppression of the popular striving towards enlightenment and knowledge,
the extortion of taxes and the persecution of the religious sects, the
humiliating treatment of soldiers and the barrack methods in the
treatment of the students and liberal intellectuals — do all these and a
thousand other similar manifestations of tyranny, though not directly
connected with the “economic” struggle, represent, in
general, less “widely applicable” means and occasions for political
agitation and for drawing the masses into the political struggle? The
very opposite is true. Of the sum total of cases in which the workers
suffer (either on their own account or on account of those closely
connected with them) from tyranny, violence, and the lack of rights,
undoubtedly only a small minority represent cases of police tyranny in
the trade union struggle as such. Why then should we, beforehand,
restrict the scope of political agitation by declaring only one of the
means to be “the most widely applicable”, when Social-Democrats must
have, in addition, other, generally speaking, no less “widely
applicable” means?

 

In the dim and distant past (a full year ago! Rabocheye Dyelo wrote:
“The masses begin to understand immediate political demands after one
strike, or at all events, after several”, “as soon as the government
sets the police and gendarmerie against them” [August (No. 7) 1900, p.
15]. This opportunist theory of stages has now been rejected by the
Union Abroad, which makes a concession to us by declaring: “There is no
need whatever to conduct political agitation right from the beginning,
exclusively on an economic basis” (Two Conferences, p. 11). The Union’s
repudiation of part of its former errors will show the future historian
of Russian Social-Democracy better than any number of lengthy arguments
the depths to which our Economists have degraded socialism! But the
Union Abroad must be very naive indeed to imagine that the abandonment
of one form of restricting politics will induce us to agree to another
form. Would it not be more logical to say, in this case too, that the
economic struggle should be conducted on the widest possible basis, that
it should always be utilised for political agitation, but that “there is
no need whatever” to regard the economic struggle as the most widely
applicable means of drawing the masses into active political struggle?

 

The Union Abroad attaches significance to the fact that it has
substituted the phrase “most widely applicable means” for the phrase
“the best means” contained in one of the resolutions of the Fourth
Congress of the Jewish Workers’ Union (Bund). We confess that we find it
difficult to say which of these resolutions is the better one. In our
opinion they are both worse. Both the Union Abroad and the Bund fall
into the error (partly, perhaps unconsciously, under the influence of
tradition) of giving an Economist, trade-unionist interpretation to
politics. Whether this is done by employing the word “best” or the words
“most widely applicable” makes no essential difference whatever. Had the
Union Abroad said that “political agitation on an economic basis” is the
most widely applied (not “applicable”) means, it would have been right
in regard to a certain period in the development of our
Social-Democratic movement. It would have been right in regard to
the Economists and to many (if not the majority) of the practical
workers of 1898-1901; for these practical Economists applied political
agitation (to the extent that they applied it at all) almost exclusively
on an economic basis. Political agitation on such lines was recognised
and, as we have seen, even recommended by Rabochaya Mysl and the
Self-Emancipation Group. Rabocheye Dyelo should have strongly
condemned the fact that the useful work of economic agitation was
accompanied by the harmful restriction of the political struggle;
instead, it declares the means most widely applied (by the
Economists) to be the most widely applicable! It is not surprising that
when we call these people Economists, they can do nothing but pour every
manner of abuse upon us; call us “mystifiers”, “disrupters”, “papal
nuncios”, and “slanderers”^(⁶⁷) go complaining to the whole world that
we have mortally offended them; and declare almost on oath that “not a
single Social-Democratic organisation is now tinged with
Economism”.^(⁶⁸) Oh, those evil, slanderous politicians! They must have
deliberately invented this Economism, out of sheer hatred of mankind, in
order mortally to offend other people.

 

What concrete, real meaning attaches to Martynov’s words when he sets
before Social-Democracy the task of “lending the economic struggle
itself a political character”? The economic struggle is the collective
struggle of the workers against their employers for better terms in the
sale of their labour-power, for better living and working conditions.
This struggle is necessarily a trade union struggle, because working
conditions differ greatly in different trades, and, consequently, the
struggle to improve them can only be conducted on the basis of trade
organisations (in the Western countries, through trade unions; in
Russia, through temporary trade associations and through leaflets,
etc.). Lending “the economic struggle itself a political character”
means, therefore, striving to secure satisfaction of these trade
demands, the improvement of working conditions in each separate trade by
means of “legislative and administrative measures” (as Martynov puts it
on the ensuing page of his article, p. 43). This is precisely what all
workers’ trade unions do and always have done. Read the works of the
soundly scientific (and “soundly” opportunist) Mr. and Mrs. Webb and you
will see that the British trade unions long ago recognised, and have
long been carrying out, the task of “lending the economic struggle
itself a political character”; they have long been fighting for the
right to strike, for the removal of all legal hindrances to the
co-operative and trade union movements, for laws to protect women and
children, for the improvement of labour conditions by means of health
and factory legislation, etc.

 

Thus, the pompous phrase about “lending the economic struggle itself a
political character”, which sounds so “terrifically” profound and
revolutionary, serves as a screen to conceal what is in fact the
traditional striving to degrade Social-Democratic politics to the level
of trade union politics. Under the guise of rectifying the one-sidedness
of Iskra, which, it is alleged, places “the revolutionising of dogma
higher than the revolutionising of life”,^(⁶⁹)  we are presented with
the struggle for economic reforms as if it were something entirely new.
In point of fact, the phrase “lending the economic struggle itself a
political character” means nothing more than the struggle for economic
reforms. Martynov himself might have come to this simple conclusion, had
he pondered over the significance of his own words. “Our Party,” he
says, training his heaviest guns on Iskra, “could and should have
presented concrete demands to the government for legislative and
administrative measures against economic exploitation, unemployment,
famine, etc.” (Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10, pp. 42-43). Concrete demands for
measures — does not this mean demands for social reforms? Again we ask
the impartial reader: Are we slandering the Rabocheye Dyelo-ites (may I
be forgiven for this awkward, currently used designation!) by calling
them concealed Bernsteinians when, as their point of disagreement with
Iskra, they advance their thesis on the necessity of struggling for
economic reforms?

 

Revolutionary Social-Democracy has always included the struggle for
reforms as part of its activities. But it utilises “economic” agitation
for the purpose of presenting to the government, not only demands for
all sorts of measures, but also (and primarily) the demand that it cease
to be an autocratic government. Moreover, it considers it its duty to
present this demand to the government on the basis, not of the economic
struggle alone, but of all manifestations in general of public and
political life. In a word, it subordinates the struggle for reforms, as
the part to the whole, to the revolutionary struggle for freedom and for
socialism. Martynov, however, resuscitates the theory of stages in a new
form and strives to prescribe, as it were, an exclusively economic path
of development for the political struggle. By advancing at this moment,
when the revolutionary movement is on the upgrade, an alleged special
“task” of struggling for reforms, he is dragging the Party backwards and
is playing into the hands of both “Economist” and liberal opportunism.

 

To proceed. Shamefacedly hiding the struggle for reforms behind the
pompous thesis of “lending the economic struggle itself a political
character”, Martynov advanced, as if it were a special
point, exclusively economic (indeed, exclusively factory) reforms. As to
the reason for his doing that, we do not know it. Carelessness, perhaps?
Yet if he had in mind something else besides “factory” reforms, then the
whole of his thesis, which we have cited, loses all sense. Perhaps he
did it because he considers it possible and probable that the government
will make “concessions” only in the economic sphere?^(⁷⁰) If so, then it
is a strange delusion. Concessions are also possible and are made in the
sphere of legislation concerning flogging, passports, land redemption
payments, religious sects, the censorship, etc., etc. “Economic”
concessions (or pseudo-concessions) are, of course, the cheapest and
most advantageous from the government’s point of view, because by these
means it hopes to win the confidence of the working masses. For this
very reason, we Social-Democrats must not under any circumstances or in
any way whatever create grounds for the belief (or the misunderstanding)
that we attach greater value to economic reforms, or that we regard them
as being particularly important, etc. “Such demands,” writes Martynov,
speaking of the concrete demands for legislative and administrative
measures referred to above, “would not be merely a hollow sound,
because, promising certain palpable results, they might be actively
supported by the working masses....” We are not Economists, oh no! We
only cringe as slavishly before the “palpableness” of concrete results
as do the Bernsteins, the Prokopoviches, the Struves, the R.M.s,
and tutti quanti! We only wish to make it understood (together with
Nartsis Tuporylov) that all which “does not promise palpable results” is
merely a “hollow sound”! We are only trying to argue as if the working
masses were incapable (and had not already proved their capabilities,
notwithstanding those who ascribe their own philistinism to them) of
actively supporting every protest against the autocracy, even if
it promises absolutely no palpable results whatever!

 

Let us take, for example, the very “measures” for the relief of
unemployment and the famine that Martynov himself advances. Rabocheye
Dyelo is engaged, judging by what it has promised, in drawing up and
elaborating a programme of “concrete [in the form of bills?] demands for
legislative and administrative measures”, “promising palpable results”,
while Iskra, which “constantly places the revolutionising of dogma
higher than the revolutionising of life”, has tried to explain the
inseparable connection between unemployment and the whole capitalist
system, has given warning that “famine is coming”, has exposed the
police “fight against the famine-stricken”, and the outrageous
“provisional penal servitude regulations”; and Zarya has published a
special reprint, in the form of an agitational pamphlet, of a section of
its “Review of Home Affairs”, dealing with the famine.^(⁷¹) But good
God! How “onesided” were these incorrigibly narrow and orthodox
doctrinaires, how deaf to the calls of “life itself”! Their articles
contained — oh horror! — not a single, can you imagine it? Not a single
“concrete demand” “promising palpable results”! Poor doctrinaires! They
ought to be sent to Krichevsky and Martynov to be taught that tactics
are a process of growth, of that which grows, etc., and that the
economic struggle itselfshould be given a political character!

 

“In addition to its immediate revolutionary significance, the economic
struggle of the workers against the employers and the government
[“economic struggle against the government”!] has also this
significance: it constantly brings home to the workers the fact that
they have no political rights” (Martynov, p. 44). We quote this passage,
not in order to repeat for the hundredth and thousandth time what has
been said above, but in order to express particular thanks to Martynov
for this excellent new formula: “the economic struggle of the workers
against the employers and the government”. What a gem! With what
inimitable skill and mastery in eliminating all partial disagreements
and shades of differences among Economists this clear and concise
proposition expresses the quintessence of Economism, from summoning the
workers “to the political struggle, which they carry on in the general
interest, for the improvement of the conditions of all the
workers”,^(⁷²) continuing through the theory of stages, and ending in
the resolution of the Conference on the “most widely applicable”, etc.
“Economic struggle against the government” is precisely trade-unionist
politics, which is still very far from being Social-Democratic politics.

 


3.2 How Martynov Rendered Plekhanov More Profound

 

“What a large number of Social-Democratic Lomonosovs have appeared among
us lately!” observed a comrade one day, having in mind the astonishing
propensity of many who are inclined toward Economism to, arrive,
“necessarily, by their own under standing”, at great truths (e.g., that
the economic struggle stimulates the workers to ponder over their lack
of rights) and in doing so to ignore, with the supreme contempt of born
geniuses, all that has been produced by the antecedent development of
revolutionary thought and of the revolutionary movement.
Lomonosov-Martynov is precisely such a born genius. We need but glance
at his article “Urgent Questions” to see how by “his own understanding”
he _arrives at_ what was long ago said by Axelrod (of whom our
Lomonosov, naturally, says not a word); how, for instance, he
is _beginning_ to understand that we cannot ignore the opposition of
such or such strata of the bourgeoisie (_Rabocheye Dyelo_, No. 9, pp.
61, 62, 71; compare this with Rabocheye Dyelo’s Reply to Axelrod, pp.
22, 23-24), etc. But alas, he is only “arriving” and is only
“beginning”, not more than that, for so little has he understood
Axelrod’s ideas, that he talks about “the economic struggle against the
employers and the government”. For three years (1898-1901) _Rabocheye
Dyelo_ has tried hard to understand Axelrod, but has so far not
understood him! Can one of the reasons be that Social-Democracy, “like
mankind”, always sets itself only tasks that can be achieved?

 

But the Lomonosovs are distinguished not only by their ignorance of many
things (that would be but half misfortune!), but also by their
unawareness of their own ignorance. Now this is a real misfortune; and
it is this misfortune that prompts them without further ado to attempt
to render Plekhanov “more profound”.

 

“Much water,” Lomonosov-Martynov says, “has flowed under the bridge
since Plekhanov wrote his book (Tasks of the Socialists in the Fight
Against the Famine in Russia). The Social-Democrats who for a decade led
the economic struggle of the working class ... have failed as yet to lay
down a broad theoretical basis for Party tactics. This question has now
come to a head, and if we should wish to lay down such a theoretical
basis, we should certainly have to deepen considerably the principles of
tactics developed at one time by Plekhanov.... Our present definition of
the distinction between propaganda and agitation would have to be
different from Plekhanov’s (Martynov has just quoted PIekhanov’s words:
“A propagandist presents many ideas to one or a few persons; an agitator
presents only one or a few ideas, but he presents them to a mass of
people.”) By propaganda we would understand the revolutionary
explanation of the present social system, entire or in its partial
manifestations, whether that be done in a form intelligible to
individuals or to broad masses. By agitation, in the strict sense of the
word (sic!), we would understand the call upon the masses to undertake
definite, concrete actions and the promotion of the direct revolutionary
intervention of the proletariat in social life.”

 

We congratulate Russian-and international-Social-Democracy on having
found, thanks to Martynov, a new terminology, more strict and more
profound. Hitherto we thought (with Plekhanov, and with all the leaders
of the international working class movement) that the propagandist,
dealing with, say, the question of unemployment, must explain the
capitalistic nature of crises, the cause of their inevitability in
modern society, the necessity for the transformation of this society
into a socialist society, etc. In a word, he must present “many ideas”,
so many, indeed, that they will be understood as an integral whole only
by a (comparatively) few persons. The agitator, however, speaking on the
same subject, will take as an illustration a fact that is most glaring
and most widely known to his audience, say, the death of an unemployed
worker’s family from starvation, the growing impoverishment, etc., and,
utilising this fact, known to all, will direct his efforts to presenting
a single idea to the “masses”, e.g., the senselessness of the
contradiction between the increase of wealth and the increase of
poverty; he will strive to rouse discontent and indignation among the
masses against this crying injustice, leaving a more complete
explanation of this contradiction to the propagandist. Consequently, the
propagandist operates chiefly by means of the printed word; the agitator
by means of the spoken word. The propagandist requires qualities
different from those of the agitator. Kautsky and Lafargue, for example,
we term propagandists; Bebel and Guesde we term agitators. To single out
a third sphere, or third function, of practical activity, and to include
in this function “the call upon the masses to undertake definite
concrete actions”, is sheer nonsense, because the “call”, as a single
act, either naturally and inevitably supplements the theoretical
treatise, propagandist pamphlet, and agitational speech, or represents a
purely executive function. Let us take, for example, the struggle the
German Social-Democrats are now waging against the corn duties. The
theoreticians write research works on tariff policy, with the “call”,
say, to struggle for commercial treaties and for Free Trade. The
propagandist does the same thing in the periodical press, and the
agitator in public speeches. At the present time, the “concrete action”
of the masses takes the form of signing petitions to the Reichstag
against raising the corn duties. The call for this action comes
indirectly from the theoreticians, the propagandists, and the agitators,
and, directly, from the workers who take the petition lists to the
factories and to private homes for the gathering of signatures.
According to the “Martynov terminology”, Kautsky and Bebel are both
propagandists, while those who solicit the signatures are agitators.
Isn’t it clear?

 

The German example recalled to my mind the German word which, literally
translated, means “Ballhorning”. Johann Ballhorn, a Leipzig publisher of
the sixteenth century, published a child’s reader in which, as was the
custom, he introduced a drawing of a cock, but a cock without spurs and
with a couple of eggs lying near it. On the cover he printed the legend,
“Revised edition by Johann Ballhorn”. Ever since then, the Germans
describe any “revision” that is really a worsening as “ballhorning”. And
one cannot help recalling Ballhorn upon seeing how the Martynovs try to
render Plekhanov “more profound”.

 

Why did our Lomonosov “invent” this confusion? In order to illustrate
how Iskra “devotes attention only to one side of the case, just as
Pleklianov did a decade and a half ago” (39). “WithIskra, propagandist
tasks force agitational tasks into the background, at least for the
present” (52). If we translate this last proposition from the language
of Martynov into ordinary human language (because mankind has not yet
managed to learn the newly-invented terminology), we shall get the
following: with Iskra, the tasks of political propaganda and political
agitation force into the background the task of “presenting to the
government concrete demands for legislative and administrative measures”
that “promise certain palpable results” (or demands for social reforms,
that is, if we are permitted once again to employ the old terminology of
the old mankind not yet grown to Martynov’s level). We suggest that the
reader compare this thesis with the following tirade:

 

“What also astonishes us in these programmes [the programmes advanced by
revolutionary Social-Democrats] is their constant stress upon the
benefits of workers’ activity in parliament (non-existent in Russia),
though they completely ignore (thanks to their revolutionary nihilism)
the importance of workers’ participation in the legislative
manufacturers’ assemblies on factory affairs [which do exist in Russia]
... or at least the importance of workers’ participation in municipal
bodies....”

 

The author of this tirade expresses in a somewhat more forthright and
clearer manner the very idea which Lomonosov-Martynov discovered by his
own understanding. The author is R. M., in the “Separate Supplement” to
Rabochaya Mysl (p. 15).

 


3.3 Political Exposures and “Training in Revolutionary Activity”

 

In advancing against _Iskra_ his theory of “raising the activity of the
working masses”, Martynov actually betrayed an urge _to belittle_ that
activity, for he declared the very economic struggle before which all
economists grovel to be the preferable, particularly important, and
“most widely applicable” means of rousing this activity and its broadest
field. This error is characteristic, precisely in that it is by no means
peculiar to Martynov. In reality, it is possible to “raise the activity
of the working masses” _only_ when this activity _is not restricted_ to
“political agitation on an economic basis”. A basic condition for the
necessary expansion of political agitation is the organisation
of _comprehensive_ political exposure. _In no way_ except by means of
such exposures _can_ the masses be trained in political consciousness
and revolutionary activity. Hence, activity of this kind is one of the
most important functions of international Social-Democracy as a whole,
for even political freedom does not in any way eliminate exposures; it
merely shifts somewhat their sphere of direction. Thus, the German party
is especially strengthening its positions and spreading its influence,
thanks particularly to the untiring energy with which it is conducting
its campaign of political exposure. Working-class consciousness cannot
be genuine political consciousness unless the workers are trained to
respond to _all_ cases of tyranny, oppression, violence, and abuse, no
matter _what class_ is affected — unless they are trained, moreover, to
respond from a Social-Democratic point of view and no other. The
consciousness of the working masses cannot be genuine
class-consciousness, unless the workers learn, from concrete, and above
all from topical, political facts and events to observe _every_ other
social class in _all_ the manifestations of its intellectual, ethical,
and political life; unless they learn to apply in practice the
materialist analysis and the materialist estimate of _all_ aspects of
the life and activity of _all_ classes, strata, and groups of the
population. Those who concentrate the attention, observation, and
consciousness of the working class exclusively, or even mainly, upon
itself alone are not Social-Democrats; for the self-knowledge of the
working class is indissolubly bound up, not solely with a fully clear
theoretical understanding — or rather, not so much with the theoretical,
as with the practical, understanding — of the relationships
between _all_ the various classes of modern society, acquired through
the experience of political life. For this reason the conception of the
economic struggle as the most widely applicable means of drawing the
masses into the political movement, which our Economists preach, is so
extremely harmful and reactionary in its practical significance. In
order to become a Social-Democrat, the worker must have a clear picture
in his mind of the economic nature and the social and political features
of the landlord and the priest, the high state official and the peasant,
the student and the vagabond; he must know their strong and weak points;
he must grasp the meaning of all the catchwords and sophisms by which
each class and each stratum _camouflages_ its selfish strivings and its
real “inner workings”; he must understand what interests are reflected
by certain institutions and certain laws and how they are reflected. But
this “clear picture” cannot be obtained from any book. It can be
obtained only from living examples and from exposures that follow close
upon what is going on about us at a given moment; upon what is being
discussed, in whispers perhaps, by each one in his own way; upon what
finds expression in such and such events, in such and such statistics,
in such and such court sentences, etc., etc. These comprehensive
political exposures are an essential and _fundamental_ condition for
training the masses in revolutionary activity.

 

Why do the Russian workers still manifest little revolutionary activity
in response to the brutal treatment of the people by the police, the
persecution of religious sects, the flogging of peasants, the outrageous
censorship, the torture of soldiers, the persecution of the most
innocent cultural undertakings, etc.? Is it because the “economic
struggle” does not “stimulate” them to this, because such activity does
not “promise palpable results”, because it produces little that is
“positive”? To adopt such an opinion, we repeat, is merely to direct the
charge where it does not belong, to blame the working masses for one’s
own philistinism (or Bernsteinism). We must blame ourselves, our lagging
behind the mass movement, for still being unable to
organise sufficiently wide, striking, and rapid exposures of all the
shameful outrages. When we do that (and we must and can do it), the most
backward worker will understand, _or will feel_, that the students and
religious sects, the peasants and the authors are being abused and
outraged by those same dark forces that are oppressing and crushing him
at every step of his life. Feeling that, he himself will be filled with
an irresistible desire to react, and he will know how to hoot the
censors one day, on another day to demonstrate outside the house of a
governor who has brutally suppressed a peasant uprising, on still
another day to teach a lesson to the gendarmes in surplices who are
doing the work of the Holy Inquisition, etc. As yet we have done very
little, almost nothing, _to bring_before the working masses prompt
exposures on all possible issues. Many of us as yet do not recognise
this as our _bounden duty_ but trail spontaneously in the wake of the
“drab everyday struggle”, in the narrow confines of factory life. Under
such circumstances to say that “_Iskra_ displays a tendency to minimise
the significance of the forward march of the drab everyday struggle in
comparison with the propaganda of brilliant and complete ideas”
(Martynov, op. cit., p. 61), means to drag the Party back, to defend and
glorify our unpreparedness and backwardness.

 

As for calling the masses to action, that will come of itself as soon as
energetic political agitation, live and striking exposures come into
play. To catch some criminal red-handed and immediately to brand him
publicly in all places is of itself far more effective than any number
of “calls”; the effect very often is such as will make it impossible to
tell exactly who it was that “called” upon the masses and who suggested
this or that plan of demonstration, etc. Calls for action, not in the
general, but in the concrete, sense of the term can be made only at the
place of action; only those who themselves go into action, and do so
immediately, can sound such calls. Our business as Social-Democratic
publicists is to deepen, expand, and intensify political exposures and
political agitation.

 

A word in passing about “calls to action”. The only
newspaper which prior to the spring events called upon the workers to
intervene actively in a matter that certainly did not promise any
palpable results whatever for the workers, i.e., the drafting of the
students into the army, was Iskra. Immediately after the publication of
the order of January 11, on “drafting the 183 students into the
army”, Iskra published an article on the matter (in its February issue,
No. 2),^(⁷³) and, before any demonstration was begun, forthwith called
upon “the workers to go to the aid of the students”, called upon the
“people” openly to take up the government’s arrogant challenge. We ask:
how is the remarkable fact to be explained that although Martynov talks
so much about “calls to action”, and even suggests “calls to action” as
a special form of activity, he said not a word about this call? After
this, was it not sheer philistinism on Martynov’s part to allege
that Iskra was one-sided because it did not issue sufficient “calls” to
struggle for demands “promising palpable results”?

 

Our Economists, including Rabocheye Dyelo, were successful because they
adapted themselves to the backward workers. But the Social-Democratic
worker, the revolutionary worker (and the number of such workers is
growing) will indignantly reject all this talk about struggle for
demands “promising palpable results”, etc., because he will understand
that this is only a variation of the old song about adding a kopek to
the ruble. Such a worker will say to his counsellors from Rabochaya
Mysl and Rabocheye Dyelo: you are busying yourselves in vain, gentlemen,
and shirking your proper duties, by meddling with such excessive zeal in
a job that we can very well manage ourselves. There is nothing clever in
your assertion that the Social-Democrats’ task is to lend the economic
struggle itself a political character; that is only the beginning, it is
not the main task of the Social-Democrats. For all over the world,
including Russia, the police themselves often take the initiative in
lending the economic struggle a political character, and the workers
themselves learn to understand whom the government supports.^(⁷⁴) The
“economic struggle of the workers against the employers and
the government”, about which you make as much fuss as if you had
discovered a new America, is being waged in all parts of Russia, even
the most remote, by the workers themselves who have heard about strikes,
but who have heard almost nothing about socialism. The “activity” you
want to stimulate among us workers, by advancing concrete demands that
promise palpable results, we are already displaying and in our everyday,
limited trade union work we put forward these concrete demands, very
often without any assistance whatever from the intellectuals.
But such activity is not enough for us; we are not children to be fed on
the thin gruel of “economic” politics alone; we want to know everything
that others know, we want to learn the details of all aspects of
political life and to take part actively in every single political
event. In order that we may do this, the intellectuals must talk to us
less of what we already know.^(⁷⁵) And tell us more about what we do not
yet know and what we can never learn from our factory and “economic”
experience, namely, political knowledge. You intellectuals can acquire
this knowledge, and it is your duty to bring it to us in a hundred- and
a thousand-fold greater measure than you have done up to now; and you
must bring it to us, not only in the form of discussions, pamphlets, and
articles (which very often — pardon our frankness — are rather dull),
but precisely in the form of vivid exposures of what our government and
our governing classes are doing at this very moment in all spheres of
life. Devote more zeal to carrying out this duty and talk less about
“raising the activity of the working masses”. We are far more active
than you think, and we are quite able to support, by open street
fighting, even demands that do not promise any “palpable results”
whatever. It is not for you to “raise” our activity, because activity is
precisely the thing you yourselves lack. Bow less in subservience to
spontaneity, and think more about raising your own activity, gentlemen!

 


3.4 What is There in Common Between Economism and Terrorism

 

In the last footnote we cited the opinion of an Economist and of a
non-Social -Democratic terrorist, who showed themselves to be
accidentally in agreement. Speaking generally, however, there is not an
accidental, but a necessary, inherent connection between the two, of
which we shall have need to speak later, and which must be mentioned
here in connection with the question of education for revolutionary
activity. The Economists and the root, namely, subservience to
spontaneity, with which we dealt in the preceding chapter as a general
phenomenon and which we shall now examine in relation to its effect upon
political activity and the political struggle. At first sight, our
assertion may appear paradoxical, so great is the difference between
those who stress the “drab everyday struggle” and those who call for the
most self-sacrificing struggle of individuals. But this is no paradox.
The Economists and the terrorists merely bow to different poles of
spontaneity; the Economists bow to the spontaneity of “the labour
movement pure and simple”, while the terrorists bow to the spontaneity
of the passionate indignation of intellectuals, who lack the ability or
opportunity to connect the revolutionary struggle and the working-class
movement into an integral whole. It is difficult indeed for those who
have lost their belief, or who have never believed, that this is
possible, to find some outlet for their indignation and revolutionary
energy other than terror. Thus, both forms of subservience to
spontaneity we have mentioned are nothing but the beginning of the
implementation of the notorious Credo programme: Let the workers wage
their “economic struggle against the employers and the government” (we
apologise to the author of the Credo for expressing her views in
Martynov’s words. We think we have a right to do so since the Credo,
too, says that in the economic struggle the workers "come up against the
political regime and let the intellectuals conduct the political
struggle by their own efforts — with the aid of terror, of course! This
is an absolutely logical and inevitableconclusion which must be insisted
on — even though those who are beginning to carry out this programme do
not themselves realise that it is inevitable. Political activity has its
logic quite apart from the consciousness of those who, with the best
intentions, call either for terror or for lending the economic struggle
itself a political character. The road to hell is paved with good
intentions, and, in this case, good intentions cannot save one from
being spontaneously drawn “along the line of least resistance”, along
the line of the purely bourgeois Credo programme. Surely it is no
accident either that many Russian liberals — avowed liberals and
liberals that wear the mask of Marxism — whole-heartedly sympathise with
terror and try to foster the terrorist moods that have surged up in the
present time.

 

The formation of the Revolutionary-Socialist Svoboda Group which set
itself the aim of helping the working-class movement in every possible
way, but which included in its programme terror, and emancipation, so to
speak, from Social-Democracy — once again confirmed the remarkable
perspicacity of P. B. Axelrod, who literally foretold these results of
Social-Democratic waverings as far back as the end of 1897 (Present
Tasks and Tactics), when he outlined his famous “two perspectives”. All
the subsequent disputes and disagreements among Russian Social-Democrats
are contained, like a plant in the seed, in these two perspectives.^(⁷⁶)

From this point of view it also becomes clear why Rabocheye Dyelo,
unable to withstand the spontaneity of Economism, has likewise been
unable to withstand the spontaneity of terrorism. It is highly
interesting to note here the specific arguments that Svoboda has
advanced in defence of terrorism. It “completely denies” the deterrent
role of terrorism (The Regeneration of Revolutionism, p. 64), but
instead stresses its “excitative significance”. This is characteristic,
first, as representing one of the stages of the breakup and decline of
the traditional (pre-Social-Democratic) cycle of ideas which insisted
upon terrorism. The admission that the government cannot now be
“terrified” and hence disrupted, by terror, is tantamount to a complete
condemnation of terror as a system of struggle, as a sphere of activity
sanctioned by the programme. Secondly, it is still more characteristic
as an example of the failure to understand our immediate tasks in regard
to “education for revolutionary activity”. Svoboda advocates terror as a
means of “exciting” the working-class movement and of giving it a
“strong impetus”. It is difficult to imagine an argument that more
thoroughly disproves itself. Are there not enough outrages committed in
Russian life without special “excitants” having to be invented? On the
other hand, is it not obvious that those who are not, and cannot be,
roused to excitement even by Russian tyranny will stand by “twiddling
their thumbs” and watch a handful of terrorists engaged in single combat
with the government? The fact is that the working masses are roused to a
high pitch of excitement by the social evils in Russian life, but we are
unable to gather, if one may so put it, and concentrate all these drops
and streamlets of popular resentment that are brought forth to a far
larger extent than we imagine by the conditions of Russian life, and
that must be combined into a single gigantic torrent. That this can be
accomplished is irrefutably proved by the enormous growth of the
working-class movement and the eagerness, noted above, with which the
workers clamour for political literature. On the other hand, calls for
terror and calls to lend the economic struggle itself a political
character are merely two different forms of evading the most pressing
duty now resting upon Russian revolutionaries, namely, the organisation
of comprehensive political agitation. Svoboda desires
to substitute terror for agitation, openly admitting that “as soon as
intensified and strenuous agitation is begun among the masses the
excitative function of terror will be ended” (The Regeneration of
Revolutionism, p. 68). This proves precisely that both the terrorists
and the Economists underestimate the revolutionary activity of the
masses, despite the striking evidence of the events that took place in
the spring,^(⁷⁷) and whereas the one group goes out in search of
artificial “excitants”, the other talks about “concrete demands”. But
both fail to devote sufficient attention to the development of their own
activity in political agitation and in the organisation of political
exposures. And no other work can serve as a substitute for this task
either at the present time or at any other.

 


3.5 The Working Class as Vanguard Fighter for Democracy

 

We have seen that the conduct of the broadest political agitation and,
consequently, of all-sided political exposures is an absolutely
necessary and a _paramount_ task of our activity, if this activity is to
be truly Social-Democratic. However, we arrived at this conclusion
solely on the grounds of the pressing needs of the working class for
political knowledge and political training. But such a presentation of
the question is too narrow, for it ignores the general democratic tasks
of Social-Democracy, in particular of present-day Russian
Social-Democracy. In order to explain the point more concretely we shall
approach the subject from an aspect that is “nearest” to the Economist,
namely, from the practical aspect. “Everyone agrees” that it is
necessary to develop the political consciousness of the working class.
The question is, _how_ that is to be done and what is required to do it.
The economic struggle merely “impels” the workers to realise the
government’s attitude towards the working class. Consequently, _however
much we may try_ to “lend the economic, struggle itself a political
character”, _we shall never be able_ to develop the political
consciousness of the workers (to the level of Social-Democratic
political consciousness) by keeping within the framework of the economic
struggle, for _that framework is too narrow._ The Martynov formula has
some value for us, not because it illustrates Martynov’s aptitude for
confusing things, but because it pointedly expresses the basic error
that all the Economists commit, namely, their conviction that it is
possible to develop the class political consciousness of the
workers _from within_, so to speak, from their economic struggle, i.e.,
by making this struggle the exclusive (or, at least, the main)
starting-point, by making it the exclusive (or, at least, the main)
basis. Such a view is radically wrong. Piqued by our polemics against
them, the Economists refuse to ponder deeply over the origins of these
disagreements, with the result that we simply cannot understand one
another. It is as if we spoke in different tongues.

 

Class political consciousness can be brought to the workers _only from
without_, that is, only from outside the economic struggle, from outside
the sphere of relations between workers and employers. The sphere from
which alone it is possible to obtain this knowledge is the sphere of
relationships of _all_ classes and strata to the state and the
government, the sphere of the interrelations between _all_ classes. For
that reason, the reply to the question as to what must be done to bring
political knowledge to the workers cannot be merely the answer with
which, in the majority of cases, the practical workers, especially those
inclined towards Economism, mostly content themselves, namely: “To go
among the workers.” To bring political knowledge to the _workers_ the
Social Democrats must _go among all classes of the population_; they
must dispatch units of their army _in all directions_.

 

We deliberately select this blunt formula, we deliberately express
ourselves in this sharply simplified manner, not because we desire to
indulge in paradoxes, but in order to “impel” the Economists to a
realisation of their tasks which they unpardonably ignore, to suggest to
them strongly the difference between trade-unionist and
Social-Democratic politics, which they refuse to understand. We
therefore beg the reader not to get wrought up, but to hear us patiently
to the end.

 

Let us take the type of Social-Democratic study circle that has become
most widespread in the past few years and examine its work. It has
“contacts with the workers” and rests content with this, issuing
leaflets in which abuses in the factories, the government’s partiality
towards the capitalists, and the tyranny of the police are strongly
condemned. At workers’ meetings the discussions never, or rarely ever,
go beyond the limits of these subjects. Extremely rare are the lectures
and discussions held on the history of the revolutionary movement, on
questions of the government’s home and foreign policy, on questions of
the economic evolution of Russia and of Europe, on the position of the
various classes in modern society, etc. As to systematically acquiring
and extending contact with other classes of society, no one even dreams
of that. In fact, the ideal leader, as the majority of the members of
such circles picture him, is something far more in the nature of a trade
union secretary than a socialist political leader. For the secretary of
any, say English, trade union always helps the workers to carry on the
economic struggle, he helps them to expose factory abuses, explains the
injustice of the laws and of measures that hamper the freedom to strike
and to picket (i. e., to warn all and sundry that a strike is proceeding
at a certain factory), explains the partiality of arbitration court
judges who belong to the bourgeois classes, etc., etc. In a word, every
trade union secretary conducts and helps to conduct “the economic
struggle against the employers and the government”. It cannot be too
strongly maintained that _this is still not_ Social-Democracy, that the
Social-Democrat’s ideal should not be the trade union secretary,
but _the tribune of the people_, who is able to react to every
manifestation of tyranny and oppression, no matter where it appears, no
matter what stratum or class of the people it affects; who is able to
generalise all these manifestations and produce a single picture of
police violence and capitalist exploitation; who is able to take
advantage of every event, however small, in order to set forth _before
all_ his socialist convictions and his democratic demands, in order to
clarify for _all_ and everyone the world-historic significance of the
struggle for the emancipation of the proletariat. Compare, for example,
a leader like Robert Knight (the well-known secretary and leader of the
Boiler-Makers’ Society, one of the most powerful trade unions in
England), with Wilhelm Liebknecht, and try to apply to them the
contrasts that Martynov draws in his controversy with _Iskra_. You will
see — I am running through Martynov’s article — that Robert Knight
engaged more in “calling the masses to certain concrete actions”
(Martynov, op. cit., p. 39), while Willielin Liebknecht engaged more in
“the revolutionary elucidation of the whole of the present system or
partial manifestations of it” (38-39); that Robert Knight “formulated
the immediate demands of the proletariat and indicated the means by
which they can be achieved” (41), whereas Wilhelm Liebknecht, while
doing this, did not hold back from “simultaneously guiding the
activities of various opposition strata”, “dictating a positive
programme of action for them”^(⁷⁸) (41); that Robert Knight strove “as
far as possible to lend the economic struggle itself a political
character” (42) and was excellently able “to submit to the government
concrete demands promising certain palpable results” (43), whereas
Liebknecht engaged to a much greater degree in “one-sided” “exposures”
(40); that Robert Knight attached more significance to the “forward
march of the drab everyday struggle” (61), whereas Liebknecht attached
more significance to the “propaganda of brilliant and completed ideas”
(61); that Liebknecht converted the paper he was directing into “an
organ of revolutionary opposition that exposed the state of affairs in
our country, particularly the political state of affairs, insofar as it
affected the interests of the most varied strata of the population”
(63), whereas Robert Knight “worked for the cause of the working class
in close organic connection with the proletarian struggle” (63) — if by
“close and organic connection” is meant the subservience to spontaneity
which we examined above, by taking the examples of Krichevsky and
Martynov — and “restricted the sphere of his influence”, convinced, of
course, as is Martynov, that “by doing so he deepened that influence”
(63). In a word, you will see that _de facto_ Martynov reduces
Social-Democracy to the level of trade-unionism, though he does so, of
course, not because he does not desire the good of Social-Democracy, but
simply because he is a little too much in a hurry to render Plekhanov
more profound, instead of taking the trouble to understand him.

 

Let us return, however, to our theses. We said that a Social Democrat,
if he really believes it necessary to develop comprehensively the
political consciousness of the proletariat, must “go among all classes
of the population”. This gives rise to the questions: How is this to be
done? Have we enough forces to do this? Is there a basis for such work
among all the other classes? Will this not mean a retreat, or lead to a
retreat, from the class point of view? Let us deal with these questions.

 

We must “go among all classes of the population” as theoreticians, as
propagandists, as agitators, and as organisers. Nobody doubts that the
theoretical work of Social-Democrats should aim at studying all the
specific features of the social and political condition of the various
classes. But extremely little is done in this direction as compared with
the work that is done in studying the specific features of factory life.
In the committees and study circles, one can meet people who are
immersed in the study even of some special branch of the metal industry;
but one can hardly ever find members of organisations (obliged, as often
happens, for some reason or other to give up practical work) who are
especially engaged in gathering material on some pressing question of
social and political life in our country which could serve as a means
for conducting Social-Democratic work among other strata of the
population. In dwelling upon the fact that the majority of the
present-day leaders of the working-class movement lack training, we
cannot refrain from mentioning training in this respect also, for it too
is bound up with the Economist conception of “close organic connection
with the proletarian struggle”. The principal thing, of course,
is _propaganda_ and _agitation_ among all strata of the people. The work
of the West European Social-Democrat is in this respect facilitated by
the public meetings and rallies which _all_ are free to attend, and by
the fact that in parliament he addresses the representatives
of _all_ classes. We have neither a parliament nor freedom of assembly;
nevertheless, we are able to arrange meetings of workers who desire to
listen to _a Social-Democrat_. We must also find ways and means of
calling meetings of representatives of all social classes that desire to
listen to _a democrat_; for he is no Social-Democrat who forgets in
practice that “the Communists support every revolutionary movement”,
that we are obliged for that reason to expound and emphasise _general
democratic tasks before the whole people_, without for a moment
concealing our socialist convictions. He is no Social-Democrat who
forgets in practice his obligation to be _ahead of all_ in raising,
accentuating, and solving _every _general democratic question.

 

“But everyone agrees with this!” the impatient reader will exclaim, and
the new instructions adopted by the last conference of the Union Abroad
for the Editorial Board of _Rabocheye Dyelo_definitely say: “All events
of social and political life that affect the proletariat either directly
as a special class or as _the vanguard of all the revolutionary forces
in the struggle for freedom_ should serve as subjects for political
propaganda and agitation” (_Two Conferences_, p. 17, our italics). Yes,
these are very true and very good words, and we would be fully satisfied
if_Rabocheye Dyelo_ understood them _and if it refrained from saying in
the next breath things that contradict them_. For it is not enough to
call ourselves the “vanguard”, the advanced contingent; we must act in
such a way that all the other contingents recognise and are obliged to
admit that we are marching in the vanguard. And we ask the reader: Are
the representatives of the other “contingents” such fools as to take our
word for it when we say that we are the “vanguard”? just picture to
yourselves the following: a Social-Democrat comes to the “contingent” of
Russian educated radicals, or liberal constitutionalists, and says, We
are the vanguard; “the task confronting us now is, as far as possible,
to lend the economic struggle itself a political character”. The
radical, or constitutionalist, if he is at all intelligent (and there
are many intelligent men among Russian radicals and constitutionalists),
would only smile at such a speech and would say (to himself, of course,
for in the majority of cases he is an experienced diplomat): “Your
’vanguard’ must be made up of simpletons. They do not even understand
that it is our task, the task of the progressive representatives of
bourgeois democracy to lend the workers’ economic struggle _itself_ a
political character. Why, we too, like the West-European bourgeois, want
to draw the workers into politics, _but only into trade-unionist, not
into Social-Democratic politics._ Trade-unionist politics of the working
class is precisely _bourgeois politics_ of the working class, and this
‘vanguard’s’ formulation of its task is the formulation of
trade-unionist politics! Let them call themselves Social-Democrats to
their heart’s content, I am not a child to get excited over a label. But
they must not fall under the influence of those pernicious orthodox
doctrinaires, let them allow ’freedom of criticism’ to those who
unconsciously are driving Social-Democracy into trade-unionist
channels.”

 

And the faint smile of our constitutionalist will turn into Homeric
laughter when he learns that the Social-Democrats who talk of
Social-Democracy as the vanguard, today, when spontaneity almost
completely dominates our movement, fear nothing so much as “belittling
the spontaneous element”, as “underestimating the significance of the
forward movement of the drab everyday struggle, as compared with the
propaganda of brilliant and completed ideas”, etc., etc.! A “vanguard”
which fears that consciousness will outstrip spontaneity, which fears to
put forward a bold “plan” that would compel general recognition even
among those who differ with us. Are they not confusing “vanguard” with
“rearguard”?

 

Indeed, let us examine the following piece of reasoning by Martynov. On
page 40 he says that _Iskra_ is one-sided in its tactics of exposing
abuses, that “however much we may spread distrust and hatred of the
government, we shall not achieve our aim until we have succeeded in
developing sufficient active social energy for its overthrow”. This, it
may be said parenthetically, is the familiar solicitude for the
activation of the masses, with a simultaneous striving to restrict one’s
own activity. But that is not the main point at the moment. Martynov
speaks here, accordingly, of_revolutionary_ energy (“for overthrowing”).
And what conclusion does he arrive at? Since in ordinary times various
social strata inevitably march separately, “it is therefore, clear that
we Social-Democrats cannot simultaneously guide the activities of
various opposition strata, we cannot dictate to them a positive
programme of action, we cannot point out to them in what manner they
should wage a day-to-day struggle for their interests.... The liberal
strata will themselves take care of the active struggle for their
immediate interests, the struggle that will bring them face to face with
our political regime” (p. 41). Thus, having begun with talk about
revolutionary energy, about the active struggle for the overthrow of the
autocracy, Martynov immediately turns toward trade union energy and
active struggle for immediate interests! It goes without saying that we
cannot guide the struggle of the students, liberals, etc., for
their “immediate interests”; but this was not the point at issue, most
worthy Economist! The point we were discussing was the possible and
necessary participation of various social strata in the overthrow of the
autocracy; and not only are we_able_, but it is our bounden duty, to
guide _these_ “activities of the various opposition strata”, if we
desire to be the “vanguard”. Not only will our students and liberals,
etc., themselves take care of “the struggle that brings them face to
face with our political regime”; the police and the officials of the
autocratic government will see to this first and foremost. But if “we”
desire to be front-rank democrats, we must make it our concern
to _direct_ the thoughts of those who are dissatisfied only with
conditions at the university, or in the Zemstvo, etc., to the idea that
the entire political system is worthless. _We_ must take upon ourselves
the task of organising an all-round political struggle under the
leadership of our Party in such a manner as to make it possible for all
oppositional strata to render their fullest support to the struggle and
to our Party. _We_ must train our Social-Democratic practical workers to
become political leaders, able to guide all the manifestations of this
all-round struggle, able at the right time to “dictate a positive
programme of action” for the aroused students, the discontented Zemstvo
people, the incensed religious sects, the offended elementary
schoolteachers, etc., etc. For that reason, Martynov’s assertion that
“with regard to these, we can function _merely in the negative_ role of
exposers of abuses... we can only dissipate their hopes in various
government commissions” _is completely false_ (our italics). By saying
this, Martynov shows that he _absolutely fails to understand_ the role
that the revolutionary “vanguard” must really play. If the reader bears
this in mind, he will be clear as to the _real meaning_ of Martynov’s
concluding remarks: “_Iskra_ is the organ of the revolutionary
opposition which exposes the state of affairs in our country,
particularly the political state of affairs, insofar as it affects the
interests of the most varied strata of the population. We, however, work
and will continue to work for the cause of the working class in close
organic contact with the proletarian struggle. By restricting the sphere
of our active influence we deepen that influence” (63). The true sense
of this conclusion is as follows: _Iskra_ desires _to elevate_ the
trade-unionist politics of the working class (to which, through
misconception, through lack of training, or through conviction, our
practical workers frequently confine themselves) to the level of
Social-Democratic politics. _Rabocheye Dyelo_, however, desires _to
degrade_ Social-Democratic politics to trade-unionist politics.
Moreover, it assures the world that the two positions are “entirely
compatible within the common cause” (63). _0, sancta simplicitas!_

 

To proceed. Have we sufficient forces to direct our propaganda and
agitation among _all_ social classes? Most certainly. Our Economists,
who are frequently inclined to deny this, lose sight of the gigantic
progress our movement has made from (approximately) 1894 to 1901. Like
real “tail-enders” they often go on living in the bygone stages of the
movement’s inception. In the earlier period , indeed, we had
astonishingly few forces, and it was perfectly natural and legitimate
then to devote ourselves exclusively to activities among the workers and
to condemn severely any deviation from this course. The entire task then
was to consolidate our position in the working class. At the present
time, however, gigantic forces have been attracted to the movement. The
best representatives of the younger generation of the educated classes
are coming over to us. Everywhere in the provinces there are people,
resident there by dint of circumstance, who have taken part in the
movement in the past or who desire to do so now and who, are gravitating
towards Social-Democracy (whereas in 1894 one could count the
Social-Democrats on the fingers of one’s hand). A basic political and
organisational shortcoming of our movement is our _inability_ to utilise
all these forces and give them appropriate work (we shall deal with this
more fully in the next chapter). The overwhelming majority of these
forces entirely lack the opportunity of “going among the workers”, so
that there are no grounds for fearing that we shall divert forces from
our main work. In order to be able to provide the workers with real,
comprehensive, and live political knowledge, we must have “our own
people”, Social-Democrats, everywhere, among all social strata, and in
all positions from which we can learn the inner springs of our state
mechanism. Such people are required, not only for propaganda and
agitation, but in a still larger measure for organisation.

 

Is there a basis for activity among all classes of the population?
Whoever doubts this lags in his consciousness behind the spontaneous
awakening of the masses. The working-class movement has aroused and is
continuing to arouse discontent in some, hopes of support for the
opposition in others, and in still others the realisation that the
autocracy is unbearable and must inevitably fall. We would be
“politicians” and Social-Democrats in name only (as all too often
happens in reality), if we failed to realise that our task is to utilise
every manifestation of discontent, and to gather and turn to the best
account every protest, however small. This is quite apart from the fact
that the millions of the labouring peasantry, handicraftsmen, petty
artisans, etc., would always listen eagerly to the speech of any
Social-Democrat who is at all qualified. Indeed, is there a single
social class in which there are no individuals, groups, or circles that
are discontented with the lack of rights and with tyranny and,
therefore, accessible to the propaganda of Social-Democrats as the
spokesmen of the most pressing general democratic needs? To those who
desire to have a clear idea of what the political agitation of a
Social-Democrat among _all_ classes and strata of the population should
be like, we would point to _political exposures_ in the broad sense of
the word as the principal (but, of course, not the sole) form of this
agitation.

 

“We must arouse in every section of the population that is at all
politically conscious a passion for political exposure,” I wrote in my
article “Where To Begin” [Iskra, May (No. 4), 1901], with which I shall
deal in greater detail later. “We must not be discouraged by the fact
that the voice of political exposure is today so feeble, timid, and
infrequent. This is not because of a wholesale submission to police
despotism, but because those who are able and ready to make exposures
have no tribune from which to speak, no eager and encouraging audience,
they do not see anywhere among the people that force to which it would
be worth while directing their complaint against the ’omnipotent’
Russian Government.... We are now in a position to provide a tribune for
the nation-wide exposure of the tsarist government, and it is our duty
to do this. That tribune must be a Social-Democratic newspaper.”^(⁷⁹)

 

The ideal audience for political exposure is the working class, which is
first and foremost in need of all-round and live political knowledge,
and is most capable of converting this knowledge into active struggle,
even when that struggle does not promise “palpable results”. A tribune
for _nation-wide_ exposures can be only an all-Russia newspaper.
“Without a political organ, a political movement deserving that name is
inconceivable in the Europe of today”; in this respect Russia must
undoubtedly be included in present-day Europe. The press long ago became
a power in our country, otherwise the government would not spend tens of
thousands of rubles to bribe it and to subsidise the Katkovs and
Meshcherskys. And it is no novelty in autocratic Russia for the
underground press to break through the wall of censorship
and _compel_ the legal and conservative press to speak openly of it.
This was the case in the seventies and even in the fifties. How much
broader and deeper are now the sections of the people willing to read
the illegal underground press, and to learn from it “how to live and how
to die”, to use the expression of a worker who sent a letter
to _Iskra_ (No. 7).^(⁸⁰) Political exposures are as much a declaration
of war against the _government_ as economic exposures are a declaration
of war against the factory owners. The moral significance of this
declaration of war will be all the greater, the wider and more powerful
the campaign of exposure will be and the more numerous and determined
the social _class_ that has_declared war in order to begin the war_.
Hence, political exposures in themselves serve as a powerful instrument
for _disintegrating_ the system we oppose, as a means for diverting from
the enemy his casual or temporary allies, as a means for spreading
hostility and distrust among the permanent partners of the autocracy.

 

In our time only a party that
will _organise_ really _nation-wide_ exposures can become the vanguard
of the revolutionary forces. The word “nation-wide” has a very profound
meaning. The overwhelming majority of the non-working- class exposers
(be it remembered that in order to become the vanguard, we must attract
other classes) are sober politicians and level-headed men of affairs.
They know perfectly well how dangerous it is to “complain” even against
a minor official, let alone against the “omnipotent” Russian Government.
And they will come _to us_ with their complaints only when they see that
these complaints can really have effect, and that we represent _a
political force_. In order to become such a force in the eyes of
outsiders, much persistent and stubborn work is required _to raise_ our
own consciousness, initiative, and energy… To accomplish this it is not
enough to attach a “vanguard” label to rearguard theory and practice.

 

But if we have to undertake the organisation of a really nationwide
exposure of the government, in what way will then the class character of
our movement be expressed? — the overzealous advocate of “close organic
contact with the proletarian struggle” will ask us, as indeed he does.
The reply is manifold: we Social-Democrats will organise these
nation-wide exposures; all questions raised by the agitation will he
explained in a consistently Social-Democratic spirit, without any
concessions to deliberate or undeliberate distortions of Marxism; the
all-round political agitation will be conducted by a party which unites
into one inseparable whole the assault on the government in the name of
the entire people, the revolutionary training of the proletariat, and
the safeguarding of its political independence, the guidance of the
economic struggle of the working class, and the utilisation of all its
spontaneous conflicts with its exploiters which rouse and bring into our
camp increasing numbers of the proletariat.

 

But a most characteristic feature of Economism is its failure to
understand this connection, more, this identity of the most pressing
need of the proletariat (a comprehensive political education through the
medium of political agitation and political exposures) with the need of
the general democratic movement. This lack of understanding is
expressed, not only in “Martynovite” phrases, but in the references to a
supposedly class point of view identical in meaning with these phrases.
Thus, the authors of the Economist letter in Iskra, No. 12, state:^(⁸¹)
“This basic drawback of Iskra (overestimation of ideology) is also the
cause of its inconsistency on the question of the attitude of
Social-Democracy to the various social classes and tendencies. By
theoretical reasoning (not by “the growth of Party tasks, which grow
together with the Party”), Iskra solved the problem of the immediate
transition to the struggle against absolutism. In all probability it
senses the difficulty of such a task for the workers under the present
state of affairs (not only senses, but knows full well that this task
appears less difficult to the workers than to the Economist
intellectuals with their nursemaid concern, for the workers are prepared
to fight even for demands which, to use the language of the
never-to-be-forgotten Martynov, do not “promise palpable results”) but
lacking the patience to wait until the workers will have gathered
sufficient forces for this struggle, Iskra begins to seek allies in the
ranks of the liberals and intellectuals”. . . .

 

Yes, we have indeed lost all “patience” “waiting” for the blessed time,
long promised us by diverse “conciliators”, when the Economists will
have stopped charging the workers with their own backwardness and
justifying their own lack of energy with allegations that the workers
lack strength. We ask our Economists: What do they mean by “the
gathering of workingclass strength for the struggle”? Is it not evident
that this means the political training of the workers, so that all the
aspects of our vile autocracy are revealed to them? And is it not clear
that _precisely for this work_ we need “allies in the ranks of the
liberals and intellectuals”, who are prepared to join us in the exposure
of the political attack on the Zemstvos, on the teachers, on the
statisticians, on the students, etc.? Is this surprisingly “intricate
mechanism” really so difficult to understand? Has not P. B. Axelrod
constantly repeated since 1897 that “the task before the Russian
Social-Democrats of acquiring adherents and direct and indirect allies
among the non-proletarian classes will be solved principally and
primarily by the character of the propagandist activities conducted
among the proletariat itself”? But the Martynovs and the other
Economists continue to imagine that “by economic struggle against the
employers and the government” the workers must _first_gather strength
(for trade-unionist politics) and _then_ “go over” — we presume from
trade-unionist “training for activity” to Social-Democratic activity!

 

“...In this quest,” continue the Economists, “_Iskra_ not infrequently
departs from the class point of view, obscures class antagonisms, and
puts into the forefront the common nature of the discontent with the
government, although the causes and the degree of the discontent vary
considerably among the ’allies’. Such, for example, is _Iskra_’s
attitude towards the Zemstvo . . .” _Iskra_, it is alleged, “promises
the nobles that are dissatisfied with the government’s sops the
assistance of the working class, but it does not say a word about the
class antagonism that exists between these social strata.” If the reader
will turn to the article “The Autocracy and the Zemstvo” (_Iskra_, Nos.
2 and 4), to which, _in all probability_, the authors of the letter
refer, he will find that they^(⁸²) deal with the attitude of
the _government_ towards the “mild agitation of the bureaucratic
Zemstvo, which is based on the social-estates”, and towards the
“independent activity of even the propertied classes”. The article
states that the workers cannot look on indifferently while the
government is waging a struggle against the Zemstvo, and the Zemstvos
are called upon to stop making mild speeches and to speak firmly and
resolutely when revolutionary Social-Democracy confronts the government
in all its strength. What the authors of the letter do not agree with
here is not clear. Do they think that the workers will “not understand”
the phrases “propertied classes” and “bureaucratic Zemstvo based on the
social-estates”? Do they think that _urging_ the Zemstvo to abandon mild
speeches and to speak firmly is “overestimating ideology”? Do they
imagine the workers can “gather strength” for the struggle against the
autocracy if they know nothing about the attitude of the autocracy
towards the Zemstvo _as well?_ All this too remains unknown. One thing
alone is clear and that is that the authors of the letter have a very
vague idea of what the political tasks of Social-Democracy are. This is
revealed still more clearly by their remark: “Such, too, is _Iskra_’s
attitude towards the student movement” (i.e., it also “obscures the
class antagonisms”). Instead of calling on the workers to declare by
means of public demonstrations that the real breeding-place of unbridled
violence, disorder, and outrage is not the university youth but the
Russian Government (_Iskra_, No. 2^(⁸³)) we ought probably to have
inserted arguments in the spirit of _Rabochaya Mysl_! Such ideas were
expressed by Social-Democrats in the autumn of 1901, after the events of
February and March, on the eve of a fresh upsurge of the student
movement, which reveals that even in this sphere the “spontaneous”
protest against the autocracy is _outstripping_ the conscious
Social-Democratic leadership of the movement. The spontaneous striving
of the workers to defend the students who are being assaulted by the
police and the Cossacks surpasses the conscious activity of the
Social-Democratic organisation!

 

“And yet in other articles,” continue the authors of the letter,
“_Iskra_ sharply condemns all compromise and defends, for instance, the
intolerant conduct of the Guesdists.” We would advise those who are wont
so conceitedly and frivolously to declare that the present disagreements
among the Social-Democrats are unessential and do not justify a split,
to ponder these words. Is it possible for people to work together in the
same organisation, when some among them contend that we have done
extremely little to explain the hostility of the autocracy to the
various classes and to inform the workers of the opposition displayed by
the various social strata to the autocracy, while others among them see
in this clarification a “compromise” — evidently a compromise with the
theory of “economic struggle against the employers and the government”?

 

We urged the necessity of carrying the class struggle into the rural
districts in connection with the fortieth anniversary of the
emancipation of the peasantry (issue No. 3^(⁸⁴) and spoke of the
irreconcilability of the local government bodies and the autocracy in
relation to Witte’s secret Memorandum (No. 4). In connection with the
new law we attacked the feudal landlords and the government which serves
them (No. 8^(⁸⁵)) and we welcomed the illegal Zemstvo congress. We urged
the Zemstvo to pass over from abject petitions (No. 8^(⁸⁶)) to struggle.
We encouraged the students, who had begun to understand the need for the
political struggle, and to undertake this struggle (No. 3), while, at
the same time, we lashed out at the “outrageous incomprehension”
revealed by the adherents of the “purely student” movement, who called
upon the students to abstain from participating in the street
demonstrations (No. 3, in connection with the manifesto issued by the
Executive Committee of the Moscow students on February 25). We exposed
the “senseless dreams” and the “lying hypocrisy” of the cunning liberals
of _Rossiya_^(⁸⁷) (No. 5), while pointing to the violent fury with which
the government-gaoler persecuted “peaceful writers, aged professors,
scientists, and well-known liberal Zemstvo members” (No. 5, “Police Raid
on Literature”). We exposed the real significance of the programme of
“state protection for the welfare of the workers” and welcomed the
“valuable admission” that “it is better, by granting reforms from above,
to forestall the demand for such reforms from below than to wait for
those demands to be put forward” (No. 6^(⁸⁸)). We encouraged the
protesting statisticians (No. 7) and censured the strike-breaking
statisticians (No. 9). He who sees in these tactics an obscuring of the
class-consciousness of the proletariat and _a compromise with
liberalism_ reveals his utter failure to understand the true
significance of the programme of the _Credo_ and _carries out that
programme de facto_, however much he may repudiate it. For by _such an
approach_ he drags Social-Democracy towards the “economic struggle
against the employers and the government” and _yields to liberalism_,
abandons the task of actively intervening in every “liberal” issue and
of determining _his own_, Social-Democratic, attitude towards this
question.

 


3.6 Once More “Slanderers”, Once More “Mystifiers”

 

These polite expressions, as the reader will recall, belong to Rabocheye
Dyelo, which in this way answers our charge that it “is indirectly
preparing the ground for converting the working-class movement into an
instrument of bourgeois democracy”. In its simplicity of heart Rabocheye
Dyelo decided that this accusation was nothing more than a polemical
sally: these malicious doctrinaires are bent on saying all sorts of
unpleasant things about us, and, what can be more unpleasant than being
an instrument of bourgeois democracy? And so they print in bold type a
“refutation”: “Nothing but downright slander”, “mystification”,
“mummery” (Two Conferences, pp. 30, 31, 33). Like Jove, Rabocheye
Dyelo (although bearing little resemblance to that deity) is wrathful
because it is wrong, and proves by its hasty abuse that it is incapable
of understanding its opponents’ mode of reasoning. And yet, with only a
little reflection it would have understood why any subservience to the
spontaneity of the mass movement and any degrading of Social-Democratic
politics to the level of trade-unionist politics mean preparing the
ground for converting the working-class movement into an instrument of
bourgeois democracy. The spontaneous working-class movement is by itself
able to create (and inevitably does create) only trade-unionism, and
working-class trade-unionist politics is precisely working-class
bourgeois politics. The fact that the working class participates in the
political struggle, and even in the political revolution, does not in
itself make its politics Social-Democratic politics. Will Rabocheye
Dyelo make bold to deny this? Will it, at long last, publicly, plainly,
and without equivocation explain how it understands the urgent questions
of international and of Russian Social-Democracy? Hardly. It will never
do anything of the kind, because it holds fast to the trick, which might
be described as the “not here” method — “It’s not me, it’s not my horse,
I’m not the driver. We are not Economists; Rabochaya Mysl does not stand
for Economism; there is no Economism at all in Russia.” This is a
remarkably adroit and “political” trick, which suffers from the slight
defect, however, that the publications practising it are usually
nicknamed, “At your service, sir”.

 

Rabocheye Dyelo imagines that bourgeois democracy in Russia is, in
general, merely a “phantom” (Two Conferences, p. 32).^(⁸⁹) Happy people!
Ostrich-like, they bury their heads in the sand and imagine that
everything around has disappeared. Liberal publicists who month after
month proclaim to the world their triumph over the collapse and even the
disappearance of Marxism; liberal newspapers (S. Peterburgskiye
Vedomosti,^(⁹⁰) Russkiye Vedomosti, and many others) which encourage the
liberals who bring to the workers the Brentano^(⁹¹) conception of the
class struggle and the trade-unionist conception of politics; the galaxy
of critics of Marxism, whose real tendencies were so very well disclosed
by the Credo and whose literary products alone circulate in Russia
without let or hindrance; the revival of revolutionary
non-Social-Democratic tendencies, particularly after the February and
March events — all these, apparently, are just phantoms! All these have
nothing at all to do with bourgeois democracy!

 

Rabocheye Dyelo and the authors of the Economist letter published
in Iskra, No. 12, should “ponder over the reason why the events of the
spring brought about such a revival of revolutionary
non-Social-Democratic tendencies instead of increasing the authority and
the prestige of Social-Democracy”.

 

The reason lies in the fact that we failed to cope with our tasks. The
masses of the workers proved to be more active than we. We lacked
adequately trained revolutionary leaders and organisers possessed of a
thorough knowledge of the mood prevailing among all the opposition
strata and able to head the movement, to turn a spontaneous
demonstration into a political one, broaden its political character,
etc. Under such circumstances, our backwardness will inevitably be
utilised by the more mobile and more energetic non-Social-Democratic
revolutionaries, and the workers, however energetically and
self-sacrificingly they may fight the police and the troops, however
revolutionary their actions may be, will prove to be merely a force
supporting those revolutionaries, the rearguard of bourgeois democracy,
and not the Social-Democratic vanguard. Let us take, for example, the
German Social-Democrats, whose weak aspects alone our Economists desire
to emulate. Why is there not a single political event in Germany that
does not add to the authority and prestige of Social-Democracy? Because
Social-Democracy is always found to be in advance of all others in
furnishing the most revolutionary appraisal of every given event and in
championing every protest against tyranny. It does not lull itself with
arguments that the economic struggle brings the workers to realise that
they have no political rights and that the concrete conditions
unavoidably impel the working-class movement on to the path of
revolution. It intervenes in every sphere and in every question of
social and political life; in the matter of Wilhelm’s refusal to endorse
a bourgeois progressist as city mayor (our Economists have not yet
managed to educate. the Germans to the understanding that such an act
is, in fact, a compromise with liberalism!); in the matter of the law
against “obscene” publications and pictures; in the matter of
governmental influence on the election of professors, etc., etc.
Everywhere the Social-Democrats are found in the forefront, rousing
political discontent among all classes, rousing the sluggards,
stimulating the laggards, and providing a wealth of material for the
development of the political consciousness and the political activity of
the proletariat. As a result, even the avowed enemies of socialism are
filled with respect for this advanced political fighter, and not
infrequently an important document from bourgeois, and even from
bureaucratic and Court circles, makes its way by some miraculous means
into the editorial office of Vorwarts.

 

This, then, is the resolution of the seeming “contradiction” that
surpasses Rabocheye Dyelo’s powers of understanding to such an extent
that it can only throw up its hands and cry, “Mummery!” Indeed, just
think of it: We, Rabocheye Dyelo, regard the mass working-class movement
as the corner-stone (and say so in bold type!); we warn all and sundry
against belittling the significance of the element of spontaneity; we
desire to lend the economic struggle itself — itself — a political
character; we desire to maintain close and organic contact with the
proletarian struggle. And yet we are told that we are preparing the
ground for the conversion of the working-class movement into an
instrument of bourgeois democracy! And who are they that presume to say
this? People who “compromise” with liberalism by intervening in every
“liberal” issue (what a gross misunderstanding of “organic contact with
the proletarian struggle”!), by devoting so much attention to the
students and even (oh horror!) to the Zemstvos! People who in general
wish to devote a greater percentage (compared with the Economists) of
their efforts to activity among non-proletarian classes of the
population! What is this but “mummery”?

 

Poor Rabocheye Dyelo! Will it ever find the solution to this perplexing
puzzle?

 



4 THE PRIMITIVENESS OF THE ECONOMISTS AND THE ORGANIZATION OF THE REVOLUTIONARIES


 

Rabocheye Dyelo’s assertions, which we have analyzed, that the economic
struggle is the most widely applicable means of political agitation and
that our task now is to lend the economic struggle itself a political
character, etc., express a narrow view, not only of our political, but
also of our organizational tasks. The “economic struggle against the
employers and the government” does not at all require an all-Russia
centralized organization, and hence this struggle can never give rise to
such an organization as will combine, in one general assault, all the
manifestations of political opposition, protest, and indignation, an
organization that will consist of professional revolutionaries and be
led by the real political leaders of the entire people. This stands to
reason. The character of any organization is naturally and inevitably
determined by the content of its activity. Consequently, Rabocheye
Dyelo, by the assertions analyzed above, sanctifies and legitimizes not
only narrowness of political activity, but also of organizational work.
In this case, Rabocheye Dyelo, as always, proves itself an organ whose
consciousness yields to spontaneity. Yet subservience to spontaneously
developing forms of organisation, failure to realise the narrowness and
primitiveness of our organisational work, of our “handicraft” methods in
this most important sphere, failure to realise this, I say, is a
veritable ailment from which our movement suffers. It is not an ailment
that comes with decline, but one, of course, that comes with growth. It
is however at the present time, when the wave of spontaneous
indignation, as it were, is sweeping over us, leaders and organisers of
the movement, that an irreconcilable struggle must be waged against all
defence of backwardness, against any legitimation of narrowness in this
matter. It is particularly necessary to arouse in all who participate in
practical work, or are preparing to take up that work, discontent with
the amateurism prevailing among us and an unshakable determination to
rid ourselves of it.

 


4.1 What is Primitiveness?

 

We shall try to answer this question by giving a brief description of
the activity of a typical Social-Democratic study circle of the period
1894-1901. We have noted that the entire student youth of the period was
absorbed in Marxism. Of course, these students were not only, or even
not so much, interested in Marxism as a theory; they were interested in
it as an answer to the question, “What is to be done?”, as a call to
take the field against the enemy. These new warriors marched to battle
with astonishingly primitive equipment and training. In a vast number of
cases they had almost no equipment and absolutely no training. They
marched to war like peasants from the plough, armed only with clubs. A
students’ circle establishes contacts with workers and sets to work,
without any connection with the old members of the movement, without any
connection with study circles in other districts, or even in other parts
of the same city (or in other educational institutions), without any
organisation of the various divisions of revolutionary work, without any
systematic plan of activity covering any length of time. The circle
gradually expands its propaganda and agitation; by its activities it
wins the sympathies of fairly large sections of workers and of a certain
section of the educated strata, which provide it with money and from
among whom the “committee” recruits new groups of young people. The
attractive power of the committee (or League of Struggle) grows, its
sphere of activity becomes wider, and the committee expands this
activity quite spontaneously; the very people who a year or a few months
previously spoke at the students’ circle gatherings and discussed the
question, “Whither?”, who established and maintained contacts with the
workers and wrote and published leaflets, now, establish contacts with
other groups of revolutionaries, procure literature, set to work to
publish a local newspaper, begin to talk of organising a demonstration,
and finally turn to open warfare (which may, according to circumstances,
take the form of issuing the first agitational leaflet or the first
issue of a newspaper, or of organising the first demonstration). Usually
the initiation of such actions ends in an immediate and complete fiasco.
Immediate and complete, because this open warfare was not the result of
a systematic and carefully thought-out and gradually prepared plan for a
prolonged and stubborn struggle, but simply the result of the
spontaneous growth of traditional study circle work; because, naturally,
the police, in almost every case, knew the principal leaders of the
local movement, since they had already “gained a reputation” for
themselves in their student days, and the police waited only for the
right moment to make their raid. They deliberately allowed the study
circle sufficient time to develop its work so that they might, obtain a
palpable _corpus delicti_, and they always permitted several of the
persons known to them to remain at liberty “for breeding” (which, as far
as I know, is the technical term used both by our people and by the
gendarmes). One cannot help comparing this kind of warfare with that
conducted by a mass of peasants, armed with clubs, against modern
troops. And one can only wonder at the vitality of the movement which
expanded, grew, and scored victories despite the total lack of training
on the part of the fighters. True, from the historical point of view,
the primitiveness of equipment was not only inevitable at first,
but _even legitimate_ as one of the conditions for the wide recruiting
of fighters, but as soon as serious war operations began (and they began
in fact with the strikes in the summer of 1896), the defects in our
fighting organisations made themselves felt to an
ever-increasing degree. The government, at first thrown into confusion
and committing a number of blunders (e.g., its appeal to the public
describing the misdeeds of the socialists, or the banishment of workers
from the capitals to provincial industrial centres), very soon adapted
itself to the new conditions of the struggle and managed to deploy well
its perfectly equipped detachments of _agents provocateurs_, spies, and
gendarmes. Raids became so frequent, affected such a vast number of
people, and cleared out the local study circles so thoroughly that the
masses of the workers lost literally all their leaders, the movement
assumed an amazingly sporadic character, and it became utterly
impossible to establish continuity and coherence in the work. The
terrible dispersion of the local leaders; the fortuitous character of
the study circle memberships; the lack of training in, and the narrow
outlook on, theoretical, political, and organisational questions were
all the inevitable result of the conditions described above. Things have
reached such a pass that in several places the workers, because of our
lack of self-restraint and the inability to maintain secrecy, begin to
lose faith in the intellectuals and to avoid them; the intellectuals,
they say, are much too careless and cause police raids!

 

Anyone who has the slightest knowledge of the movement is aware that all
thinking Social-Democrats have at last begun to regard these amateurish
methods as a disease. In order that the reader who is not acquainted
with the movement may have no grounds for thinking that we are
“inventing” a special stage or special disease of the movement, we shall
refer once again to the witness we have quoted. We trust we shall be
forgiven for the length of the passage:

 

“While the gradual transition to more extensive practical activity,”
writes B-v in Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 6, “a transition that is directly
dependent on the general transitional period through which the Russian
working-class movement is now passing, is a characteristic feature, . .
. there is, however, another, no less interesting feature in the general
mechanism of the Russian workers’ revolution. We refer to the general
lack of revolutionary forces fit for action, [all italics ours — Lenin]
which is felt not only in St. Petersburg, but throughout Russia. With
the general revival of the working-class movement, with the general
development of the working masses, with the growing frequency of
strikes, with the increasingly open mass struggle of the workers, and
with the intensified government persecution, arrests, deportation, and
exile, this lack of highly skilled revolutionary forces is becoming more
and more marked and, without a doubt, cannot but affect the depth and
the general character of the movement. Many strikes take place without
any strong and direct influence upon them by the revolutionary
organisations.... A shortage of agitational leaflets and illegal
literature Is felt.... The workers’ study circles are left without
agitators.... In addition, there is a constant dearth of funds. In a
word, the growth of the working class movement is outstripping the
growth and development of the revolutionary organisations. The numerical
strength of the active revolutionaries is too small to enable them to
concentrate in their own hands the influence exercised upon the whole
mass of discontented workers, or to give this discontent even a shadow
of coherence and organisation.... The separate study circles, the
separate revolutionaries, scattered, uncombined, do not represent a
single, strong, and disciplined organisation with proportionately
developed parts. . . .” Admitting that the immediate organization of
fresh study circles to replace those that have been broken up merely
proves the vitality of the movement ... but does not prove the existence
of an adequate number of adequately prepared revolutionary workers, the
author concludes: “The lack of practical training among the St.
Petersburg revolutionaries is seen in the results of their work. The
recent trials, especially that of the Self-Emancipation Group and the
Labour-against-Capital group,^([19])clearly showed that the young
agitator, lacking a detailed knowledge of working class conditions and,
consequently, of the conditions under which agitation can be carried on
in a given factory, ignorant of the principles of secrecy, and
understanding only the general principles of Social-Democracy [if he
does], is able to carry on his work for perhaps four, five, or six
months. Then come arrests, which frequently lead to the break-up of the
entire organisation, or at all events, of part of it. The question
arises, therefore, can the group conduct successful activity if its
existence is measured by months?... Obviously, the defects of the
existing organisations cannot be wholly ascribed to the transitional
period.... Obviously, the numerical, and above all the qualitative,
make-up of the functioning organisations is no small factor, and the
first task our Social-Democrats must undertake ... is that
of effectively combining the organisations and making a strict selection
of their membership.”

 


4.2 Primitiveness and Economism

 

We must now deal with a question that has undoubtedly come to the mind
of every reader. Can a connection be established between primitiveness
as growing pains that affect the wholemovement, and Economism, which
is one of the currents in Russian Social-Democracy? We think that it
can. Lack of practical training, of ability to carry on organisational
work is certainly common to us all, including those who have from the
very outset unswervingly stood for revolutionary Marxism. Of course,
were it only lack of practical training, no one could blame the
practical workers. But the term “primitiveness” embraces something more
than lack of training; it denotes a narrow scope of revolutionary work
generally, failure to understand that a good organisation of
revolutionaries cannot be built on the basis of such narrow activity,
and lastly — and this is the main thing — attempts to justify this
narrowness and to elevate it to a special “theory”, i.e., subservience
to spontaneity on this question too. Once such attempts were revealed,
it became clear that primitiveness is connected with Economism and that
we shall never rid ourselves of this narrowness of our organisational
activity until we rid ourselves of Economism generally (i.e., the narrow
conception of Marxist theory, as well as of the role of Social-Democracy
and of its political tasks). These attempts manifested themselves in a
twofold direction. Some began to say that the working masses themselves
have not yet advanced the broad and militant political tasks which the
revolutionaries are attempting to “impose” on them; that they must
continue to struggle for immediate political demands, to conduct “the
economic struggle against the employers and the government”^(⁹²) (and,
naturally, corresponding to this struggle which is “accessible” to the
mass movement there must be an organisation that will be “accessible” to
the most untrained youth). Others, far removed from any theory of
“gradualness”, said that it is possible and necessary to “bring about a
political revolution”, but that this does not require building a strong
organisation of revolutionaries to train the proletariat in steadfast
and stubborn struggle. All we need do is to snatch up our old friend,
the “accessible” cudgel. To drop metaphor, it means that we must
organise a general strike,^(⁹³) or that we must stimulate the
“spiritless” progress of the working-class movement by means of
“excitative terror”.^(⁹⁴) Both these trends, the opportunists and the
“revolutionists”, bow to the prevailing amateurism; neither believes
that it can be eliminated, neither understands our primary and
imperative practical task to establish an organisation of
revolutionaries capable of lending energy, stability, and continuity to
the political struggle.

 

We have quoted the words of B-v: “The growth of the working-class
movement is outstripping the growth and development of the revolutionary
organisations.” This “valuable remark of a close observer” (Rabocheye
Dyelo’s comment on B-v’s article) has a twofold value for us. It shows
that we were right in our opinion that the principal cause of the
present crisis in Russian Social-Democracy is the lag of the
leaders (“ideologists”, revolutionaries, Social-Democrats) behind the
spontaneous upsurge of the masses. It shows that all the arguments
advanced by the authors of the Economist letter (in Iskra, No. 12), by
Krichevsky and by Martynov, as to the danger of belittling the
significance of the spontaneous element, of the drab everyday struggle,
as to tactics-as-process, etc., are nothing more than a glorification
and a defence of primitiveness. These people who cannot pronounce the
word “theoretician” without a sneer, who describe their genuflections to
common lack of training and backwardness as a “sense for the realities
of life”, reveal in practice a failure to understand our most
imperative practical tasks. To laggards they shout: Keep in step! Don’t
run ahead! To people suffering from a lack of energy and initiative in
organisational work, from a lack of “plans” for wide and bold activity,
they prate about “tactics-as-process”! The worst sin we commit is that
we degrade our political and organisational tasks to the level of the
immediate, “palpable”, “concrete” interests of the everyday economic
struggle; yet they keep singing to us the same refrain: Lend the
economic struggle itself a political character! We repeat: this kind of
thing displays as much “sense for the realities of life” as was
displayed by the hero in the popular fable who cried out to a passing
funeral procession, “Many happy returns of the day!”

 

Recall the matchless, truly “Narcissus-like” superciliousness with which
these wiseacres lectured Plekhanov on the “workers’ circles generally”
(sic!) being “unable to cope with political tasks in the real
and practical sense of the word, i.e., in the sense of the expedient and
successful practical struggle for political demands” (Rabocheye Dyelo’s
Reply, p. 24). There are circles and circles, gentlemen! Circles of
“amateurs” are not, of course, capable of coping with political tasks so
long as they have not become aware of their amateurism and do not
abandon it. If, besides this, these amateurs are enamoured of their
primitive methods, and insist on writing the word “practical” in
italics, and imagine that being practical demands that one’s tasks be
reduced to the level of understanding of the most backward strata of the
masses, then they are hopeless amateurs and, of course, certainly
cannot in general cope with any political tasks. But a circle of
leaders, of the type of Alexeyev and Myshkin, of Khalturin and
Zhelyabov, is capable of coping with political tasks in the genuine and
most practical sense of the term, for the reason and to the extent that
their impassioned propaganda meets with response among the spontaneously
awakening masses, and their sparkling energy is answered and supported
by the energy of the revolutionary class. Plekhanov was profoundly
right, not only in pointing to this revolutionary class and proving that
its spontaneous awakening was inevitable, but in setting even the
“workers’ circles” a great and lofty political task. But you refer to
the mass movement that has sprung up since that time in order
to degrade this task, to curtail the energy and scope of activity of the
“workers’ circles”. If you are not amateurs enamoured of your primitive
methods, what are you then? You boast that you are practical, but you
fail to see what every Russian practical worker knows, namely, the
miracles that the energy, not only of a circle, but even of an
individual person is able to perform in the revolutionary cause. Or do
you think that our movement cannot produce leaders like those of the
seventies? If so, why do you think so? Because we lack training? But we
are training ourselves, we will go on training ourselves, and we will be
trained! Unfortunately it is true that the surface of the stagnant
waters of the “economic struggle against the employers and the
government” is overgrown with fungus; people have appeared among us who
kneel in prayer to spontaneity, gazing with awe (to take an expression
from Plekhanov) upon the “posterior” of the Russian proletariat. But we
will get rid of this fungus. The time has come when Russian
revolutionaries, guided by a genuinely revolutionary theory, relying
upon the genuinely revolutionary and spontaneously awakening class, can
at last — at long last! — rise to full stature in all their giant
strength. All that is required is for the masses of our practical
workers, and the still larger masses of those who dreamed of practical
work when they were still at school, to pour scorn and ridicule upon any
suggestion that may be made to degrade our political tasks and to
restrict the scope of our organisational work. And we will achieve that,
rest assured, gentlemen!

 

In the article “Where To Begin”, I wrote in opposition to Rabocheye
Dyelo: “The tactics of agitation in relation to some special question,
or the tactics with regard to some detail of party organisation may be
changed in twenty-four hours; but only people devoid of all principle
are capable of changing, in twenty-four hours, or, for that matter, in
twenty-four months, their view on the necessity — in general,
constantly, and absolutely — of an organisation of struggle and of
political agitation among the masses.”^(⁹⁵) To this Rabocheye
Dyelo replied: “This, the only one of Iskra’s charges that makes a
pretence of being based on facts, is totally without foundation. Readers
of Rabocheye Dyelo know very well that from the outset we not only
called for political agitation, without waiting for the appearance
of Iskra ... [saying at the same time that not only the workers’ study
circles, “but also the mass working-class movement could not regard as
its first political task the overthrow of absolutism”, but only the
struggle for immediate political demands, and that “the masses begin to
understand immediate political demands after one, or at all events,
after several strikes”], . . . but that with our publications which we
furnished from abroad for the comrades working in Russia, we provided
the only Social-Democratic political and agitational material ... [and
in this sole material you not only based the widest political agitation
exclusively on the economic struggle, but you even went to the extent of
claiming that this restricted agitation was the “most
widely applicable”. And do you not observe, gentlemen, that your own
argument — that this was the only material provided — proves the
necessity for Iskra’s appearance, and its struggle against Rabocheye
Dyelo?].... On the other hand, our publishing activity actually prepared
the ground for the tactical unity of the Party... [unity in the
conviction that tactics is a process of growth of Party tasks that grow
together with the Party? A precious unity indeed!]... and by that
rendered possible the creation of a ’militant organisation’ for which
the Union Abroad did all that an organisation abroad could do”
(Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10, p. 15). A vain attempt at evasion! I would
never dream of denying that you did all you possibly could. I have
asserted and assert now that the limits of what is “possible” for you to
do are restricted by the narrowness of your outlook. It is ridiculous to
talk of a “militant organisation” to fight for “immediate political
demands”, or to conduct the economic struggle against the employers and
the government”.

 

But if the reader wishes to see the pearls of “Economist” infatuation
with amateurism, he must, of course, turn from the eclectic and
vacillating Rabocheye Dyelo to the consistent and determined Rabochaya
Mysl. In its Separate Supplement, p. 13, R. M. wrote: “Now two words
about the so-called revolutionary intelligentsia proper. True, on more
than one occasion it has proved itself prepared ’to enter into
determined battle with tsarism’. The unfortunate thing, however, is that
our revolutionary intelligentsia, ruthlessly persecuted by the political
police, imagined the struggle against the political police to be the
political struggle against the autocracy. That is why, to this day, it
cannot understand ’where the forces for the struggle against the
autocracy are to be obtained’.”

 

Truly matchless is the lofty contempt for the struggle against the
police displayed by this worshipper (in the worst sense of the word) of
the spontaneous movement! He is prepared to justify our inability to
organise secret activity by the argument that with the spontaneous mass
movement it is not at all important for us to struggle against the
political police! Very few people indeed would subscribe to this
appalling conclusion; to such an extent have our deficiencies in
revolutionary organisations become a matter of acute importance. But if
Martynov, for example, refuses to subscribe to this, it will only be
because he is unable, or lacks the courage, to think out his ideas to
their logical conclusion. Indeed, does the “task” of advancing concrete
demands by the masses, demands that promise palpable results, call for
special efforts to create a stable, centralised, militant organisation
of revolutionaries? Cannot such a “task” be carried out even by masses
that do not “struggle against the political police” at all? Could this
task, moreover, be fulfilled if, in addition to the few leaders, it were
not undertaken by such workers (the overwhelming majority) as are
quite incapable of “struggling against the political police”? Such
workers, average people of the masses, are capable of displaying
enormous energy and self-sacrifice in strikes and in street, battles
with the police and the troops, and are capable (in fact, are alone
capable) of determining the outcome of our entire movement — but the
struggle against the political police requires special qualities; it
requires professional revolutionaries. And we must see to it, not only
that the masses “advance” concrete demands, but that the masses of the
workers “advance” an increasing number of such professional
revolutionaries. Thus, we have reached the question of the relation
between an organisation of professional revolutionaries and the labour
movement pure and simple. Although this question has found little
reflection in literature, it has greatly engaged us “politicians” in
conversations and polemics with comrades who gravitate more or less
towards Economism. It is a question meriting special treatment. But
before taking it up, let us offer one further quotation by way of
illustrating our thesis on the connection between primitiveness and
Economism.

 

In his Reply, Mr. N. N.^(⁹⁶) wrote: “The Emancipation of Labour group
demands direct struggle against the government without first considering
where the material forces for this struggle are to be obtained, and
without indicating the path of the struggle.” Emphasising the last
words, the author adds the following footnote to the word “Path”: “This
cannot be explained by purposes of secrecy, because the programme does
not refer to a plot but to a mass movement. And the masses cannot
proceed by secret paths. Can we conceive of a secret strike? Can we
conceive of secret demonstrations and petitions?” (Vademecum, p. 59.)
Thus, the author comes quite close to the question of the “material
forces” (organisers of strikes and demonstrations) and to the “paths” of
the struggle, but, nevertheless, is still in a state of consternation,
because he “worships” the mass movement, i.e., he regards it as
something that relieves us of the necessity of conducting revolutionary
activity and not as something that should encourage us and stimulate our
revolutionary activity. It is impossible for a strike to remain a secret
to those participating in it and to those immediately associated with
it, but it may (and in the majority of cases does) remain a “secret” to
the masses of the Russian workers, because the government takes care to
cut all communication with the strikers, to prevent all news of strikes
from spreading. Here indeed is where a special “struggle against the
political police” is required, a struggle that can never be conducted
actively by such large masses as take part in strikes. This struggle
must be organised, according to “all the rules of the art”, by people
who are professionally engaged in revolutionary activity. The fact that
the masses are spontaneously being drawn into the movement does not make
the organisation of this struggle less necessary. On the contrary, it
makes it more necessary; for we socialists would be failing in our
direct duty to the masses if we did not prevent the police from making a
secret of every strike and every demonstration (and if we did not
ourselves from time to time secretly prepare strikes and
demonstrations). And we will succeed in doing this, because the
spontaneously awakening masses will also produce increasing, numbers of
“professional revolutionaries” from their own ranks (that is, if we do
not take it into our heads to advise the workers to keep on marking
time).

 


4.3 Organisation of Workers and Organisation of Revolutionaries

 

It is only natural to expect that for a Social-Democrat whose conception
of the political struggle coincides with the conception of the “economic
struggle against the employers and the government”, the “organisation of
revolutionaries” will more or less coincide with the “organisation of
workers”. This, in fact, is what actually happens; so that when we speak
of organisation, we literally speak in different tongues. I vividly
recall, for example, a conversation I once had with a fairly consistent
Economist, with whom I had not been previously acquainted. We were
discussing the pamphlet, _Who Will Bring About the Political
Revolution?_ and were soon of a mind that its principal defect was its
ignoring of the question of organisation. We had begun to assume full
agreement between us; but, as the conversation proceeded, it became
evident that we were talking of different things. My interlocutor
accused the author of ignoring strike funds, mutual benefit societies,
etc., whereas I had in mind an organisation of revolutionaries as an
essential factor in “bringing about” the political revolution. As soon
as the disagreement became clear, there was hardly, as I remember, a
single question of principle upon which I was in agreement with the
Economist!

 

What was the source of our disagreement? It was the fact that on
questions both of organisation and of politics the Economists are
forever lapsing from Social-Democracy into trade-unionism. The political
struggle of Social-Democracy is far more extensive and complex than the
economic struggle of the workers against the employers and the
government. Similarly (indeed for that reason), the organisation of the
revolutionary Social-Democratic Party must inevitably be of _a kind
different _from the organisation of the workers designed for this
struggle. The workers’ organisation must in the first place be a trade
union organisation; secondly, it must be as broad as possible; and
thirdly, it must be as public as conditions will allow (here, and
further on, of course, I refer only to absolutist Russia). On the other
hand, the organisation of the revolutionaries must consist first and
foremost of people who make revolutionary activity their profession (for
which reason I speak of the organisation of _revolutionaries_, meaning
revolutionary Social-Democrats). In view of this common characteristic
of the members of such an organisation, _all distinctions as between
workers and intellectuals_, not to speak of distinctions of trade and
profession, in both categories, _must be effaced_. Such an organisation
must perforce not be very extensive and must be as secret as possible.
Let us examine this threefold distinction.

 

In countries where political liberty exists the distinction between a
trade union and a political organisation is clear enough, as is the
distinction between trade unions and Social-Democracy. The relations
between the latter and the former will naturally vary in each country
according to historical, legal, and other conditions; they may be more
or less close, complex, etc. (in our opinion they should be as close and
as little complicated as possible); but there can be no question in free
countries of the organisation of trade unions coinciding with the
organisation of the Social-Democratic Party. In Russia, however, the
yoke of the autocracy appears at first glance to obliterate all
distinctions between the Social-Democratic organisation and the workers’
associations, since _all_ workers’ associations and _all_ study circles
are prohibited, and since the principal manifestation and weapon of the
workers’ economic struggle — the strike — is regarded as a criminal (and
sometimes even as a political!) offence. Conditions in our country,
therefore, on the one hand, strongly “impel” the workers engaged in
economic struggle to concern themselves with political questions, and,
on the other, they “impel” Social-Democrats to confound trade-unionism
with Social-Democracy (and our Krichevskys, Martynoys, and Co., while
diligently discussing the first kind of “impulsion”, fail to notice the
second). Indeed, picture to yourselves people who are immersed
ninety-nine per cent in “the economic struggle against the employers and
the government”. Some of them will never, during the _entire_ course of
their activity (from four to six months), be impelled to think of the
need for a more complex organisation of revolutionaries. Others,
perhaps, will come across the fairly widely distributed Bernsteinian
literature, from which they will become convinced of the profound
importance of the forward movement of “the drab everyday struggle”.
Still others will be carried away, perhaps, by the seductive idea of
showing the world a new example of “close and organic contact with the
proletarian struggle” — contact between the trade union and the Social
Democratic movements. Such people may argue that the later a country
enters the arena of capitalism and, consequently, of the
working-class movement, the more the socialists in that country may take
part in, and support, the trade union movement, and the less the reason
for the existence of non-Social-Democratic trade unions. So far the
argument is fully correct; unfortunately, however, some go beyond that
and dream of a complete fusion of Social-Democracy with trade-unionism.
We shall soon see, from the example of the Rules of the St. Petersburg
League of Struggle, what a harmful effect such dreams have upon our
plans of organisation.

 

The workers’ organisations for the economic struggle should be trade
union organisations. Every Social-Democratic worker should as far as
possible assist and actively work in these organisations. But, while
this is true, it is certainly not in our interest to demand that only
Social-Democrats should be eligible for membership in the “trade”
unions, since that would only narrow the scope of our influence upon the
masses. Let every worker who understands the need to unite for the
struggle against the employers and the government join the trade unions.
The very aim of the trade unions would be impossible of achievement, if
they did not unite all who have attained at least this elementary degree
of understanding, if they were not very _broad_ organisations. The
broader these organisations, the broader will be our influence over them
— an influence due, not only to the “spontaneous” development of the
economic struggle, but to the direct and conscious effort of the
socialist trade union members to influence their comrades. But a broad
organisation cannot apply methods of strict secrecy (since this demands
far greater training than is required for the economic struggle). How is
the contradiction between the need for a large membership and the need
for strictly secret methods to be reconciled? How are we to make the
trade unions as public as possible? Generally speaking, there can be
only two ways to this end: either the trade unions become legalised (in
some countries this preceded the legalisation of the socialist and
political unions), or the organisation is kept secret, but so “free” and
amorphous, _lose_^(⁹⁷) as the Germans say, that the need for secret
methods becomes almost negligible as far as the bulk of the members is
concerned.

 

The legalisation of non-socialist and non-political labour unions in
Russia has begun, and there is no doubt that every advance made by our
rapidly growing Social-Democratic working-class movement will multiply
and encourage attempts at legalisation — attempts proceeding for the
most part from supporters of the existing order, but partly also from
the workers themselves and from liberal intellectuals. The banner of
legality has already been hoisted by the Vasilyevs and the Zubatovs.
Support has been promised and rendered by the Ozerovs and the
Wormses,^([21])and followers of the new tendency are now to be found
among the workers. Henceforth, we cannot but reckon with this tendency.
How we are to reckon with it, on this there can be no two opinions among
Social-Democrats. We must steadfastly expose any part played in this
movement by the Zubatovs and the Vasilyeys, the gendarmes and the
priests, and explain their real intentions to the workers. We must also
expose all the conciliatory, “harmonious” notes that will be heard in
the speeches of liberal politicians at legal meetings of the workers,
irrespective of whether the speeches are motivated by an earnest
conviction of the desirability of peaceful class collaboration, by a
desire to curry favour with the powers that be, or whether they are
simply the result of clumsiness. Lastly, we must warn the workers
against the traps often set by the police, who at such open meetings and
permitted societies spy out the “fiery ones” and try to make use of
legal organisations to plant their agents provocateurs in the illegal
organisations.

Doing all this does not at all mean forgetting that in the long run the
legalisation of the working-class movement will be, to our advantage,
and not to that of the Zubatovs. On the contrary, it is precisely our
campaign of exposure that will help us to separate the tares from the
wheat. What the tares are, we have already indicated. By the wheat we
mean attracting the attention of ever larger numbers, including the most
backward sections, of the workers to social and political questions, and
freeing ourselves, the revolutionaries, from functions that are
essentially legal (the distribution of legal books, mutual aid, etc.),
the development of which will inevitably provide us with an increasing
quantity of material for agitation. In this sense, we may, and should,
say to theZubatovs and the Ozerovs: Keep at it, gentlemen, do your best!
Whenever you place a trap in the path of the workers (either by way of
direct provocation, or by the “honest” demoralisation of the workers
with the aid of “Struvism”) we will see to it that you are exposed. But
whenever you take a real step forward, though it be the most “timid
zigzag”, we will say: Please continue! And the only step that can be a
real step forward is a real, if small, extension of the workers’ field
of action. Every such extension will be to our advantage and will help
to hasten the advent of legal societies of the kind in which it will not
be agents provocateurs who are detecting socialists, but socialists who
are gaining adherents. in a word, our task is to fight the tares. It is
not our business to grow wheat in flower-pots. By pulling up the tares,
we clear the soil for the wheat. And while the Afanasy Ivanoviches and
Pulkheria Ivanovnas^(⁹⁸) are tending their flower-pot crops, we must
prepare the reapers, not only to cut down the tares of today, but to
reap the wheat of tomorrow.^(⁹⁹)

 

Thus, we cannot by means of legalisation solve the problem of creating a
trade union organisation that will be as little secret and as extensive
as possible (but we should be extremely glad if the Zubatovs and the
Ozerovs disclosed to us even a partial opportunity for such a solution —
to this end, however, we must strenuously combat them). There remain
secret trade union organisations, and we must give all possible
assistance to the workers who (as we definitely know) are adopting this
course. Trade union organisations, not only can be of tremendous value
in developing and consolidating the economic struggle, but can also
become a very important auxiliary to political agitation and
revolutionary organisation. In order to achieve this purpose, and in
order to guide the nascent trade union movement in the channels desired
by Social-Democracy, we must first understand clearly the absurdity of
the plan of organisation the St. Petersburg Economists have been nursing
for nearly five years. That plan is set forth in the “Rules for a
Workers’ Mutual Benefit Fund” of July 1897 (“Listok” Rabotnika, No.
9-10, p. 46, taken fromRabochaya Mysl, No. 1), as well as in the “Rules
for a Trade Union Workers’ Organisation” of October 1900 (special
leaflet printed in St. Petersburg and referred to in Iskra, No. 1). Both
these sets of rules have one main shortcoming: they set up the broad
workers’ organisation in a rigidly specified structure and confound it
with the organisation of revolutionaries. Let us take the last-mentioned
set of rules, since it is drawn up in greater detail. The body consists
of fifty-two paragraphs. Twenty-three deal with the structure, the
method of functioning, and the competence of the “workers’ circles”,
which are to be organised in every factory (“a maximum of ten persons”)
and which elect “central (factory) groups”. “The central group,” says
paragraph 2, “observes all that goes on in its factory or workshop and
keeps a record of events.” “The central group presents to subscribers a
monthly financial account” (par. 17), etc. Ten paragraphs are devoted to
the “district organisation”, and nineteen to the highly complex
interconnection between the Committee of the Workers’ Organisation and
the Committee of the St. Petersburg League of Struggle (elected
representatives of each district and of the “executive groups” — “groups
of propagandists, groups for maintaining contact with the provinces, and
with the organisation abroad, groups for managing stores; publications,
and funds”).

 

Social-Democracy = “executive groups” in relation to the economic
struggle of the workers! It would be difficult to show more glaringly
how the Economists’ ideas deviate from Social-Democracy to
trade-unionism, and how alien to them is any idea that a Social-Democrat
must concern himself first and foremost with an organisation of
revolutionaries capable of guiding theentire proletarian struggle for
emancipation. To talk of “the political emancipation of the working
class” and of the struggle against “tsarist despotism”, and at the same
time to draft rules like these, means to have no idea whatsoever of the
real political tasks of Social-Democracy. Not one of the fifty or so
paragraphs reveals even a glimmer of understanding that it is necessary
to conduct the widest possible political agitation among the masses, an
agitation highlighting every aspect of Russian absolutism and the
specific features of the various social classes in Russia. Rules like
these are of no use even for the achievement of trade union, let alone
political, aims, since trade unions are organised by trades, of which no
mention is made.

 

But most characteristic, perhaps, is the amazing top-heaviness of the
whole “system”, which attempts to bind each single factory and its
“committee” by a permanent string of uniform and ludicrously petty rules
and a three-stage system of election. Hemmed in by the narrow outlook of
Economism, the mind is lost in details that positively reek of red tape
and bureaucracy. In practice, of course, three-fourths of the clauses
are never applied; on the other hand, a “secret” organisation of this
kind, with its central group in each factory, makes it very easy for the
gendarmes to carry out raids on a vast scale. The Polish cornrades have
passed through a similar phase in their movement, with everybody
enthusiastic about the extensive organisation of workers’ benefit funds;
but they very quickly abandoned this idea when they saw that such
organisations only provided rich harvests for the gendarmes. If we have
in mind broad workers’ organisations, and not widespread arrests, if we
do not want to provide satisfaction to the gendarmes, we must see to it
that these organisations remain without any rigid formal structure. But
will they be able to function in that case?

 

Let us see what the functions are: “. . . To observe all that goes on in
the factory and keep a record of events” (par. 2 of the Rules). Do we
really require a formally established group for this purpose? Could not
the purpose be better served by correspondence conducted in the illegal
papers without the setting up of special groups? “. . . To lead the
struggles of the workers for the improvement of their workshop
conditions” (par. 3). This, too, requires no set organisational form.
Any sensible agitator can in the course of ordinary conversation gather
what the demands of the workers are and transmit them to a narrow — not
a broad — organisation of revolutionaries for expression in a leaflet. “
... To organise a fund ... to which subscriptions of two kopeks
per ruble^(¹⁰⁰) should be made” (par. 9) — and then to present to
subscribers a monthly financial account (par. 17), to expel members who
fail to pay their contributions (par. 10), and so forth. Why, this is a
very paradise for the police; for nothing would be easier for them than
to penetrate into such a secrecy of a “central factory fund”, confiscate
the money, and arrest the best people. Would it not be simpler to issue
one-kopek or two-kopek coupons bearing the official stamp of a
well-known (very narrow and very secret) organisation, or to make
collections without coupons of any kind and to print reports in a
certain agreed code in an illegal paper? The object would thereby be
attained, but it would be a hundred times more difficult for the
gendarmes to pick up clues.

 

I could go on analysing the Rules, but I think that what has been said
will suffice. A small, compact core of the most reliable, experienced,
and hardened workers, with responsible representatives in the principal
districts and connected by all the rules of strict secrecy with the
organisation of revolutionaries, can, with the widest support of the
masses and without any formal organisation, perform all the functions of
a trade union organisation, in a manner, moreover, desirable to
Social-Democracy. Only in this way can we secure the consolidation and
development of a Social-Democratic trade union movement, despite all the
gendarmes.

 

It may be objected that an organisation which is so lose that it is not
even definitely formed, and which has not even an enrolled and
registered membership, cannot be called an organisation at all. Perhaps
so. Not the name is important. What is important is that this
“organisation without members” shall do everything that is required, and
from the very outset ensure a solid connection between our future trade
unions and socialism. Only an incorrigible utopian would have
a broad organisation of workers, with elections, reports, universal
suffrage, etc., under the autocracy.

 

The moral to be drawn from this is simple. If we begin with the solid
foundation of a strong organisation of revolutionaries, we can ensure
the stability of the movement as a whole and carry out the aims both of
Social-Democracy and of trade unions proper. If, however, we begin with
a broad workers’ organisation, which is supposedly most “accessible” to
the masses (but which is actually most accessible to the gendarmes and
makes revolutionaries most accessible to the police), we shall achieve
neither the one aim nor the other; we shall not eliminate our
rule-of-thumb methods, and, because we remain scattered and our forces
are constantly broken up by the police, we shall only make trade unions
of the Zubatov and Ozerov type the more accessible to the masses.

 

What, properly speaking, should be the functions of the organisation of
revolutionaries? We shall deal with this question in detail. First,
however, let us examine a very typical argument advanced by our
terrorist, who (sad fate!) in this matter also is a next-door neighbour
to the Economist. Svoboda, a journal published for workers, contains in
its first issue an article entitled “Organisation”, the author of which
tries to defend his friends, the Economist workers of
Ivanovo-Voznesensk. He writes:

 

“It is bad when the masses are mute and unenlightened, when the movement
does not come from the rank and file. For instance, the students of a
university town leave for their homes during the summer and other
holidays, and immediately the workers’ movement comes to a standstill.
Can a workers’ movement which has to be pushed on from outside be a real
force? No, indeed.... It has not yet learned to walk, it is still in
leading-strings. So it is in all matters. The students go off, and
everything comes to a standstill. The most capable are seized; the cream
is skimmed and the milk turns sour. If the ’committee’ is arrested,
everything comes to a standstill until a new one can he formed. And one
never knows what sort of committee will be set up next — it may be
nothing like the former. The first said one thing, the second may say
the very opposite. Continuity between yesterday and tomorrow is broken,
the experience of the past does not serve as a guide for the future. And
all because no roots have been struck in depth, in the masses; the work
is carried on not by a hundred fools, but by a dozen wise men. A dozen
wise men can be wiped out at a snap, but when the organisation embraces
masses, everything proceeds from them, and nobody, however he tries, can
wreck the cause” (p. 63).

 

The facts are described correctly. The picture of our amateurism is well
drawn. But the conclusions are worthy of Rabochaya Mysl, both as regards
their stupidity and their lack of political tact. They represent the
height of stupidity, because the author confuses the philosophical and
social-historical question of the “depth” of the “roots” of the movement
with the technical and organisational question of the best method in
combating the gendarmes. They represent the height of political
tactlessness, because, instead of appealing from bad leaders to good
leaders, the author appeals from the leaders in general to the “masses”.
This is as much an attempt to drag us back organisationally as the idea
of substituting excitative terrorism for political agitation drags us
back politically. Indeed, I am experiencing a veritable embarras de
richesses, and hardly know where to begin to disentangle the jumble
offered up by Svoboda. For clarity, let me begin by citing an example.
Take the Germans. It will not be denied, I hope, that theirs is a mass
organisation, that in Germany everything proceeds from the masses, that
the working-class movement there has learned to walk. Yet observe how
these millions value their “dozen” tried political leaders, how firmly
they cling to them. Members of the hostile parties in parliament have
often taunted the socialists by exclaiming: “Fine democrats you are
indeed! Yours is a working-class movement only in name; in actual fact
the same clique of leaders is always in evidence, the same Bebel and the
same Liebknecht, year in and year out, and that goes on for decades.
Your supposedly elected workers’ deputies are more permanent than the
officials appointed by the Emperor!” But the Germans only smile with
contempt at these demagogic attempts to set the “masses” against the
“leaders”, to arouse bad and ambitious instincts in the former, and to
rob the movement of its solidity and stability by undermining the
confidence of the masses in their “dozen wise men”. Political thinking
is sufficiently developed among the Germans, and they have accumulated
sufficient political experience to understand that without the “dozen”
tried and talented leaders (and talented men are not born by the
hundreds), professionally trained, schooled by long experience, and
working in perfect harmony, no class in modern society can wage a
determined struggle. The Germans too have had demagogues in their ranks
who have flattered the “hundred fools”, exalted them above the
“dozen wise men”, extolled the “horny hand” of the masses, and (like
Most and Hasselmann) have spurred them on to reckless “revolutionary”
action and sown distrust towards the firm and steadfast leaders. It was
only by stubbornly and relentlessly combating all demagogic elements
within the socialist movement that German socialism has managed to grow
and become as strong as it is. Our wiseacres, however, at a time when
Russian Social-Democracy is passing through a crisis entirely due to the
lack of sufficiently trained, developed, and experienced leaders to
guide the spontaneously awakening masses, cry out ,with the profundity
of fools: “It is a bad business when the movement does not proceed from
the rank and file.”

 

“A committee of students is of no use; it is not stable.” Quite true.
But the conclusion to be drawn from this is that we must have a
committee of professional revolutionaries, and it is immaterial whether
a student or a worker is capable of becoming a professional
revolutionary. The conclusion you draw, how. ever, is that the
working-class movement must not be pushed on from outside! In your
political innocence you fail to notice that you are playing into the
hands of our Economists and fostering our amateurism. Wherein, may I
ask, did our students “push on” our workers? In the sense that the
student brought to the worker the fragments of political knowledge he
himself possesses, the crumbs of socialist ideas he has managed to
acquire (for the principal intellectual diet of the present-day student,
legal Marxism, could furnish only the rudiments, only scraps of
knowledge). There has never been too much of such “pushing on from
outside”; on the contrary, there has so far been all too little of it in
our movement, for we have been stewing too assiduously in our own juice;
we have bowed far too slavishly to the elementary “economic struggle of
the workers against the employers and the government”. We professional
revolutionaries must and will make it our business to engage in this
kind of “pushing on” a hundred times more forcibly than we have done
hitherto. But the very fact that you select so hideous a phrase as
“pushing on from outside” — a phrase which cannot but rouse in the
workers (at least in the workers who are as unenlightened as you
yourselves) a sense of distrust towards all who bring them political
knowledge and revolutionary experience from outside, which cannot but
rouse in them an instinctive desire to resist all such people — proves
you to be demagogues, and demagogues are the worst enemies of the
working class.

 

And, please — don’t hasten howling about my “uncomradely methods” of
debating. I have not the least desire to doubt the purity of your
intentions. As I have said, one may become a demagogue out of sheer
political innocence. But I have shown that you have descended to
demagogy, and I will never tire of repeating that demagogues are the
worst enemies of the working class. The worst enemies, because they
arouse base instincts in the masses, because the unenlightened worker is
unable to recognise his enemies in men who represent themselves, and
sometimes sincerely so, as his friends. The worst enemies, because in
the period of disunity and vacillation, when our movement is just
beginning to take shape, nothing is easier than to employ demagogic
methods to mislead the masses, who can realise their error only later by
bitter experience. That is why the slogan of the day for the Russian
Social-Democrat must be — resolute struggle against Svoboda
and Rabocheye Dyelo, both of which have sunk to the level of demagogy.
We shall deal with this further in greater detail.^(¹⁰¹)

 

“A dozen wise men can be more easily wiped out than a hundred fools.”
This wonderful truth (for which the hundred fools will always applaud
you) appears obvious only because in the very midst of the argument you
have skipped from one question to another. You began by talking and
continued to talk of the unearthing of a “committee”, of the unearthing
of an “organisation”, and now you skip to the question of unearthing the
movement’s “roots” in their “depths”. The fact is, of course, that our
movement cannot be unearthed, for the very reason that it has countless
thousands of roots deep down among the masses; but that is not the point
at issue. As far as “deep roots” are concerned, we cannot be “unearthed”
even now, despite all our amateurism, and yet we all complain, and
cannot but complain, that the “organisations” are being unearthed and as
a result it is impossible to maintain continuity in the movement. But
since you raise the question of organisations being unearthed and
persist in your opinion, I assert that it is far more difficult to
unearth a dozen wise men than a hundred fools. This position I will
defend, no matter how much you instigate the masses against me for my
“anti-democratic” views, etc. As I have stated repeatedly, by “wise
men”, in connection with organisation, I mean professional
revolutionaries, irrespective of whether they have developed from among
students or working men. I assert: (1) that no revolutionary movement
can endure without a stable organisation of leaders maintaining
continuity; (2) that the broader the popular mass drawn spontaneously
into the struggle, which forms the basis of the movement and
participates in it, the more urgent the need for such an organisation,
and the more solid this organisation must be (for it is much easier for
all sorts of demagogues to side-track the more backward sections of the
masses); (3) that such an organisation must consist chiefly of people
professionally engaged in revolutionary activity; (4) that in an
autocratic state, the more we confine the membership of such an
organisation to people who are professionally engaged in revolutionary
activity and who have been professionally trained in the art of
combating the political police, the more difficult will it be to unearth
the organisation; and (5) the greater will be the number of people from
the working class and from the other social classes who will be able to
join the movement and perform active work in it.

 

I invite our Economists, terrorists, and
“Economists-terrorists”^(¹⁰²) to confute these propositions. At the
moment, I shall deal only with the last two points. The question as to
whether it is easier to wipe out “a dozen wisemen” or “a hundred fools”
reduces itself to the question, above considered, whether it is possible
to have a mass organisation when the maintenance of strict secrecy is
essential. We can never give a mass organisation that degree of secrecy
without which there can be no question of persistent and continuous
struggle against the government. To concentrate all secret functions in
the hands of as small a number of professional revolutionaries as
possible does not mean that the latter will “do the thinking for all”
and that the rank and file will not take an active part in the movement.
On the contrary, the membership will promote increasing numbers of the
professional revolutionaries from its ranks; for it will know that it is
not enough for a few students and for a few working men waging the
economic struggle to gather in order to form a “committee”, but that it
takes years to train oneself to be a professional revolutionary; and the
rank and file will “think”, not only of amateurish methods, but of such
training. Centralisation of the secret functions of the organisation by
no means implies centralisation of all the functions of the movement.
Active participation of the widest masses in the illegal press will not
diminish because a “dozen” professional revolutionaries centralise the
secret functions connected with this work; on the contrary, it
will increase tenfold. In this way, and in this way alone, shall we
ensure that reading the illegal press, writing for it, and to some
extent even distributing it, willalmost cease to be secret work, for the
police will soon come to realise the folly and impossibility of judicial
and administrative red-tape procedure over every copy of a publication
that is being distributed in the thousands. This holds not only for the
press, but for every function of the movement, even for demonstrations.
The active and widespread participation of the masses will not suffer;
on the contrary, it will benefit by the fact that a “dozen” experienced
revolutionaries, trained professionally no less than the police, will
centralise all the secret aspects of the work — the drawing up of
leaflets, the working out of approximate plans; and the appointing of
bodies of leaders for each urban district, for each institution, etc. (I
know that exception will be taken to my “undemocratic” views, but I
shall reply below fully to this anything but intelligent objection.)
Centralisation of the most secret functions in an organisation of
revolutionaries will not diminish, but rather increase the extent and
enhance the quality of the activity of a large number of other
organisations that are intended for a broad public and are therefore as
loose and as non-secret as possible, such as workers’ trade unions;
workers’ self-education circles and circles for reading illegal
literature; and socialist, as well as democratic, circles
among all other sections of the population; etc., etc. We must have such
circles, trade unions, and organisations everywhere in as large a number
as possible and with the widest variety of functions; but it would be
absurd and harmful to confound them with the organisation
of revolutionaries, to efface the border-line between them, to make
still more hazy the all too faint recognition of the fact that in order
to “serve” the mass movement we must have people who will devote
themselves exclusively to Social-Democratic activities, and that such
people must train themselves patiently and steadfastly to be
professional revolutionaries.

 

Yes, this recognition is incredibly dim. Our worst sin with regard to
organisation consists in the fact that by our primitiveness we have
lowered the prestige of revolutionaries in Russia. A person who is
flabby and shaky on questions of theory, who has a narrow outlook, who
pleads the spontaneity of the masses as an excuse for his own
sluggishness, who resembles a trade union secretary more than a
spokesman of the people, who is unable to conceive of a broad and bold
plan that would command the respect even of opponents, and who is
inexperienced and clumsy in his own professional art — the art of
combating the political police — such a man is not a revolutionary, but
a wretched amateur!

 

Let no active worker take offence at these frank remarks, for as far as
insufficient training is concerned, I apply them first and foremost to
myself. I used to work in a study circle^(¹⁰³) that set itself very
broad, all-embracing tasks; and all of us, members of that circle,
suffered painfully and acutely from the realisation that we were acting
as amateurs at a moment in history when we might have been able to say,
varying a well-known statement: “Give us an organisation of
revolutionaries, and we will overturn Russia” The more I recall the
burning sense of shame I then experienced, the bitterer become my
feelings towards those pseudo-Social-Democrats whose preachings “bring
disgrace on the calling of a revolutionary”, who fail to understand that
our task is not to champion the degrading of the revolutionary to the
level of an amateur, but to raise the amateurs to the level of
revolutionaries.

 


4.4 The Scope of Organisational Work

 

We have heard B-v tell us about “the lack of revolutionary forces fit
for action which is felt not only in St. Petersburg, but throughout
Russia”. Hardly anyone will dispute this fact. But the question is, how
is it to be explained? B-v writes:

 

“We shall not go into an explanation of the historical causes of this
phenomenon; we shall merely state that a society, demoralised by
prolonged political reaction and split by past and present economic
changes, promotes from its own ranks an _extremely small number of
persons fit for revolutionary work_; that the working class does produce
revolutionary workers who to some extent reinforce the ranks of the
illegal organisations, but that the number of such revolutionaries is
inadequate to meet the requirements of the times. This is all the more
so because the worker who spends eleven and a half hours a day in the
factory is in such a position that he can, in the main, perform only the
functions of an agitator; but propaganda and organisation, the delivery
and reproduction of illegal literature, the issuance of leaflets, etc.,
are duties which must necessarily fall mainly upon the shoulders of an
extremely small force of intellectuals” (_Rabocheye Dyelo_, No. 6, pp.
38-39).

 

On many points we disagree with B-v, particularly with those we have
emphasised, which most saliently reveal that, although weary of our
amateurism (as is every thinking practical worker), B-v cannot find the
way out of this intolerable situation because he is weighted down by
Economism. The fact is that society produces very many persons fit for
“the cause”, but we are unable to make use of them all. The critical,
transitional state of our movement in this respect may be formulated as
follows: There are no people — yet there is a mass of people. There is a
mass of people, because the working class and increasingly varied social
strata, year after year, produce from their ranks an increasing number
of discontented people who desire to protest, who are ready to render
all the assistance they can in the struggle against absolutism, the
intolerableness of which, though not yet recognised by all, is more and
more acutely sensed by increasing masses of the people. At the same
time, we have no people, because we have no leaders, no political
leaders, no talented organisers capable of arranging. extensive and at
the same time uniform and harmonious work that would employ all forces,
even the most inconsiderable. “The growth and development of the
revolutionary organisations” lag, not only behind the growth of the
working-class movement, which even B-v admits, but behind that of the
general democratic movement among all strata of the people. (In passing,
probably B-V would now regard this as supplementing his conclusion.) The
scope of revolutionary work is too narrow, as compared with the breadth
of the spontaneous basis of the movement. It is too hemmed in by the
wretched theory of “economic struggle against the employers and the
government”. Yet, at the present time, not only Social-Democratic
political agitators, but Social-Democratic organisers must “go among all
classes of the population”.^(¹⁰⁴) There is hardly a single practical
worker who will doubt that the Social-Democrats could distribute the
thousand and one minute functions of their organisational work among
individual representatives of the most varied classes. Lack of
specialisation is one of the most serious defects of our technique,
about which B-v justly and bitterly complains. The smaller each separate
“operation” in our common cause the more people we can find capable of
carrying out such operations (people who, in the majority of cases, are
completely incapable of becoming professional revolutionaries); more
difficult will it be for the police to “net” all these “detail workers”,
and the more difficult will it be for them to frame up, out of an arrest
for some petty affair, a “case” that would justify the government’s
expenditure on “security”. As for the number of people ready to help us,
we referred in the preceding chapter to the gigantic change that has
taken place in this respect in the last five years or so. On the other
hand, in order to unite all these tiny fractions into one whole, in
order not to break up the movement while breaking up its functions, and
in order to imbue the people who carry out the minute functions with the
conviction that their work is necessary and important, without which
conviction they will never do the work,^(¹⁰⁵) it is necessary to have a
strong organisation of tried revolutionaries. The more secret such an
organisation is, the stronger and more widespread will be the confidence
in the Party. As we know, in time of war, it is not only of the utmost
importance to imbue one’s own army with confidence in its strength, but
it is important also to convince the enemy and all neutral elements of
this strength; friendly neutrality may sometimes decide the issue. If
such an organisation existed, one built up on a firm theoretical
foundation and possessing a Social-Democratic organ, we should have no
reason to fear that the movement might be diverted from its path by the
numerous “outside” elements that are attracted to it. (On the contrary,
it is precisely at the present time, with amateurism prevalent, that we
see many Social-Democrats leaning towards the Credo and only imagining
that they are Social Democrats.) In a word, specialisation necessarily
presupposes centralisation, and in turn imperatively calls for it.

 

But B-v himself, who has so excellently described the necessity for
specialisation, underestimates its importance, in our opinion, in the
second part of the argument we have quoted. The number of working-class
revolutionaries is inadequate, he says. This is perfectly true, and once
again we stress that the “valuable communication of a close observer”
fully confirms our view of the causes of the present crisis in
Social-Democracy, and, consequently, of the means required to overcome
it. Not only are revolutionaries in general lagging behind the
spontaneous awakening of the masses, but even worker-revolutionaries are
lagging behind the spontaneous awakening of the working-class masses.
This fact confirms with clear evidence, from the “practical” point of
view, too, not only the absurdity but even the politically reactionary
nature of the “pedagogics” to which we are so often treated in the
discussion of our duties to the workers. This fact proves that our very
first and most pressing duty is to help to train working-class
revolutionaries who will he on the same level in regard to Party
activity as the revolutionaries from amongst the intellectuals (we
emphasise the words “in regard to Party activity”, for, although
necessary, it is neither so easy nor so pressingly necessary to bring
the workers up to the level of intellectuals in other respects).
Attention, therefore, must be devoted principally to raising the workers
to the level of revolutionaries; it is not at all our taskto descend to
the level of the “working masses” as the Economists wish to do, or to
the level of the “average worker” as Svoboda desires to do (and by this
ascends to the second grade of Economist “pedagogics”). I am far from
denying the necessity for popular literature for the workers, and
especially popular (of course, not vulgar) literature for the especially
backward workers. But what annoys me is this constant confusion of
pedagogics with questions of politics and organisation. You, gentlemen,
who are so much concerned about the “average worker”, as a matter of
fact, rather insult the workers by your desire to talk down to them when
discussing working-class politics and working-class organisation. Talk
about serious things in a serious manner; leave pedagogics to the
pedagogues, and not to politicians and organisers! Are there not
advanced people, “average people”, and “masses” among the intelligentsia
too? Does not everyone recognise that popular literature is also
required for the intelligentsia, and is not such literature written?
Imagine someone, in an article on organising college or high-school
students, repeating over and over again, as if he had made a new
discovery, that first of all we must have an organisation of “average
students”. The author of such an article would be ridiculed, and rightly
so. Give us your ideas on organisation, if you have any, he would be
told, and we ourselves will decide who is “average”, who above average,
and who below. But if you have no organisational ideas of your own, then
all your exertions in behalf of the “masses” and “average people” will
be simply boring. You must realise that these questions of “politics”
and “organisation” are so serious in themselves that they cannot be
dealt with in any other but a serious way. We can and
must educate workers (and university and Gymnasium students) so that
we may be able to discuss these questions with them. But once you do
bring up these questions, you must give real replies to them; do not
fall back on the “average”, or on the “masses”; do not try to dispose of
the matter with facetious remarks and mere phrases.^(¹⁰⁶)

 

To be fully prepared for his task, the worker-revolutionary must
likewise become a professional revolutionary. Hence B-v is wrong in
saying that since the worker spends eleven and a half hours in the
factory, the brunt of all other revolutionary functions (apart from
agitation) “must necessarily fall mainly upon the shoulders of an
extremely small force of intellectuals”. But this condition does not
obtain out of sheer “necessity”. It obtains because we are backward,
because we do not recognise our duty to assist every capable worker to
become a professional agitator, organiser, propagandist, literature
distributor, etc., etc. In this respect, we waste our strength in a
positively shameful manner; we lack the ability to husband that which
should be tended and reared with special care. Look at the Germans:
their forces are a hundredfold greater than ours. But they understand
perfectly well that really capable agitators, etc., are not often
promoted from the ranks of the “average”. For this reason they
immediately try to place every capable working man in conditions that
will enable him to develop and apply his abilities to the fullest: he is
made a professional agitator, he is encouraged to widen the field of his
activity, to spread it from one factory to the whole of the industry,
from a single locality to the whole country. He acquires experience and
dexterity in his profession; he broadens his outlook and increases his
knowledge; he observes at close quarters the prominent political leaders
from other localities and of other parties; he strives to rise to their
level and combine in himself the knowledge of the working-class
environment and the freshness of socialist convictions with professional
skill, without which. the proletariat cannot wage a stubborn struggle
against its excellently trained enemies. In this way alone do the
working masses produce men of the stamp of Bebel and Auer. But what is
to a great extent automatic in a politically free country must in Russia
be done deliberately and systematically by our organisations. A
worker-agitator who is at all gifted and “promising” must not be left to
work eleven hours a day in a factory. We must arrange that he be
maintained by the Party; that he may go underground in good time; that
he change the place of his activity, if he is to enlarge his experience,
widen his outlook, and be able to hold out for at least a few years in
the struggle against the gendarmes. As the spontaneous rise of their
movement becomes broader and deeper, the working-class masses promote
from their ranks not only an increasing number of talented agitators,
but also talented organisers, propagandists, and “practical workers” in
the best sense of the term (of whom there are so few among our
intellectuals who, for the most part, in the Russian manner, are
somewhat careless and sluggish in their habits). When we have forces of
specially trained worker-revolutionaries who have gone through extensive
preparation (and, of course, revolutionaries “of all arms of the
service”), no political police in the world will then be able to contend
with them, for these forces, boundlessly devoted to the revolution, will
enjoy the boundless confidence of the widest masses of the workers. We
are directly to blame for doing too little to “stimulate” the workers to
take this path, common to them and to the “intellectuals”, of
professional revolutionary training, and for all too often dragging them
back by our silly speeches about what is “accessible” to the masses of
the workers, to the “average workers”, etc.

 

In this, as in other respects, the narrow scope of our organisational
work is without a doubt due directly to the fact (although the
overwhelming majority of the “Economists” and the novices in practical
work do not perceive it) that we restrict our theories and our political
tasks to a narrow field. Subservience to spontaneity seems to inspire a
fear of taking even one step away from what is “accessible” to the
masses, a fear of rising too high above mere attendance on the immediate
and direct requirements of the masses. Have no fear, gentlemen! Remember
that we stand so low on the plane of organisation that the very idea
that we could rise _too_ high is absurd!

 


4.5 “Conspiratorial” Organisation and “Democratism”

 

Yet there are many people among us who are so sensitive to the “voice of
life” that they fear it more than anything in the world and charge the
adherents of the views here expounded with following a Narodnaya Volya
line, with failing to understand “democratism”, etc. These accusations,
which, of course, have been echoed by _Rabocheye Dyelo_, need to be
dealt with.

 

The writer of these lines knows very well that the St. Petersburg
Economists levelled the charge of Narodnaya Volya tendencies also
against _Rabochaya Gazeta_ (which is quite understandable when one
compares it with _Rabochaya Mysl_). We were not in the least surprised,
therefore, when, soon after the appearance of _Iskra_, a comrade
informed us that the Soclal-Democrats in the town of X
describe _Iskra_ as a Narodnaya Volya organ. We, of course, were
flattered by this accusation; for what decent Social-Democrat has not
been accused by the Economists of being a Narodnaya Volya sympathiser?

 

These accusations are the result of a twofold misunderstanding. First,
the history of the revolutionary movement is so little known among us
that the name “Narodnaya Volya” is used to denote any idea of a militant
centralised organisation which declares determined war upon tsarism. But
the magnificent organisation that the revolutionaries had in the
seventies, and that should serve us as a model, was not established by
the Narodnaya Volya, but by the _Zemlya i Volya_, which split up into
the Chorny Peredel and the Narodnaya Volya. Consequently, to regard a
militant revolutionary organisation as something specifically Narodnaya
Volya in character is absurd both historically and logically;
for _no_ revolutionary trend, if it seriously thinks of struggle, can
dispense with such an organisation. The mistake the Narodnaya Volya
committed was not in striving to enlist all the discontented in the
organisation and to direct this organisation to resolute struggle
against the autocracy; on the contrary, that was its great historical
merit. The mistake was in relying on a theory which in substance was not
a revolutionary theory at all, and the Narodnaya Volya members either
did not know how, or were unable, to link their movement inseparably
with the class struggle in the developing capitalist society. Only a
gross failure to understand Marxism (or an “understanding” of it in the
spirit of “Struveism”) could prompt the opinion that the rise of a mass,
spontaneous working-class movement _relieves_ us of the duty of creating
as good an organisation of revolutionaries as the Zemlya i Volya had,
or, indeed, an incomparably better one. On the contrary, this
movement _imposes_ the duty upon us; for the spontaneous struggle of the
proletariat will not become its genuine “class struggle” until this
struggle is led by a strong organisation of revolutionaries.

 

Secondly, many people, including apparently B. Krichevsky (Rabocheye
Dyelo, No. 10, p. 18), misunderstand the polemics that Social-Democrats
have always waged against the “conspiratorial” view of the political
struggle. We have always protested, and will, of course, continue to
protest against confining the political struggle to
conspiracy.^(¹⁰⁷) But this does not, of course, mean that we deny the
need for a strong revolutionary organisation. Thus, in the pamphlet
mentioned in the preceding footnote, after the polemics against reducing
the political struggle to a conspiracy, a description is given (as a
Social-Democratic ideal) of an organisation so strong as to be able to
“resort to. . .rebellion” and to every other form of attack, in order to
“deliver a smashing blow against absolutism”.^(¹⁰⁸) In form such a
strong revolutionary organisation in an autocratic country may also be
described as a “conspiratorial” organisation, because the French word
“conspiration” is the equivalent of the Russian word “zagovar”
(“conspiracy”), and such an organisation must have the utmost secrecy.
Secrecy is such a necessary condition for this kind of organisation that
all the other conditions (number and selection of members, functions,
etc.) must be made to conform to it. It would be extremely naive indeed,
therefore, to fear the charge that we Social-Democrats desire to create
a conspiratorial organisation. Such a charge should be as flattering to
every opponent of Economism as the charge of following a Narodnaya Volya
line.

 

The objection may be raised that such a powerful and strictly secret
organisation, which concentrates in its hands all the threads of secret
activities, an organisation which of necessity is centralised, may too
easily rush into a premature attack, may thoughtlessly intensify the
movement before the growth of political discontent, the intensity of the
ferment and anger of the working class, etc., have made such an attack
possible and necessary. Our reply to this is: Speaking abstractly, it
cannot be denied, of course, that a militant organisation may
thoughtlessly engage in battle, which may end in a defeat entirely
avoidable under other conditions. But we cannot confine ourselves to
abstract reasoning on such a question, because every battle bears within
itself the abstract possibility of defeat, and there is no way
of reducing this possibility except by organised preparation for battle.
If, however, we proceed from the concrete conditions at present
obtaining in Russia, we must come to the positive conclusion that a
strong revolutionary organisation is absolutely necessary precisely for
the purpose of giving stability to the movement and ofsafeguarding it
against the possibility of making thoughtless attacks. Precisely at the
present time, when no such organisation yet exists, and when the
revolutionary movement is rapidly and spontaneously growing, we already
observe two opposite extremes (which, as is to be expected, “meet”).
These are: the utterly unsound Economism and the preaching of
moderation, and the equally unsound “excitative terror”, which strives
“artificially to call forth symptoms of the end of the movement, which
is developing and strengthening itself, when this movement is as yet
nearer to the start than to the end” (V. Zasulich, in Zarya, No. 2-3, p.
353). And the instance of Rabocheye Dyelo shows that there exist
Social-Democrats who give way to both these extremes. This is not
surprising, for, apart from other reasons, the “economic struggle
against the employers and the government” can never satisfy
revolutionaries, and opposite extremes will therefore always appear here
and there. Only a centralised, militant organisation that consistently
carries out a Social-Democratic policy, that satisfies, so to speak, all
revolutionary instincts and strivings, can safeguard the movement
against making thoughtless attacks and prepare attacks that hold out the
promise of success.

 

A further objection may be raised, that the views on organisation here
expounded contradict the “democratic principle”. Now, while the earlier
accusation was specifically Russian in origin, this one is specifically
foreign in character. And only an organisation abroad (the Union of
Russian Social-Democrats Abroad) was capable of giving its Editorial
Board instructions like the following:

 

“Organisational Principle. In order to secure the successful development
and unification of Social-Democracy, the broad democratic principle of
Party organisation must be emphasised, developed, and fought for; this
is particularly necessary in view of the anti-democratic tendencies that
have revealed themselves in the ranks of our Party” (Two Conferences, p.
18).

 

We shall see in the next chapter how Rabocheye Dyelo combats Iskra’s
“anti-democratic tendencies”. For the present, we shall examine more
closely the “principle” that the Economists advance. Everyone will
probably agree that “the broad democratic principle” presupposes the two
following conditions: first, full publicity, and secondly, election to
all offices. It would be absurd to speak of democracy without publicity,
moreover, without a publicity that is not limited to the membership of
the organisation. We call the German Socialist Party a democratic
organisation because all its activities are carried out publicly; even
its party congresses are held in public. But no one would call an
organisation democratic that is hidden from every one but its members by
a veil of secrecy. What is the use, then, of advancing
“the broad democratic principle” when the fundamental condition for this
principle cannot be fulfilled by a secret organisation? “The broad
principle” proves itself simply to be a resounding but hollow phrase.
Moreover, it reveals a total lack of understanding of the urgent tasks
of the moment in regard to organisation. Everyone knows how great the
lack of secrecy is among the “broad” masses of our revolutionaries. We
have heard the bitter complaints of B-v on this score and his absolutely
just demand for a “strict selection of members” (Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 6,
p. 42). Yet, persons who boast a keen “sense of realities” urge, in a
situation like this, not the strictest secrecy and the strictest
(consequently, more restricted) selection, of members, but “the
broad democratic principle”! This is what you call being wide of the
mark.

 

Nor is the situation any better with regard to the second attribute of
democracy, the principle of election. In politically free countries,
this condition is taken for granted. “They are members of the Party who
accept the principles of the Party programme and render the Party all
possible support,” reads Clause 1 of the Rules of the German
Social-Democratic Party. Since the entire political arena is as open to
the public view as is a theatre stage to the audience, this acceptance
or non-acceptance, support or opposition, is known to all from the press
and from public meetings. Everyone knows that a certain political figure
began in such and such a way, passed through such and such an evolution,
behaved in a trying moment in such and such a manner, and possesses such
and such qualities; consequently, all party members, knowing all the
facts, can elect or refuse to elect this person to a particular party
office. The general control (in the literal sense of the term) exercised
over every act of a party man in the political field brings into
existence an automatically operating mechanism which produces what in
biology is called the “survival of the fittest”. “Natural selection” by
full publicity, election, and general control provides the assurance
that, in the last analysis, every political figure will be “in his
proper place”, do the work for which lie is best fitted by his powers
and abilities, feel the effects of his mistakes on himself, and prove
before all the world his ability to recognise mistakes and to avoid
them.

 

Try to fit this picture into the frame of our autocracy! Is it
conceivable in Russia for all who accept the principles of the Party
programme and render the Party all possible support to control every
action of the revolutionary working in secret? Is it possible for all to
elect one of these revolutionaries to any particular office, when, in
the very interests of the work, the revolutionary must conceal his
identity from nine out of ten of these “all”? Reflect somewhat over the
real meaning of the high-sounding phrases to which Rabocheye Dyelo gives
utterance, and you will realise that “broad democracy” in Party
organisation, amidst the gloom of the autocracy and the domination of
gendarmerie, is nothing more than a useless and harmful toy. It is a
useless toy because, in point of fact, no revolutionary organisation has
ever practiced, or could practice, broad democracy, however much it may
have desired to do so. It is a harmful toy because any attempt to
practise “the broad democratic principle” will simply facilitate the
work of the police in carrying out large-scale raids, will perpetuate
the prevailing primitiveness, and will divert the thoughts of the
practical workers from the serious and pressing task of training
themselves to become professional revolutionaries to that of drawing up
detailed “paper” rules for election systems. Only abroad, where very
often people with no opportunity for conducting really active work
gather, could this “playing at democracy” develop here and there,
especially in small groups.

 

To show the unseemliness of Rabocheye Dyelo’s favourite trick of
advancing the plausible “principle” of democracy in revolutionary
affairs, we shall again summon a witness. This witness, Y. Serebryakov,
editor of the London magazine, Nakanune, has a soft spot for Rabocheye
Dyelo and is filled with a great hatred for Plekhanov and the
“Plekhanovites”. In its articles on the split in the Union of Russian
Social-Democrats Abroad, Nakanune definitely sided with Rabocheye
Dyelo and poured a stream of petty abuse upon Plekhanov. All the more
valuable, therefore, is this witness in the question at issue.
In Nakanune for July (No. 7) 1899, an article entitled “Concerning the
Manifesto of the Self-Emancipation of the Workers Group”, Serebryakov
argued that it was “indecent” to talk about such things as
“self-deception, leadership, and the so-called Areopagus in a serious
revolutionary movement” and, inter alia, wrote:

 

“Myshkin, Rogachov, Zhelyabov, Mikhailov, Perovskaya, Figner, and others
never regarded themselves as leaders, and no one ever elected or
appointed them as such, although in actuality, they were leaders,
because, in the propaganda period, as well as in the period of the
struggle against the government, they took the brunt of the work upon
themselves, they went into the most dangerous places, and
their activities were the most fruitful. They became leaders, not
because they wished it, but because the comrades surrounding them had
confidence in their wisdom, in their energy, in their loyalty. To be
afraid of some kind of Areopagus (if it is not feared, why write about
it?) that would arbitrarily govern the movement is far too naive. Who
would pay heed to it?”

 

We ask the reader, in what way does the “Areopagus” differ from
“anti-democratic tendencies”? And is it not evident that Rabocheye
Dyelo’s “plausible” organisational principle is equally naive and
indecent; naive, because no one would pay heed to the “Areopagus”, or
people with “anti- democratic tendencies”, if “the comrades surrounding
them had” no “confidence in their wisdom, energy, and loyalty”;
indecent, because it is a demagogic sally calculated to play on the
conceit of some, on the ignorance of others regarding the actual state
of our movement, and on the lack of training and the ignorance of the
history of the revolutionary movement on the part of still others. The
only serious organisational principle for the active workers of our
movement should be the strictest secrecy, the strictest selection of
members, and the training of professional revolutionaries. Given these
qualities, something even more than “democratism” would be guaranteed to
us, namely, complete, comradely, mutual confidence among
revolutionaries. This is absolutely essential for us, because there can
be no question of replacing it by general democratic control in Russia.
It would be a great mistake to believe that the impossibility of
establishing real “democratic” control renders the members of the
revolutionary organisation beyond control altogether. They have not the
time to think about toy forms of democratism (democratism within a close
and compact body of comrades in which complete, mutual confidence
prevails), but they have a lively sense of their responsibility, knowing
as they do from experience that an organisation of real revolutionaries
will stop at nothing to rid itself of an unworthy member. Moreover,
there is a fairly well-developed public opinion in Russian (and
international) revolutionary circles which has a long history behind it,
and which sternly and ruthlessly punishes every departure from the
duties of comradeship (and “democratism”, real and not toy democratism,
certainly forms a component part of the conception of comradeship). Take
all this into consideration and you will realise that this talk and
these resolutions about “anti-democratic tendencies” have the musty
odour of the playing at generals which is indulged in abroad.

 

It must be observed also that the other source of this talk, viz.,
naivete is likewise fostered by the confusion of ideas concerning the
meaning of democracy. In Mr. and Mrs. Webb’s book on the English trade
unions there is an interesting chapter entitled “Primitive Democracy”.
In it the authors relate how the English workers, in the first period of
existence of their unions, considered it an indispensable sign of
democracy for all the members to do all the work of managing the unions;
not only were all questions decided by the vote of all the members, but
all official duties were fulfilled by all the members in turn. A long
period of historical experience was required for worker’s to realise the
absurdity of such a conception of democracy and to make them understand
the necessity for representative institutions, on the one hand, and for
full-time officials, on the other. Only after a number of cases of
financial bankruptcy of trade union treasuries had occurred did the
workers realise that the rates of contributions and benefits cannot be
decided merely by a democratic vote, but that this requires also the
advice of insurance experts. Let us take also Kautsky’s book on
parliamentarism and legislation by the people. There we find that the
conclusions drawn by the Marxist theoretician coincide with the lessons
learned from many years of practical experience by the workers who
organised “spontaneously”. Kautsky strongly protests against
Rittinghausen’s primitive conception of democracy; he ridicules those
who in the name of democracy demand that “popular newspapers shall be
edited directly by the people”; he shows the’ need
for professional journalists, parliamentarians, etc., for the
Social-Democratic leadership of the proletarian class struggle; he
attacks the socialism of anarchists and litterateurs who in their
“striving for effect” extol direct legislation by the whole people,
completely failing to understand that this idea can be applied only
relatively in modern society.

 

Those who have performed practical work in our movement know how
widespread the “primitive” conception of democracy is among the masses
of the students and workers. It is not surprising that this conception
penetrates also into rules of organisations and into literature. The
Economists of the Bernsteinian persuasion included in their rules the
following: “§ 10. All affairs affecting the interests of the whole of
the union organisation shall be decided by a majority vote of all its
members.” The Economists of the terrorist persuasion repeat after them.
“The decisions of the committee shall become effective only after they
have been referred to all the circles” (Svoboda, No. 1, p. 67). Observe
that this proposal for a widely applied referendum is advanced in
addition to the demand that the whole of the organisation be built on an
elective basis! We would not, of course, on this account condemn
practical workers who have had too few opportunities for studying the
theory and practice of real democratic organisations. But when Rabocheye
Dyelo, which lays claim to leadership, confines itself, under such
conditions, to a resolution on broad democratic principles, can this be
described as anything but a mere “striving for effect”?

 


4.6 Local and All-Russia Work

 

The objections raised against the plan of organisation here outlined on
the grounds that it is undemocratic and conspiratorial are totally
unsound. Nevertheless, there remains a question which is frequently put
and which deserves detailed examination. This is the question of the
relations between local work and all-Russia work. Fears are expressed
that the formation of a centralised organisation may shift the centre of
gravity from the former to the latter, damage the movement through
weakening our contacts with the working masses and the continuity of
local agitation generally. To these fears we reply that our movement in
the past few years has suffered precisely from the fact that local
workers have been too absorbed in local work; that therefore it is
absolutely necessary to shift the centre of gravity somewhat to national
work; and that, far from weakening this would strengthen our ties and
the continuity of our local agitation. Let us take the question of
central and local newspapers. I would ask the reader not to forget that
we cite the publication of newspapers only as an example illustrating an
immeasurably broader and more varied revolutionary activity in general.

 

In the first period of the mass movement (1896-98), an attempt was made
by local revolutionary workers to publish an all-Russia paper
— Rabochaya Gazeta. In the next period (1898-1900), the movement made an
enormous stride forward, but the attention of the leaders was wholly
absorbed by local publications. If we compute the total number of the
local papers that were published, we shall find that on the average one
issue per month was published.^(¹⁰⁹) Does this not clearly illustrate
our amateurism? Does this not clearly show that our revolutionary
organisation lags behind the spontaneous growth of the movement? If the
same number of issues had been published, not by scattered local groups,
but by a single organisation, we would not only have saved an enormous
amount of effort, but we would have secured immeasurably greater
stability and continuity in our work. This simple point is frequently
lost sight of by those practical workers who work actively and almost
exclusively on local publications (unfortunately this is true even now
in the overwhelming majority of cases), as well as by the publicists who
display an astonishing quixotism on this question. The practical workers
usually rest content with the argument that “it is difficult”^(¹¹⁰)

 

for local workers to engage in the organisation of an all-Russia
newspaper, and that local newspapers are better than no newspapers at
all. This argument is, of course, perfectly just, and we, no less than
any practical worker, appreciate the enormous importance and usefulness
of local newspapers in general. But not this is the point. The point is,
can we not overcome the fragmentation and primitiveness that are so
glaringly expressed in the thirty issues of local newspapers that have
been published throughout Russia in the course of two and a half years?
Do not restrict yourselves to the indisputable, but too general,
statement about the usefulness of local newspapers generally; have the
courage frankly to admit their negative aspects revealed by the
experience of two and a half years. This experience has shown that under
the conditions in which we work, these local newspapers prove, in the
majority of cases, to be unstable in their principles, devoid of
political significance, extremely costly in regard to expenditure of
revolutionary forces, and totally unsatisfactory from a technical point
of view (I have in mind, of course, not the technique of printing, but
the frequency and regularity of publication). These defects are riot
accidental; they are the inevitable outcome of the fragmentation which,
on the one hand, explains the predominance of local newspapers in the
period under review, and, on the other, is fostered by this
predominance. It is positively beyond the strength of a separate local
organisation to raise its newspaper to the level of a political organ
maintaining stability of principles; it is beyond its strength to
collect and utilise sufficient material to shed light on the whole of
our political life. The argument usually advanced to support the need
for numerous local newspapers in free countries that the cost of
printing by local workers is low and that the people can be kept more
fully and quickly informed — this argument as experience has shown,
speaks against local newspapers in Russia. They turn out to be
excessively costly in regard to the expenditure of revolutionary forces,
and appear very rarely, for the simple reason that the publication of
an illegal newspaper, however small its size, requires an extensive
secret apparatus, such as is possible with large-scale factory
production; for this apparatus cannot be created in a small, handicraft
workshop. Very frequently, the primitiveness of the secret apparatus
(every practical worker can cite numerous cases) enables the police to
take advantage of the publication and distribution of one or two issues
to make mass arrests, which result in such a clean sweep that it becomes
necessary to start all over again. A well-organised secret apparatus
requires professionally well-trained revolutionaries and a division of
labour applied with the greatest consistency, but both these
requirements are beyond the strength of a separate local organisation,
however strong it may be at any given moment. Not only the general
interests of our movement as a whole (training of the workers in
consistent socialist and political principles) but also specifically
local interests are better served by non-local newspapers. This may seem
paradoxical at first sight, but it has been proved to the hilt by the
two and a half years of experience referred to. Everyone will agree that
had all the local forces that were engaged in the publication of the
thirty issues of newspapers worked on a single newspaper, sixty, if not
a hundred, issues could easily have been published, with a fuller
expression, in consequence, of all the specifically local features of
the movement. True, it is no easy matter to attain such a degree of
organisation, but we must realise the need for it. Every local study
circle must think about it and work actively to achieve it, without
waiting for an impetus from outside, without being tempted by the
popularity and closer proximity of a local newspaper which, as our
revolutionary experience has shown, proves to a large extent to be
illusory.

 

And it is a bad service indeed those publicists render to the practical
work who, thinking themselves particularly (close to the practical
workers, fail to see this illusoriness, and make shift with the
astoundingly hollow and cheap argument that we must have local
newspapers, we must have district newspapers, and we must have
all-Russia newspapers. Generally speaking, of course, all these are
necessary, but once the solution of a concrete organisational problem is
undertaken, surely time and circumstances must be taken into
consideration. Is it not quixotic for Svoboda (No. 1, p. 68) to write in
a special article “dealing with the question of a newspaper”: “It seems
to us that every locality, with any appreciable number of workers,
should have its own workers’ newspaper; not a newspaper imported from
somewhere, but its very own.” If the publicist who wrote these words
refuses to think of their meaning, then at least the reader may do it
for him. How many scores, if not hundreds, of “localities” with any
appreciable number of workers there are in Russia, and what a
perpetuation of our amateurish methods this would mean if indeed every
local organisation set about publishing its own. newspaper! How this
diffusion would facilitate the gendarmerie’s task of netting — and
without “any appreciable” effort — the local revolutionary workers at
the very outset of their activity and of preventing them from developing
into real revolutionaries. A reader of an all-Russia newspaper,
continues the author, would find little interest in the descriptions of
the. malpractices of the factory owners and the “details of factory life
in various towns not his own”. But “an inhabitant of Orel would not find
Orel affairs dull reading. In every issue he would learn who had been
’picked for a lambasting’ and who had been ’flayed’, and he would be in
high spirits” (p. 69). Certainly, the Orel reader is in high spirits,
but our publicist’s flights of imagination are also high — too high. He
should have asked himself whether such concern with trivialities is
tactically in order. We are second to none in appreciating the
importance and necessity of factory exposures, but it must be borne in
mind that we have reached a stage when St. Petersburg folk find it dull
reading the St. Petersburg correspondence of the St.
Petersburg Rabochaya Mysl. Leaflets are the medium through which local
factory exposures have always been and must continue to be made, but we
must raise the level of thenewspaper, not lower it to the level of a
factory leaflet. What we ask of a newspaper is not so much “petty”
exposures, as exposures of the major, typical evils of factory life,
exposures based on especially striking facts and capable, therefore, of
arousing the interest of all workers and all leaders of the movement, of
really enriching their knowledge, broadening their outlook, and serving
as a starting-point for awakening new districts and workers from
ever-newer trade areas.

 

“Moreover, in a local newspaper, all the malpractices of the factory
administration and other authorities may he denounced then and there. In
the case of a general, distant newspaper, however, by the time the news
reaches it the facts will have been forgotten in the source localities.
The reader, on getting the paper, will exclaim: ’When was that-who
remembers it?’” (ibid.). Precisely — who remembers it! From the same
source we learn that the 30 issues of newspapers which appeared in the
course of two and a half years were published in six cities. This
averagesone issue per city per half-year! And even if our frivolous
publicist trebled his estimate of the productivity of local work (which
would be wrong in the case of an average town, since it is impossible
to increase productivity to any considerable extent by our rule-of-thumb
methods), we would still get only one issue every two months, i.e.,
nothing at all like “denouncing then and there”. It would suffice,
however, for ten local organisations to combine and send their delegates
to take an active part in organising a general newspaper, to enable us
every fortnight to “denounce”, over the whole of Russia, not petty, but
really outstanding and typical evils. No one who knows the state of
affairs in our organisations can have the slightest doubt on that score.
As for catching the enemy red-handed — if we mean it seriously and not
merely as a pretty phrase — that is quite beyond the ability of an
illegal paper generally. It can be done only by a leaflet, because the
time limit for exposures of that nature can be a day or two at the most
(e.g., the usual brief strikes, violent factory clashes, demonstrations,
etc.).

 

“The workers live not only at the factory, but also in the city,”
continues our author, rising from the particular to the general, with a
strict consistency that would have done honour to Boris Krichevsky
himself; and he refers to matters like municipal councils, municipal
hospitals, municipal schools, and demands that workers’ newspapers
should not ignore municipal affairs in general.

 

This demand — excellent in itself — serves as a particularly vivid
illustration of the empty abstraction to which discussions of local
newspapers are all too frequently limited. In the first place, if indeed
newspapers appeared “in every locality with any appreciable number of
workers” with such detailed information on municipal affairs
as Svoboda desires, this would, under our Russian conditions, inevitably
degenerate into actual concern with trivialities, lead to a weakening of
the consciousness of the importance of an all-Russia revolutionary
assault upon the tsarist autocracy, and strengthen the extremely virile
shoots — not uprooted but rather hidden or temporarily suppressed — of
the tendency that has become noted as a result of the famous remark
about revolutionaries who talk a great deal about non-existent
parliaments and too little about existent municipal councils. We say
“inevitably”, in order to emphasise that Svoboda obviously does not
desire this, but the contrary, to come about. But good intentions are
not enough. For municipal affairs to be dealt with in their proper
perspective, in relation to our entire work, this perspective
must first be clearly conceived, firmly established, not only by
argument, but by numerous examples, so that it may acquire the stability
of a tradition. This is still far from being the case with us. Yet this
must be done first, before we can allow ourselves to think and talk
about an extensive local press.

 

Secondly, to write really well and interestingly about municipal
affairs, one must have first-hand knowledge, not book knowledge, of the
issues. But there are hardly any Social-Democrats anywhere in Russia who
possess such knowledge. To be able to write in newspapers (not in
popular pamphlets) about municipal and state affairs, one must have
fresh and varied material gathered and written up by able people. And in
order to be able to gather and write up such material, we must have
something more than the “primitive democracy” of a primitive circle, in
which everybody does everything and all entertain themselves by playing
at referendums. It is necessary to have a staff of expert writers and
correspondents, an army of Social-Democratic reporters who establish
contacts far and wide, who are able to fathom all sorts of “state
secrets” (the knowledge of which makes the Russian government official
so puffed up, but the blabbing of which is such an easy matter to him),
who are able to penetrate “behind the scenes” — an army of’ people who
must, as their “official duty”, be ubiquitous and omniscient. And we,
the Party that fights against all economic, political, social, and
national oppression, can and must find, gather, train, mobilise, and set
into motion such an army of omniscient people — all of which requires
still to be done. Not only has not a single step in this direction been
taken in the overwhelming majority of localities, but even the
recognition of its necessity is very often lacking. One will search in
vain in our Social-Democratic press for lively and interesting articles,
correspondence, and exposures dealing with our big and little affairs —
diplomatic, military, ecclesiastical, municipal, financial, etc., etc.
There is almost nothing, or very little, about these matters.^(¹¹¹) That
is why “it always annoys me frightfully when a man comes to me, utters
beautiful and charming words” about the need for newspapers in “every
locality with any appreciable number of workers” that will expose
factory, municipal, and government evils.

 

The predominance of the local papers over a central press may be a sign
of either poverty or luxury. Of poverty, when the movement has not yet
developed the forces for large-scale production, continues to flounder
in amateurism, and is all but swamped with “the petty details of factory
life”. Of luxury, when the movement has fully mastered the task of
comprehensive exposure and comprehensive agitation, and it becomes
necessary to publish numerous local newspapers in addition to the
central organ. Let each decide for himself what the predominance of
local newspapers implies in present-day Russia. I shall limit myself to
a precise formulation of my own conclusion, to leave no grounds for
misunderstanding. Hitherto, the majority of our local organisations have
thought almost exclusively in terms of local newspapers, and have
devoted almost all their activities to this work. This is abnormal; the
very opposite should have been the case. The majority of the local
organisations should think principally of the publication of an
all-Russia newspaper and devote their activities chiefly to it. Until
this is done, we shall not be able to establish a single newspaper
capable, to any degree, of serving the movement with comprehensive press
agitation. When this is done, however, normal relations between the
necessary central newspaper and the necessary local newspapers will be
established automatically.

 

 

It would seem at first glance that the conclusion on the necessity for
shifting the centre of gravity from local to all-Russia work does not
apply to the sphere of the specifically economic struggle. In this
struggle, the immediate enemies of the workers are the individual
employers or groups of employers, who are not bound by any organisation
having even the remotest resemblance to the purely military, strictly
centralised organisation of the Russian Government — our immediate enemy
in the political struggle — which is led in all its minutest details by
a single will.

 

But that is not the case. As we have repeatedly pointed out, the
economic struggle is a trade struggle, and for that reason it requires
that the workers be organised according to trades, not only according to
place of employment. Organisation by trades becomes all the more
urgently necessary, the more rapidly our employers organise in all sorts
of companies and syndicates. Our fragmentation and our amateurism are an
outright hindrance to this work of organisation which requires the
existence of a single, all-Russia body of revolutionaries capable of
giving leadership to the all-Russia trade unions. We have described
above the type of organisation that is needed for this purpose; we shall
now add but a few words on the question of our press in this connection.

 

Hardly anyone will doubt the necessity for every Social-Democratic
newspaper to have a special department devoted to the trade union
(economic) struggle. But the growth of the trade union movement compels
us to think about the creation of a trade union press. It seems to us,
however, that with rare exceptions, there can be no question of trade
union newspapers in Russia at the present time; they would be a luxury,
and many a time we lack even our daily bread. The form of trade union
press that would suit the conditions of our illegal work and is already
required at the present time is trade union pamphlets. In these
pamphlets, legal^(¹¹²) and illegal material should be gathered and
grouped systematically, on the working conditions in a given trade, on
the differences in this respect in the various parts of, Russia; on the
main demands advanced by the workers in the given trade; on the
inadequacies of legislation affecting that trade; on outstanding
instances of economic struggle by the workers in the trade; on the
beginnings, the present state, and the requirements of their trade union
organisation, etc. Such pamphlets would, in the first place, relieve our
Social-Democratic press of a mass of trade details that are of interest
only to workers in the given trade. Secondly, they would record the
results of our experience in the trade union struggle, they would
preserve the gathered material, which now literally gets lost in a mass
of leaflets and fragmentary correspondence; and they would summarise
this material. Thirdly, they could serve as guides for agitators,
because working conditions change relatively slowly and the main demands
of the workers in a given trade are extremely stable (cf., for example,
the demands advanced by the weavers in the Moscow district in 1885 and
in the St. Petersburg district in 1896). A compilation of such demands
and needs might serve for years as an excellent handbook for agitators
on economic questions in backward localities or among the backward
strata of the workers. Examples of successful strikes in a given region,
information on higher living standards, on improved working conditions,
in one locality, would encourage the workers in other localities to take
up the fight again and again. Fourthly, having made a start in
generalising the trade union struggle and in this way strengthening the
link between the Russian trade union movement and socialism, the
Social-Democrats would at the same time see to it that our trade union
work occupied neither too small nor too large a place in our
Social-Democratic work as a whole. A local organisation that is cut off
from organisations in other towns finds it very difficult, sometimes
almost impossible, to maintain a correct sense of pro portion (the
example of Rabochaya Mysl shows what a monstrous exaggeration can be
made in the direction of trade-unionism) But an all-Russia organisation
of revolutionaries that stands undeviatingly on the basis of Marxism,
that leads the entire political struggle and possesses a staff of
professional agitators, will never find it difficult to determine the
proper proportion.

 



5 THE “PLAN” FOR AN ALL-RUSSIA POLITICAL NEWSPAPER


 

“The most serious blunder Iskra committed in this connection” writes B.
Krichevsky (Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10, p. 30), charging us with a tendency
to “convert theory into a lifeless doctrine by isolating it from
practice”, “was its ’plan’ for a general party organisation” (viz., the
article entitled “Where To Begin”^(¹¹³)). Martynov echoes this idea in
declaring that “Iskra’s tendency to belittle the significance of the
forward march of the drab everyday struggle in comparison with the
propaganda of brilliant and completed ideas ... was crowned with the
plan for the organisation of a party which it sets forth in the article
entitled ’Where To Begin’ in issue No. 4” (ibid., p. 61). Finally, L.
Nadezhdin has of late joined in the chorus of indignation against this
“plan” (the quotation marks were meant to express sarcasm). In his
pamphlet, which we have just received, entitled The Eve of the
Revolution (published by the “Revolutionary-Socialist Group” Svoboda,
whose acquaintance we have made), he declares (p. 126): “To speak now of
an organisation held together by an all-Russia newspaper means
propagating armchair ideas and armchair work” and represents a
manifestation of “bookishness”, etc.

 

That our terrorist turns out to be in agreement with the champions of
the “forward march of the drab everyday struggle” is not surprising,
since we have traced the roots of this intimacy between them in the
chapters on politics and organisation. But must draw attention here to
the fact that Nadezhdin is the only one who has conscientiously tried to
grasp the train of thought in an article he disliked and has made an
attempt to reply to the point, whereas Rabocheye Dyelo, has said nothing
that is material to the subject, but has tried merely to confuse the
question by a series of unseemly, demagogic sallies. Unpleasant though
the task may be, we must first spend some time in cleansing this Augean
stable.

 


5.1 Who Was Offended By the Article “Where to Begin”

 

Let us present a small selection of the expletives and exclamations
that _Rabocheye Dyelo_ hurled at us. “It is not a newspaper that can
create a party organisation, but vice versa....” A newspaper, standing
above the party, outside of its control, and independent of it, thanks
to its having its own staff of agents. “By what miracle
has _Iskra_ forgotten about the actually existing Social-Democratic
organisations of the party to which it belongs?....” “Those who possess
firm principles and a corresponding plan are the supreme regulators of
the real struggle of the party and dictate to it their plan....” “The
plan drives our active and virile organisations into the kingdom of
shadows and desires to call into being a fantastic network of
agents....” “Were _Iskra’s_ plan carried into effect, every trace of the
Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party, which is taking shape, would
be obliterated....” “A propagandist organ becomes an uncontrolled
autocratic law-maker for the entire practical revolutionary
struggle....” “How should our Party react to the suggestion that it
be _completely_ subordinated to an autonomous editorial board?”, etc.,
etc.

 

As the reader can see from the contents and the tone of these above
quotations, _Rabocheye Dyelo has taken offence._ Offence, not for its
own sake, but for the sake of the organisations and committees of our
Party which it alleges _Iskra_ desires to drive into the kingdom of
shadows and whose very traces it would obliterate. How terrible! But a
curious thing should be noted. The article “Where To Begin” appeared in
May 1901. The articles in _Rabocheye Dyelo_ appeared in September 1901.
Now we are in mid-January 1902. During these five months (prior to and
after September), _not a single_ committee and _not a
single_ organisation of the Party protested formally against this
monster that seeks to drive them into the kingdom of shadows; and yet
scores and hundreds of communications from all parts of Russia have
appeared during this period in _Iskra_, as well as in numerous local and
non-local publications. How could it happen that those who would be
driven into the realm of shadows are not aware of it and have not taken
offence, though a third party has?

 

The explanation is that the committees and other organisations are
engaged in real work and are not playing at “democracy”. The committees
read the article “Where To Begin”, saw that it represented an attempt
“to elaborate a definite plan for an organisation, so _that its
formation may be undertaken from all aspects”;_ and since they knew and
saw very well that _not one_ of these “sides” would dream of “setting
about to build it” until it was convinced of its necessity, and of the
correctness of the architectural plan, it has naturally never occurred
to them to take offence at the boldness of the people who said
in _Iskra_: “In view of the pressing importance of the question we, on
our part, take the liberty of submitting to the comrades a skeleton plan
to be developed in greater detail in a pamphlet now in preparation for
the print.” With a conscientious approach to the work, was it possible
to view things otherwise than that if the comrades _accepted_ the plan
submitted to them, they would carry it out, not because they are
“subordinate”, but because they would be convinced of its necessity for
our common cause, and that if they _did not accept it_, then the
“skeleton” (a pretentious word, is it not?) would remain merely a
skeleton? Is it not demagogy to fight against the skeleton of a plan,
not only by “picking it to pieces” and advising comrades to reject it,
but by _inciting_ people inexperienced in revolutionary matters against
its authors _merely on the grounds_ that they _dare_ to “legislate” and
come out as the “supreme regulators”, i.e., because they dare _to
propose_ an outline of a plan? Can our Party develop and make progress
if an attempt _to raise_ local functionaries to broader views, tasks,
plans, etc., is objected to, not only with the claim that these views
are erroneous, but on the grounds that the very “desire” _to_ “_raise_”
us gives “offence”? Nadezhdin, too, “picked” our plan “to pieces”, but
he did not sink to such demagogy as cannot be explained solely by
naivete or by primitiveness of political views. From the outset, he
emphatically rejected the charge that we intended to establish an
“inspectorship over the Party”. That is why Nadezhdin’s criticism of the
plan can and should be answered on its merits, while _Rabocheye
Dyelo_ deserves only to be treated with contempt.

 

But contempt for a writer who sinks so low as to shout about autocracy
and “subordination” does not relieve us of the duty of disentangling the
confusion that such people create in the minds of their readers. Here we
can clearly demonstrate to the world the nature of catchwords like
“broad democracy”. We are accused of forgetting the committees, of
desiring or attempting to drive them into the kingdom of shadows, etc.
How can we reply to these charges when, out of considerations of
secrecy, we can give the reader _almost no facts_ regarding our real
relationships with the committees? Persons hurling vehement accusations
calculated to provoke the crowd prove to be ahead of us because of their
brazenness and their disregard of the duty of a revolutionary to conceal
carefully from the eyes of the world the relationships and contacts
which he maintains, which he is establishing or trying to establish.
Naturally, we refuse once and for all to compete with such people in the
field of “democratism”. As to the reader who is not initiated in all
Party affairs, the only way in which we can discharge our duty to him is
to acquaint him, not with what is and what is _im_ _Werden_ but with _a
particle_ of what has taken place and what may be told as a thing of the
past.

 

The Bund hints that we are “impostors”^(¹¹⁴); the Union Abroad accuses
us of attempting to obliterate all traces of the Party. Gentlemen, you
will get complete satisfaction when we relate to the public four
facts concerning the past.

 

First fact.^(¹¹⁵) The members of one of the Leagues of Struggle, who
took a direct part in founding our Party and in sending a delegate to
the Inaugural Party Congress, reached agreement with a member of
the _Iskra_ group regarding the publication of a series of books for
workers that were to serve the entire movement. The attempt to publish
the series failed and the pamphlets written for it, _The Tasks of the
Russian Social-Democrats_ and _The New Factory Law_,^(¹¹⁶) by a
circuitous course and through the medium of third parties, found their
way abroad, where they were published.^(¹¹⁷)

 

Second fact. Members of the Central Committee of the Bund approached a
member of the _Iskra _group with the proposal to organise what the Bund
then described as a “literary laboratory”. In making the proposal, they
stated that unless this was done, the movement would greatly retrogress.
The result of these negotiations was the appearance of the pamphlet _The
Working-Class Cause in Russia_.^(¹¹⁸)

 

Third fact. The Central Committee of the Bund, via a provincial town,
approached a member of the _Iskra_ group with the proposal that he
undertake the editing of the revived _Rabochaya Gazeta_ and, of course,
obtained his consent. The offer was later modified: the comrade in
question was invited to act as a contributor, in view of a new plan for
the composition of the Editorial Board. Also this proposal, of course,
obtained his consent. ^(¹¹⁹) Articles were sent (which we managed to
preserve): “Our Programme” which was a direct protest against
Bernsteinism, against the change in the line of the legal literature and
of _Rabochaya Mysl_; “Our Immediate Task” (“to publish a Party organ
that shall appear regularly and have close contacts with all the local
groups”, the drawbacks of the prevailing “amateurism”), “An Urgent
Question” (an examination of the objection that it is
necessary _first_ to develop the activities of local groups before
undertaking the publication of a common organ; an insistence on the
paramount importance of a “revolutionary organisation” and on the
necessity of “developing organisation, discipline, and the technique of
secrecy to the highest degree of perfection”).^(¹²⁰) The proposal to
resume publication of _Rabochaya Gazeta_ was not carried out, and the
articles were not published.

 

Fourth fact. A member of the committee that was organising the second
regular congress of our Party communicated to a member of
the _Iskra_ group the programme of the congress and proposed that group
as editorial board of the revived _Rabochaya Gazeta_. This preliminary
step, as it were, was later sanctioned by the committee to which this
member belonged, and by the Central Committee of the
Bund.^(¹²¹) The _Iskra_ group was notified of the place and time of the
congress and (uncertain of being able, for certain reasons, to send a
delegate) drew up a written report for the congress. In the report, the
idea was suggested that the mere election of a Central Committee would
not only fail to solve the question of unification at a time of such
complete disorder as the present, but would even compromise the grand
idea of establishing a party, in the event of an early, swift, and
thorough police round-up, which was more than likely in view of the
prevailing lack of secrecy; that therefore, a beginning should be made
by inviting all committees and all other organisations to support the
revived common organ, which would establish _real_ contacts between all
the committees and _really_ train a group of leaders for the entire
movement; and that the committees and the Party would very easily be
able to transform such a group into a Central Committee as soon as the
group had grown and become strong. In consequence of a number of police
raids and arrests, however, the congress could not take place. For
security reasons the report was destroyed, having been read only by a
few comrades, including the representatives of one committee.

 

Let the reader now judge for himself the character of the methods
employed by the Bund in hinting that we were impostors, or by _Rabocheye
Dyelo_, which accuses us of trying to relegate the committees to the
kingdom of shadows and to “substitute” for the organisation of a party
an organisation disseminating the ideas advocated by a single newspaper.
It was to the committees, _on their repeated invitation_, that we
reported on the necessity for adopting a definite plan of concerted
activities. It was precisely for the Party organisation that we
elaborated this plan, in articles sent to _Rabochaya Gazeta_, and in the
report to the Party congress, again on the invitation of those who held
such an influential position in the Party that they took the initiative
in its (actual) restoration. Only after the _twice_ repeated attempts of
the Party organisation, _in conjunction with ourselves, officially_ to
revive the central organ of the Party had failed, did we consider it our
bounden duty to publish an _unofficial_ organ, in order that with
the _third_ attempt the comrades might have before them the results
of _experience_ and not merely conjectural proposals. Now certain
results of this experience are present for all to see, and all comrades
may now judge whether we properly understood our duties and what should
be thought of people that strive to mislead those unacquainted with the
immediate past, simply because they are piqued at our having pointed out
to some their inconsistency on the “national” question, and to others
the inadmissibility of their vacillation in matters of principle.

 


5.2 Can A Newspaper Be a Collective Organiser?

 

The quintessence of the article “Where To Begin” consists in the fact
that it discusses _precisely_ this question and gives an affirmative
reply to it. As far as we know, the only attempt to examine this
question on its merits and to prove that it must be answered in the
negative was made by L. Nadezhdin, whose argument we reproduce in full:

 

“... It pleased us greatly to see _Iskra_ (No. 4) present the question
of the need for an all-Russia newspaper; but we cannot agree that this
presentation bears relevance to the title ’Where To Begin’. Undoubtedly
this is an extremely important matter, but neither a newspaper, nor a
series of popular leaflets, nor a mountain of manifestoes, can serve as
the basis for a militant organisation in revolutionary times. We must
set to work to build strong political organisations in the localities.
We lack such organisations; we have been carrying on our work mainly
among enlightened workers, while the masses have been engaged almost
exclusively in the economic struggle. _If strong political organisations
are not trained locally, what significance will even an excellently
organised all-Russia newspaper have?_ It will be a burning bush, burning
without being consumed, but firing no one! _Iskra_ thinks that around it
and in the activities in its behalf people will gather and
organise. _But they will find it far easier to gather and organise
around activities that are more concrete_. This something more concrete
must and should be the extensive organisation of local newspapers, the
immediate preparation of the workers’ forces for demonstrations, the
constant activity of local organisations among the unemployed
(indefatigable distribution of pamphlets and leaflets, convening of
meetings, appeals to actions of protest against the government, etc.).
We must begin live political work in the localities, and when the time
comes to unite on this real basis, it will not he an artificial, paper
unity; not by means of newspapers can such a unification of local work
into an all-Russia cause be achieved!” (_The Eve of the Revolution_, p.
54.)

 

We have emphasised the passages in this eloquent tirade that most
clearly show the author’s incorrect judgement of our plan, as well as
the incorrectness of his point of view in general, which is here
contraposed to that of _Iskra_. Unless we train strong political
organisations in the localities, even an excellently organised
all-Russia newspaper will be of no avail. This is incontrovertible. But
the whole point is that _there is no other way_ of _training_ strong
political organisations except through the medium of an all-Russia
newspaper. The author missed the most important
statement _Iskra_ made _before it proceeded_ to set forth its “plan”:
that it was necessary “to call for the formation of a revolutionary
organisation, capable of uniting all forces and guiding the movement in
actual practice and _not in name alone_, that is, _an organisation ready
at any time to support every protest and every outbreak’_ and use it to
build up and consolidate the fighting forces suitable for the decisive
struggle”. But now after the February and March events, everyone will
agree with this in principle, continues _Iskra_. Yet what we need is not
a solution of the question in principle, but its _practical
solution;_ we must immediately advance a definite constructive plan
through which all may immediately set to work to build _from every
side_. Now we are again being dragged away from the practical solution
towards something which in principle is correct, indisputable, and
great, but which is entirely inadequate and incomprehensible to the
broad masses of workers, namely, “to rear strong political
organisations”! This is not the point at issue, most worthy author. The
point is how to go about the rearing and how to accomplish it.

 

It is not true to say that “we have been carrying on our work mainly
among enlightened workers, while the masses have been engaged almost
exclusively in the economic struggle”. Presented in such a form, the
thesis reduces itself to _Svoboda_’s usual but fundamentally false
contraposition of the enlightened workers to the “masses”. In recent
years, even the enlightened workers have been “engaged almost
exclusively in the economic struggle”. That is the first point. On the
other hand, the masses will never learn to conduct the political
struggle until we help _to train_ leaders for this struggle, both from
among the enlightened workers and from among the intellectuals. Such
leaders can acquire training _solely_ by systematically
evaluating _all_ the everyday aspects of our political life, _all
attempts_ at protest and struggle on the part of the various classes and
on various grounds. Therefore, to talk of “rearing political
organisations” and at the same time _to contrast_ the “paper work” of a
political newspaper to “live political work in the localities” is
plainly ridiculous. _Iskra_ has adapted its “plan” for a newspaper to
the “plan” for creating a “militant preparedness” to support the
unemployed movement, peasant revolts, discontent among, the Zemstvo
people, “popular indignation against some tsarist bashi-bazouk on the
rampage”, etc. Anyone who is at all acquainted with the movement knows
full well that the vast majority of local organisations have _never even
dreamed_ of these things; that many of the prospects of “live political
work” here indicated _have never_ been realised by a single
organisation; that the attempt, for example, to call attention to the
growth of discontent and protest among the Zemstvo intelligentsia rouses
feelings of consternation and perplexity in Nadezhdin (“Good Lord, is
this newspaper intended for Zemstvo people?”—The _Eve_, p. 129), among
the Economists (Letter to_Iskra_, No. 12), and among many practical
workers. Under these circumstances, it is possible to “begin” _only_ by
inducing people _to think_ about all these things, to summarise and
generalise all the diverse signs of ferment and active struggle. In our
time, when Social-Democratic tasks are being degraded, _the only
way_ “live political work” can be _begun is_ with live political
agitation, which is impossible unless we have an all-Russia newspaper,
frequently issued and regularly distributed.

 

Those who regard the Iskra “plan” as a manifestation of “bookishness”
have totally failed to understand its substance and take for the goal
that which is suggested as the most suitable means for the present time.
These people have not taken the trouble to study the two comparisons
that were drawn to present a clear illustration of the
plan. Iskra wrote: The publication of an all-Russia political newspaper
must be the main line by which we may unswervingly develop, deepen, and
expand the organisation (viz., the revolutionary organisation that is
ever ready to support every protest and every outbreak). Pray tell me,
when bricklayers lay bricks in, various parts of an enormous,
unprecedentedly large structure, is it “paper” work to use a line to
help them find the correct place for the bricklaying; to indicate to
them the ultimate goal of the common work; to enable them to use, not
only every brick, but even every piece of brick which, cemented to the
bricks laid before and after it, forms a finished, continuous line? And
are we not now passing through precisely such a period in our Party life
when we have bricks and bricklayers, but lack the guide line for all to
see and follow? Let them shout that in stretching out the line, we want
to command. Had we desired to command, gentlemen, we would have written
on the title page, not “Iskra, No. 1”, but “Rabochaya Gazeta, No. 3”, as
we were invited to do by certain comrades, and as we would have had a
perfect right to do after the events described above. But we did not do
that. We wished to have our hands free to wage an irreconcilable
struggle against all pseudo-Social-Democrats; we wanted our line, if
properly laid, to be respected because it was correct, and not because
it had been laid by an official organ.

 

“The question of uniting local activity in central bodies runs in a
vicious circle,” Nadezhdin lectures us; “unification requires
homogeneity of the elements, and the homogeneity can be created only by
something that unites; but the unifying element may be the product of
strong local organisations which at the present time are by no means
distinguished for their homogeneity.” This truth is as revered and as
irrefutable as that we must train strong political organisations. And it
is equally barren. Every question “runs in a vicious circle” because
political life as a whole is an endless chain consisting of an infinite
number of links. The whole art of politics lies in finding and taking as
firm a grip as we can of the link that is least likely to be struck from
our hands, the one that is most important at the given moment, the one
that most of all guarantees its possessor the possession of the whole
chain.^(¹²²) If we had a crew of experienced bricklayers who had learned
to work so well together that they could lay their bricks exactly as
required without a guide line (which, speaking abstractly, is by no
means impossible), then perhaps we might take hold of some other link.
But it is unfortunate that as yet we have no experienced bricklayers
trained for teamwork, that bricks are often laid where they are not
needed at all, that they are not laid according to the general line, but
are so scattered that the enemy can shatter the structure as if it were
made of sand and not of bricks.

 

’Another comparison: “A newspaper is not only a collective propagandist
and a collective agitator, it is also a collective organiser. In this
respect it may be compared to the scaffolding erected round a building
under construction; it marks the contours of the structure and
facilitates communication between the builders, permitting them to
distribute the work and to view the common results achieved by their
organised labour.“^(¹²³) Does this sound anything like the attempt of an
armchair author to exaggerate his role? The scaffolding is not required
at all for the dwelling; it is made of cheaper material, is put up only
temporarily, and is scrapped for firewood as soon as the shell of the
structure is completed. As for the building of revolutionary
organisations, experience shows that sometimes they may be built without
scaffolding, as the seventies showed. But at the present time we cannot
even imagine the possibility of erecting the building we require without
scaffolding.

 

Nadezhdin disagrees with this, saying: “Iskra thinks that around it and
in the activities in its behalf people will gather and organise. But
they will find it far easier to gather and organise around activities
that are more concrete!” Indeed, “far easier around activities that are
more concrete”. A Russian proverb holds: “Don’t spit into a well, you
may want to drink from it.” But there are people who do not object to
drinking from a well that has been spat into. What despicable things our
magnificent, legal “Critics of Marxism” and illegal admirers
of Rabochaya Myslhave said in the name of this something more concrete!
How restricted our movement is by our own narrowness, lack of
initiative, and hesitation, which are justified with the traditional
argument about finding it “far easier to gather around something more
concrete”! And Nadezhdin — who regards himself as possessing a
particularly keen sense of the “realities of life”, who so severely
condemns “armchair” authors and (with pretensions to wit)
accuses Iskra of a weakness for seeing Economism everywhere, and who
sees himself standing far above the division between the orthodox and
the Critics — fails to see that with his arguments he contributes to the
narrowness that arouses his indignation and that he is drinking from the
most spat-in well! The sincerest indignation against narrowness, the
most passionate desire to raise its worshippers from their knees, will
not suffice if the indignant one is swept along without sail or rudder
and, as “spontaneously” as the revolutionaries of the seventies,
clutches at such things as “excitative terror”, “agrarian terror”,
“sounding the tocsin etc. Let us take a glance at these “more concrete”
activities around which he thinks it will be “far easier” to gather and
organise: (1) local newspapers; (2) preparations for demonstrations; (3)
work among the unemployed. It is immediately apparent that all these
things have been seized upon at random as a pretext for saying
something; for, however we may regard them, it would be absurd to see in
them anything especially suitable for “gathering and organising”. The
selfsame Nadezhdin says a few pages further: “It is time we simply
stated the fact that activity of a very pitiable kind is being carried
on in the localities, the committees are not doing a tenth of what they
could do ... the coordinating centres we have at present are the purest
fiction, representing a sort of revolutionary bureaucracy, whose members
mutually grant generalships to one another; and so it will continue
until strong local organisations grow up.” These remarks, though
exaggerating the position somewhat, no doubt contain many a bitter
truth; but can it be said that Nadezhdin does not perceive the
connection between the pitiable activity in the localities and the
narrow mental outlook of the functionaries, the narrow scope of their
activities, inevitable in the circumstances of the lack of training of
Party workers confined to local organisations? Has he, like the author
of the article on organisation, published inSvoboda, forgotten how the
transition to a broad local press (from 1898) was accompanied by a
strong intensification of Economism and “primitiveness”? Even if a
“broad local press” could be established at all satisfactorily (and we
have shown this to be impossible, save in very, exceptional cases) —
even then the local organs could not “gather and organise” all the
revolutionary forces for a general attack upon the autocracy and for
leadership of the united struggle. Let us not forget that we are here
discussing only the “rallying”, organising significance of the
newspaper, and we could put to Nadezhdin, who defends fragmentation, the
question he himself has ironically put: “Have we been left a legacy of
200,000 revolutionary organisers?” Furthermore, “preparations for
demonstrations” cannot be contraposed to Iskra’s plan, for the very
reason that this plan includes the organisation of the broadest possible
demonstrations as one of its aims; the point under discussion is the
selection of the practical means. On this point also Nadezhdin is
confused, for he has lost sight of the fact that only forces that are
“gathered and organised” can “prepare for” demonstrations (which
hitherto, in the overwhelming majority of cases, have taken place
spontaneously) and that we lack precisely the ability to rally and
organise. “Work among the unemployed.” Again the same confusion; for
this too represents one of the field operations of the mobilised forces
and not a plan for mobilising the forces. The extent to which Nadezhdin
here too underestimates the harm caused by our fragmentation, by our
lack of “200,000 organisers”, can be seen from the fact that: many
people (including Nadezhdin) have reproached Iskra for the paucity of
the news it gives on unemployment and for the casual nature of the
correspondence it publishes about the most common affairs of rural life.
The reproach is justified; but Iskra is “guilty without sin”. We strive
“to stretch a line” through the countryside too, where there are hardly
any bricklayers anywhere, and we are obliged to encourage everyone who
informs us even as regards the most common facts, in the hope that this
will increase the number of our contributors in the given field and will
ultimately train us all to select facts that are really the most
outstanding. But the material on which we can train is so scanty that,
unless we generalise it for the whole of Russia, we shall have very
little to train on at all. No doubt, one with at least as much ability
as an agitator and as much knowledge of the life of the vagrant as
Nadezhdin manifests could render priceless service to the movement by
carrying on agitation among the unemployed; but such a person would be
simply hiding his light under a bushel if he failed to inform all
comrades in Russia as regards every step he took in his work, so that
others, who, in the mass, still lack the ability to undertake new kinds
of work, might learn from his example.

 

All without exception now talk of the importance of unity, of the
necessity for “gathering and organising”; but in the majority of cases
what is lacking is a definite idea of where to begin and how to bring
about this unity. Probably all will agree that if we “unite”, say, the
district circles in a given town, it will be necessary to have for this
purpose common institutions, i.e., not merely the common title of
“League”, but genuinely common work, exchange of material, experience,
and forces, distribution of functions, not only by districts, but
through specialisation on a town-wide scale. All will agree that a big
secret apparatus will not pay its way (to use a commercial expression)
“with the resources” (in both money and manpower, of course) of a single
district, and that this narrow field will not provide sufficient scope
for a specialist to develop his talents. But the same thing applies to
the co-ordination of activities of a number of towns, since even a
specific locality will be and, in the history of our Social-Democratic
movement, has proved to be, far too narrow a field; we have demonstrated
this above in detail with regard to political agitation and
organisational work. What we require foremost and imperatively is to
broaden the field, establish real contacts between the towns on the
basis of regular, common work; for fragmentation weighs down on the
people and they are “stuck in a hole” (to use the expression employed by
a correspondent to Iskra), not knowing what is happening in the world,
from whom to learn, or how to acquire experience and satisfy their
desire to engage in broad activities. I continue to insist that we can
start establishing real contacts only with the aid of a common
newspaper, as the only regular, all-Russia enterprise, one which will
summarise the results of the most diverse forms of activity and thereby
stimulate people to march forward untiringly along all the innumerable
paths leading to revolution, in the same way as all roads lead to Rome.
If we do not want unity in name only, we must arrange for all local
study circles immediately to assign, say, a fourth of their forces to
active work for the common cause, and the newspaper will immediately
convey to them^(¹²⁴) the general design, scope, and character of the
cause; it will give them a precise indication of the most keenly felt
shortcomings in the all-Russia activity, where agitation is lacking and
contacts are weak, and it will point out which little wheels in the vast
general mechanism a given study circle might repair or replace with
better ones. A study circle that has not yet begun to work, but which is
only just seeking activity, could then start, not like a craftsman in an
isolated little workshop unaware of the earlier development in
“industry” or of the general level of production methods prevailing in
industry, but as a participant in an extensive enterprise that reflects
the whole general revolutionary attack on the autocracy. The more
perfect the finish of each little wheel and the larger the number of
detail workers engaged in the common cause, the closer will our network
become and the less will be the disorder in the ranks consequent on
inevitable police, raids.

 

The mere function of distributing a newspaper would help to establish
actual contacts (if it is a newspaper worthy of the name, i.e., if it is
issued regularly, not once a month like a magazine, but at least four
times a month). At the present time, communication between towns on
revolutionary business is an extreme rarity, and, at all events, is the
exception rather than the rule. If we had a newspaper, however, such
communication would become the rule and would secure, not only the
distribution of the newspaper, of course, but (what is more important)
an exchange of experience, of material, of forces, and of resources.
Organisational work would immediately acquire much greater scope, and
the success of one locality would serve as a standing encouragement to
further perfection; it would arouse the desire to utilise the experience
gained by comrades working in other parts of the country. Local work
would become far richer and more varied than it is at present. Political
and economic exposures gathered from all over Russia would provide
mental food for workers of all trades and all stages of development;
they would provide material and occasion for talks and readings on the
most diverse subjects, which would, in addition, be suggested by hints
in the legal press, by talk among the people, and by “shamefaced”
government statements. Every outbreak, every demonstration, would be
weighed and, discussed in its every aspect in all parts of Russia and
would thus stimulate a desire to keep up with, and even surpass, the
others (we socialists do not by any means flatly reject all emulation or
all “competition”!) and consciously prepare that which at first, as it
were, sprang up spontaneously, a desire to take advantage of the
favourable conditions in a given district or at a given moment for
modifying the plan of attack, etc. At the same time, this revival of
local work would obviate that desperate, “convulsive” exertion of all
efforts and risking of all forces which every single demonstration or
the publication of every single issue of a local newspaper now
frequently entails. On the one hand, the police would find it much more
difficult to get at the “roots”, if they did not know in what district
to dig down for them. On the other hand, regular common work would train
our people to adjust the force of a given attack to the strength of the
given contingent of the common army (at the present time hardly anyone
ever thinks of doing that, because in nine cases out of ten these
attacks occur spontaneously); such regular common work would facilitate
the “transportation” from one place to another, not only of literature,
but also of revolutionary forces.

 

In a great many cases these forces are now being bled white on
restricted local work, but under the circumstances we are discussing it
would be possible to transfer a capable agitator or organiser from one
end of the country to the other, and the occasion for doing this would
constantly arise. Beginning with short journeys on Party business at the
Party’s expense, the comrades would become accustomed to being
maintained by the Party, to becoming professional revolutionaries, and
to training themselves as real political leaders.

 

And if indeed we succeeded in reaching the point when all, or at least a
considerable majority, of the local committees local groups, and study
circles took up active work for the common cause, we could, in the not
distant future, establish a weekly newspaper for regular distribution in
tens of thousands of copies throughout Russia. This newspaper would
become part of an enormous pair of smith’s bellows that would fan every
spark of the class struggle and of popular indignation into a general
conflagration. Around what is in itself still a very innocuous and very
small, but regular and common, effort, in the full sense of the word, a
regular army of tried fighters would systematically gather and receive
their training. On the ladders and scaffolding of this general
organisational structure there would soon develop and come to the fore
Social-Democratic Zhelyabovs from among our revolutionaries and Russian
Bebels from among our workers, who would take their place at the head of
the mobilised army and rouse the whole people to settle accounts with
the shame and the curse of Russia.

 

That is what we should dream of!

 

 

“We should dream!” I wrote these words and became alarmed. I imagined
myself sitting at a “unity conference” and opposite me were
the Rabocheye Dyelo editors and contributors. Comrade Martynov rises
and, turning to me, says sternly: “Permit me to ask you, has an
autonomous editorial board the right to dream without first soliciting
the opinion of the Party committees?” He is followed by Comrade
Krichevsky; who (philosophically deepening Comrade Martynov, who long
ago rendered Comrade Plekhanov more profound) continues even more
sternly: “I go further. I ask, has a Marxist any right at all to dream,
knowing that according to Marx, mankind always sets itself the tasks it
can solve and that tactics is a process of the growth of Party tasks
which grow together with the Party?”

 

The very thought of these stern questions sends a cold shiver down my
spine and makes me wish for nothing but a place to hide in. I shall try
to hide behind the back of Pisarev.

 

“There are rifts and rifts,” wrote Pisarev of the rift between dreams
and reality. “My dream may run ahead of the natural march of events or
may fly off at a tangent in a direction in which no natural march of
events will ever proceed. In the first case my dream will not cause any
harm; it may even support and augment the energy of the working men....
There is nothing in such dreams that would distort or paralyse
labour-power. On the contrary, if man were completely deprived of the
ability to dream in this way, if he could not from time to time run
ahead and mentally conceive, in an entire and completed picture, the
product to which his hands are only just beginning to lend shape, then I
cannot at all imagine what stimulus there would be to induce man to
undertake and complete extensive and strenuous work in the sphere of
art, science, and practical endeavour.... The rift between dreams and
reality causes no harm if only the person dreaming believes seriously in
his dream, if he attentively observes life, compares his observations
with his castles in the air, and if, generally speaking, he works
conscientiously for the achievement of his fantasies. If there is some
connection between dreams and life then all is well.”^(¹²⁵)

 

Of this kind of dreaming there is unfortunately too little in our
movement. And the people most responsible for this are those who boast
of their sober views, their “closeness” to the “concrete”, the
representatives of legal criticism and of illegal “tail-ism”.

 


5.3 What Type of Organisation Do We Require?

 

From what has been said the reader will see that our “tactics. as-plan”
consists in rejecting an immediate call for assault; in demanding “to
lay effective siege to the enemy fortress”; or, in other words, in
demanding that all efforts be directed towards gathering, organising,
and mobilising a permanent army. When we ridiculed Rabocheye Dyelo for
its leap from Economism to shouting for an assault (for which it
clamoured in April 1901, in “Listok” Rabochego Dyela, 157 No. 6) it of
course came down on us with accusations of being “doctrinaire”, of
failing to understand our revolutionary duty, of calling for caution,
etc. Of course, we were not in the least surprised to hear these
accusations from those who totally lack principles and who evade all
arguments by references to a profound “tactics-as-process”, any more
than we were surprised by the fact that these charges were repeated by
Nadezhdin, who in general has a supreme contempt for durable programmes
and the fundamentals of tactics.

 

It is said that history does not repeat itself. But Nadezhdin exerts
every effort to cause it to repeat itself and he zealously imitates
Tkachov^(¹²⁶) in strongly condemning “revolutionary culturism”, in
shouting about “sounding the tocsin” and about a special “
eve-of-the-revolution point of view”, etc., Apparently, he has forgotten
the well-known maxim that while an original historical event represents
a tragedy, its replica is merely a farce.^(¹²⁷) The attempt to seize
power, which was prepared by the preaching of Tkachov and carried out by
means of the “terrifying” terror that did really terrify, had grandeur,
but the “excitative” terror of a Tkachov the Little is simply ludicrous,
particularly so when it is supplemented with the idea of an organisation
of average people.

“If Iskra would only emerge from its sphere of bookishness,” wrote
Nadezhdin, “it would realise that these (instances like the worker’s
letter to Iskra, No. 7, etc.) are symptoms of the fact that soon, very
soon, the ’assault’ will begin, and to speak now [sic!] of an
organisation linked with an all-Russia newspaper means to propagate
armchair ideas and armchair activity.” What an unimaginable muddle — on
the one hand, excitative terror and an “organisation of average people”,
along with the opinion that it is far “easier” to gather around
something “more concrete”, like a local newspaper, and, on the other,
the view that to talk “now” about an all-Russia organisation means to
propagate armchair thoughts, or, bluntly put, “now” it is already too
late! But what of the “extensive organisation of local newspapers” — is
it not too late for that, my dear L. Nadezhdin? And compare with
this Iskra’s point of view and tactical line: excitative terror is
nonsense; to talk of an organisation of average people and of
the extensive publication of local newspapers means to fling the door
wide open to Economism. We must speak of a single all-Russia
organisation of revolutionaries, and it will never be too late to talk
of that until the real, not a paper, assault begins.

 

“Yes, as far as organisation is concerned the situation is anything but
brilliant,” continues Nadezhdin. “Yes, Iskra is entirely right in saying
that the mass of our fighting forces consists of volunteers and
insurgents.... You do well to give such a sober picture of the state of
our forces. But why, at the same time, do you forget that the masses are
not ours at all, and consequently, will not ask us when to begin
military operations; they will simply go and ’rebel’.... When the crowd
itself breaks out with its elemental destructive force it may overwhelm
and sweep aside the ’regular troops’ among whom we prepared all the time
to introduce extremely systematic organisation, but never managed to do
so.” (Our italics.)

 

Astounding logic! For the very reason that the “masses are not ours” it
is stupid and unseemly to shout about an immediate “assault”, for
assault means attack by regular troops and not a spontaneous mass
upsurge. For the very reason that the masses may overwhelm and sweep
aside the regular troops we must without fail “manage to keep up” with
the spontaneous upsurge by our work of “introducing extremely systematic
organisation” in the regular troops, for the more we “manage” to
introduce such organisation the more probably will the regular troops
not be overwhelmed by the masses, but will take their place at their
head. Nadezhdin is confused because he imagines that troops in the
course of systematic organisation are engaged in something that isolates
them from the masses, when in actuality they are engaged exclusively in
all-sided and all-embracing political. agitation, i.e., precisely in
work that brings closer and merges into a single whole the elemental
destructive force of the masses and the conscious destructive force of
the organisation of revolutionaries. You, gentlemen, wish to lay the
blame where it does not belong. For it is precisely the Svoboda group
that, by including terror in its programme, calls for an organisation of
terrorists, and such an organisation would indeed prevent our troops
from establishing closer contacts with the masses, which, unfortunately,
are still not ours, and which, unfortunately, do not yet ask us, or
rarely ask us, when and how to launch their military operations.

 

“We shall miss the revolution itself,” continues Nadezhdin in his
attempt to scare Iskra, “in the same way as we missed ..the recent
events, which came upon us like a bolt from the blue.” This sentence,
taken in connection with what has been quoted above, clearly
demonstrates the absurdity of the “eve-of-the-revolution point of view”
invented by Svoboda.^(¹²⁸) Plainly put, this special “point of view”
boils down to this that it is too late “now” to discuss and prepare. If
that is the case, most worthy opponent of “bookishness”, what was the
use of writing a pamphlet of 132 pages on questions of theory^(¹²⁹) and
tactics”? Don’t you think it would have been more becoming for the
“eve-of-the-revolution point of view” to have issued 132,000 leaflets
containing the summary call, “Bang them — knock’em down!”?

Those who make nation-wide political agitation the cornerstone of their
programme, their tactics, and their organisational work, as Iskra does,
stand the least risk of missing the revolution. The people who are now
engaged throughout Russia in weaving the network of connections that
spread from the all-Russia newspaper not only did not miss the spring
events, but, on the contrary, gave us an opportunity to foretell them.
Nor did they miss the demonstrations that were described in Iskra, Nos.
13 and 14; on the contrary, they took part in them, clearly realising
that it was their duty to come to the aid of the spontaneously rising
masses and, at the same time, through the medium of the newspaper, help
all the comrades in Russia to inform themselves of the demonstrations
and to make use of their gathered experience. And if they live
theywill not miss the revolution, which, first and foremost, will demand
of us experience in agitation, ability to support (in a
Social-Democratic manner) every protest, as well as direct the
spontaneous movement, while safeguarding it from the mistakes of friends
and the traps of enemies.

 

We have thus come to the last reason that compels us so strongly to
insist on the plan of an organisation centred round an all-Russia
newspaper, through the common work for the common newspaper. Only such
organisation will ensure the flexibility required of a militant
Social-Democratic organisation, viz., the ability to adapt itself
immediately to the most diverse and rapidly changing conditions of
struggle, the ability, “on the one hand, to avoid an open battle against
an overwhelming enemy, when the enemy has concentrated all his forces at
one spot and yet, on the other, to take advantage of his unwieldiness
and to attack him when and where he least expects it”.^(¹³⁰) It would be
a grievous error indeed to build the Party organisation in anticipation
only of outbreaks and street fighting, or only upon the “forward march
of the drab everyday struggle”. We must always conduct our everyday work
and always be prepared for every situation, because very frequently it
is almost impossible to foresee when a period of outbreak will give way
to a period of calm. In the instances, however, when it is possible to
do so, we could not turn this foresight to account for the purpose of
reconstructing our organisation; for in an autocratic country these
changes take place with astonishing rapidity, being sometimes connected
with a single night raid by the tsarist janizaries.^(¹³¹) And the
revolution itself must not by any means be regarded as a single act (as
the Nadezhdins apparently imagine), but as a series of more or less
powerful outbreaks rapidly alternating with periods of more or less
complete calm. For that reason, the principal content of the activity of
our Party organisation, the focus of this activity, should be work that
is both possible and essential in the period of a most powerful outbreak
as well as in the period of complete calm, namely, work of political
agitation, connected throughout Russia, illuminating all aspects of
life, and conducted among the broadest possible strata of the masses.
But this work is unthinkable in present-day Russia without an all-Russia
newspaper, issued very frequently. The organisation, which will form
round this newspaper, the organisation of its collaborators (in the
broad sense of the word, i.e., all those working for it), will be
ready for everything, from upholding the honour, the prestige, and the
continuity of the Party in periods of acute revolutionary “depression”
to preparing for, appointing the time for, and carrying out the
nation-wide armed uprising.

 

Indeed, picture to yourselves a very ordinary occurrence in Russia-the
total round-up of our comrades in one or several localities. In the
absence of a single, common, regular activity that combines all the
local organisations, such round-ups frequently result in the
interruption of the work for many months. If, however, all the local
organisations had one common activity, then, even in the event of a very
serious round-up, two or three energetic persons could in the course of
a few weeks establish contact between the common centre and new youth
circles, which, as we know, spring up very quickly even now. And when
the common activity, hampered by the arrests, is apparent to all, new
circles will be able to come into being and make connections with the
centre even more rapidly.

 

On the other hand, picture to yourselves a popular uprising. Probably
everyone will now agree that we must think of this and prepare for it.
But how? Surely the Central Committee cannot appoint agents to all
localities for the purpose of preparing the uprising. Even if we had a
Central Committee, it could achieve absolutely nothing by such
appointments under present-day Russian conditions. But a network of
agents^(¹³²) that would form in the course of establishing and
distributing the common newspaper would not have to “sit about and wait”
for the call for an uprising, but could carry on the regular activity
that would guarantee the highest probability of success in the event
of an uprising. Such activity would strengthen our contacts with the
broadest strata of the working masses and with all social strata that
are discontented with the autocracy, which is of such importance for an
uprising. Precisely such activity would serve to cultivate the ability
to estimate correctly the general political situation and, consequently,
the ability to select the proper moment for an uprising. Precisely such
activity would train all local organisations to respond simultaneously
to the same political questions, incidents, and events that agitate the
whole of Russia and to react to such “incidents” in the most vigorous,
uniform, and expedient manner possible; for an uprising is in essence
the most vigorous, most uniform, and most expedient “answer” of the
entire people to the government. Lastly, it is precisely such activity
that would train all revolutionary organisations throughout Russia to
maintain the most continuous, and at the same time the most secret,
contacts with one another, thus creating real Party unity; for without
such contacts it will be impossible collectively to discuss’ the plan
for the uprising and to take the necessary preparatory measures on the
eve, measures that must be kept in the strictest secrecy.

 

In a word, the “plan for an all-Russia political newspaper”, far from
representing the fruits of the labour of armchair workers, infected with
dogmatism and bookishness (as it seemed to those who gave but little
thought to it), is the most practical plan for immediate and all-round
preparation of the uprising, with, at the same time, no loss of sight
for a moment of the pressing day-to-day work.

 



CONCLUSION


 

The history of Russian Social-Democracy can be distinctly divided into
three periods:

 

The first period embraces about ten years, approximately from 1884 to
1894. This was the period of the rise and consolidation of the theory
and programme of Social-Democracy. The adherents of the new trend in
Russia were very few in number. Social-Democracy existed without a
working-class movement, and as a political party it was at the embryonic
stage of development.

 

The second period embraces three or four years—1894-98, In this period
Social-Democracy appeared on the scene as a social movement, as the
upsurge of the masses of the people, as a political party. This is the
period of its childhood and adolescence. The intelligentsia was fired
with a vast and general zeal for struggle against Narodism and for going
among the workers; the workers displayed a general enthusiasm for strike
action. The movement made enormous strides. The majority of the leaders
were young people who had not reached “the age of thirty-five” which to
Mr. N. Mikhailovsky appeared to be a sort of natural border-line. Owing
to their youth, they proved to be untrained for practical work and they
left the scene with astonishing rapidity. But in the majority of cases
the scope of their activity was very wide. Many of them had begun their
revolutionary thinking as adherents of Narodnaya Volya. Nearly all had
in their early youth enthusiastically worshipped the terrorist heroes.
It required a struggle to abandon the captivating impressions of those
heroic traditions, and the struggle was accompanied by the breaking off
of personal relations with people who were determined to remain loyal to
the Narodnaya Volya and for whom the young Social-Democrats had profound
respect. The struggle compelled the youthful leaders to educate
themselves to read illegal literature of every trend, and to study
closely the questions of legal Narodism. Trained in this struggle,
Social-Democrats went into the working-class movement without “for a
moment” forgetting either the theory of Marxism, which brightly
illumined their path, or the task of overthrowing the autocracy. The
formation of the Party in the spring of 1898 was the most striking and
at the same time the last act of the Social-Democrats of this period.

 

The third period, as we have seen, was prepared in 1897 and it
definitely cut off the second period in 1898 (1898-?). This was a period
of disunity, dissolution, and vacillation. During adolescence a youth’s
voice breaks. And so, in this period, the voice of Russian
Social-Democracy began to break, to strike a false note — on the one
hand, in the writings of Messrs. Struve and Prokopovich, of Bulgakov and
Berdyaev, and on the other, in those of V. l-n and R. M., of B.
Krichevsky and Martynov. But it was only the leaders who wandered about
separately and drew back; the movement itself continued to grow, and it
advanced with enormous strides. The proletarian struggle spread to new
strata of the workers and extended to the whole of Russia, at the same
time indirectly stimulating the revival of the democratic spirit among
the students and among other sections of the population. The political
consciousness of the leaders, however, capitulated before the breadth
and power of the spontaneous upsurge; among the Social-Democrats,
another type had become dominant — the type of functionaries, trained
almost exclusively on “legal Marxist” literature, which proved to be all
the more inadequate the more the spontaneity of the masses demanded
political consciousness on the part of the leaders. The leaders not only
lagged behind in regard to theory (“freedom of criticism”) and practice
(“primitiveness”), but they sought to justify their backwardness by all
manner of high-flown arguments. Social-Democracy was degraded to the
level of trade-unionism by the Brentano adherents in legal literature,
and by the tail-enders in illegal literature. The _Credo_ programme
began to be put into operation, especially when the “primitive methods”
of the Social-Democrats caused a revival of revolutionary
non-Social-Democratic tendencies.

 

If the reader should feel critical that I have dealt at too great length
with a certain _Rabocheye Dyelo_, _I_ can say only that _Rabocheye
Dyelo_ acquired “historical” significance because it most notably
reflected the “spirit” of this third period.^(¹³³) It was not the
consistent R. M., but the weathercock Krichevskys and Martynovs who were
able properly to express the disunity and vacillation, the readiness to
make concessions to “criticism” to “Economism”, and to terrorism. Not
the lofty contempt for practical work displayed by some worshipper of
the “absolute” is characteristic of this period, but the combination of
pettifogging practice and utter disregard for theory. It was not so much
in the direct rejection of “grandiose phrases” that the heroes of this
period engaged as in their vulgarisation. Scientific socialism ceased to
be an integral revolutionary theory and became a hodgepodge “freely”
diluted with the content of every new German textbook that appeared; the
slogan “class struggle” did not impel to broader and more energetic
activity but served as a balm, since “the economic struggle is
inseparably linked with the political struggle”; the idea of a party did
not serve as a call for the creation of a militant organisation of
revolutionaries, but was used to justify some sort of “revolutionary
bureaucracy” and infantile playing at “democratic” forms.

 

When the third period will come to an end and the fourth (now heralded
by many portents) will begin we do not know. We are passing from the
sphere of history to the sphere of the present and, partly, of the
future. But we firmly believe that the fourth period will lead to the
consolidation of militant Marxism, that Russian Social-Democracy will
emerge from the crisis in the full flower of manhood, that the
opportunist rearguard will be “replaced” by the genuine vanguard of the
most revolutionary class.

 

In the sense of calling for such a “replacement” and by way of summing
up what has been expounded above, we may meet the question, What is to
be done? with the brief reply:

 

Put an End to the Third Period.

 



APPENDIX^(¹³⁴): THE ATTEMPT TO UNITE _ISKRA_ WITH _RABOCHEYE DYELO_


 

It remains for us to describe the tactics adopted and consistently
pursued by _Iskra_ in its organisational relations with _Rabocheye
Dyelo_. These tactics were fully expressed in _Iskra_, No. 1, in the
article entitled “The Split in the Union of Russian Social-Democrats
Abroad”.^(¹³⁵) From the outset we adopted the point of view that
the _real_ Union of Russian Social-Democrats Abroad, which at the First
Congress of our Party was recognised as its representative abroad, _had
split_ into two organisations; that the question of the Party’s
representation remained an open one, having been settled only
temporarily and conditionally by the election, at the International
Congress in Paris, of two members to represent Russia on the
International Socialist Bureau,^(¹³⁶) one from each of the two sections
of the divided Union Abroad. We declared that fundamentally _Rabocheye
Dyelo_ was wrong; in principle we emphatically took the side of the
Emancipation of Labour group, at the same time refusing to enter into
the details of the split and noting the services rendered by the Union
Abroad in the sphere of purely practical work.^(¹³⁷)

 

Consequently, ours was, to a certain extent, a waiting policy. We made a
concession to the opinions prevailing among the majority of the Russian
Social-Democrats that the most determined opponents of Economism could
work hand in hand with the Union Abroad because it had repeatedly
declared its agreement in principle with the Emancipation of Labour
group, without, allegedly, taking an independent position on fundamental
questions of theory and tactics. The correctness of our position was
indirectly proved by the fact that almost simultaneously with the
appearance of the first issue of _Iskra_ (December 1900) three members
separated from the Union, formed the so-called “Initiators’ Group”, and
offered their services: (1) to the foreign section of
the _Iskra_ organisation, (2) to the
revolutionary _Sotsial-Demokrat_ organisation, and (3) to the Union
Abroad, as mediators in negotiations for reconciliation. The first two
organisations at once announced their agreement; _the third turned
down_ the offer. True, when a speaker related these facts at the “Unity”
Conference last year, a member of the Administrative Committee of the
Union Abroad declared the rejection of the offer to have been
due _entirely_ to the fact that the Union Abroad was dissatisfied with
the composition of the Initiators’ Group. While I consider it my duty to
cite this explanation, I cannot, however, refrain from observing that it
is an unsatisfactory one; for, knowing that two organisations had agreed
to enter into negotiations, the Union Abroad could have approached them
through another intermediary or directly.

 

In the spring of 1901 both _Zarya_ (No. 1, April) and _Iskra_ (No. 4,
May)^(¹³⁸)  entered into open polemics with _Rabocheye Dyelo.
Iskra_ particularly attacked the article “A Historic Turn” in _Rabocheye
Dyelo_, which, in its _April_ supplement, that is, after the spring
events, revealed instability on the question of terror and the calls for
“blood”, with which many had been carried away at the time.
Notwithstanding the polemics, the Union Abroad agreed to resume
negotiations for reconciliation through the instrumentality of a new
group of “conciliators” A preliminary conference of representatives of
the three cited organisations, held in June, framed a draft agreement on
the basis of a very detailed “accord on principles”, which the Union
Abroad published in the pamphlet _Two Conferences_, and the League
Abroad in the pamphlet _Documents of the “Unity” Conference_.

 

The contents of this accord on principles (more frequently named the
Resolutions of the June Conference) make it perfectly clear that we put
forward as an absolute condition for unity _the most
emphatic_ repudiation of any and every manifestation of opportunism
generally, and of Russian opportunism in particular. Paragraph 1 reads:
“We repudiate all attempts to introduce opportunism into the proletarian
class struggle — attempts that have found expression in the so-called
Economism, Bernsteinism, Millerandism, etc.” “The sphere of
Social-Democratic activities includes ... ideological struggle against
all opponents of revolutionary Marxism” (4, c); “In every sphere of
organisational and agitational activity Social-Democracy must never for
a moment forget that the immediate task of the Russian proletariat is
the overthrow of the autocracy” (5, a); “agitation … not only on the
basis of the everyday struggle between wage-labour and capital” (5, b);
“. . . we do not recognise. . . a stage of purely economic struggle and
of struggle for partial political demands” (5, c); “. . we consider it
important for the movement to criticise tendencies that make a principle
of the elementariness and narrowness of the lower forms of the movement”
(5, d). Even a complete outsider, having read these resolutions at all
attentively, will have realised from their very formulations that they
are directed against people who were opportunists and Economists, who,
even for a moment, forgot the task of overthrowing the autocracy, who
recognised the theory of stages, who elevated narrowness to a principle,
etc. Anyone who has the least acquaintance with the polemics conducted
by the Emancipation of Labour group, _Zarya_,
and _Iskra_ against _Rabocheye Dyelo_ cannot doubt for a single moment
that these resolutions repudiate, point by point, the very errors into
which _Rabocheye Dyelo_ strayed. Hence, when a member of the Union
Abroad declared at the “Unity” Conference that the articles in No. 10
of _Rabocheye Dyelo_ had been prompted, not by a new “historic turn” on
the part of the Union Abroad, but by the excessive “abstractness” of the
resolution,^(¹³⁹) the assertion was justly ridiculed by one of the
speakers. Far from being abstract, he said, the resolutions were
incredibly concrete: one could see at a glance that they were “trying to
catch somebody”.

 

This remark occasioned a characteristic incident at the Conference. On
the one hand, Krichevsky, seizing upon the word “catch” in the belief
that this was a slip of the tongue which betrayed our evil intentions
(“to set a trap”), pathetically exclaimed: “Whom are they out to catch?”
“Whom indeed?” rejoined Plekhanov sarcastically. “Let me come to the aid
of Comrade Plekhanov’s lack of perspicacity,” replied Krichevsky. “Let
me explain to him that the trap was set _for the Editorial Board of
Rabocheye Dyelo_ [general laughter] but we have not allowed ourselves to
be caught!” (A remark from the left: “All the worse for you!”) On the
other hand, a member of the Borba group (a group of conciliators),
opposing the amendments of the Union Abroad to the resolutions and
desiring to defend our speaker, declared that obviously the word “catch”
was dropped by chance in the heat of polemics.

 

For my part, I think the speaker responsible for uttering the word will
hardly be pleased with this “defence”. I think the words “trying to
catch somebody” were “true words spoken in jest”; we have always
accused _Rabocheye Dyelo _of instability_ _and vacillation, and,
naturally, we _had _to try _to catch _it in order to put a stop to the
vacillation. There is not the slightest suggestion of evil intent in
this, for we were discussing instability of principles And we succeeded
in “catching” the Union Abroad in such comradely manner^(¹⁴⁰) that
Krichevsky himself and one other member of the Administrative Committee
of the Union signed the June resolutions.

 

The articles in _Rabocheye Dyelo_, No. 10 (our comrades saw the issue
for the first time when they arrived at the Conference, a few days
before the meetings started) clearly showed that a new turn had taken
place in the Union Abroad in the period between the summer and the
autumn: the Economists had once more gained the upper hand, and the
Editorial Board, which veered with every “wind”, again set out to defend
“the most pronounced Berristeinians” and “freedom of criticism”, to
defend “spontaneity”, and through the lips of Martynov to preach the
“theory of restricting” the sphere of our political influence (for the
alleged purpose of rendering this influence more complex). Once again
Parvus’ apt observation that it is difficult to catch an opportunist
with a formula has been proved correct. An opportunist will readily put
his name to _any_ formula and as readily abandon it, because opportunism
means precisely a lack of definite and firm principles. Today, the
opportunists have repudiated _all_ attempts to introduce opportunism,
repudiated _all_ narrowness, solemnly promised “never for a moment to
forget about the task of overthrowing the autocracy” and to carry on
“agitation not only on the basis of the everyday struggle between
wage-labour and capital”, etc., etc. But tomorrow they will change their
form of expression and revert to their old tricks on the pretext of
defending spontaneity and the forward march of the drab everyday
struggle, of extolling demands promising palpable results, etc. By
continuing to assert that in the articles in No. 10 “the Union Abroad
did not and does not now see any heretical departure from the general
principles of the draft adopted at the conference” (_Two Conferences_,
p. 26), the Union Abroad merely reveals a complete lack of ability, or
of desire, to understand the essential points of the disagreements.

 

After the tenth issue of _Rabocheye Dyelo_, we could make one effort:
open a general discussion in order to ascertain whether all the members
of the Union Abroad agreed with the articles and with the Editorial
Board. The Union Abroad is particularly displeased with us because of
this and accuses us of trying to sow discord in its ranks, of
interfering in other people’s business, etc. These accusations are
obviously unfounded, since with an elected editorial board that “veers”
with every wind, however light, everything depends upon the direction of
the wind, and we defined the direction at private meetings at which no
one was present, except members of the organisations intending to unite.
The amendments to the June resolutions submitted in the name of the
Union Abroad have removed the last shadow of hope of arriving at
agreement. The amendments are documentary evidence of the new turn
towards Economism and of the fact that the majority of the Union members
are in agreement with _Rabocheye Dyelo_, No. 10. It was moved to delete
the words “so-called Economism” from the reference to manifestations of
opportunism (on the plea that “the meaning” of these words “was vague”;
but if that were so, all that was required was a more precise definition
of the nature of the widespread error), and to delete “Millerandism”
(although Krichevsky had defended it in _Rabocheye Dyelo_, No. _2-3_,
pp. 83-84, and still more openly in _Vorwarts_^(¹⁴¹)). Notwithstanding
the fact that the June resolutions definitely indicated that the task of
Social-Democracy is “to guide every manifestation of the proletarian
struggle against all forms of political, _economic_, and social
oppression”, thereby calling for the introduction of system and unity in
all these manifestations of the struggle, the Union Abroad added the
wholly superfluous words that “the economic struggle is a powerful
stimulus to the mass movement” (taken by itself, this assertion cannot
be disputed, but with the existence of narrow Economism it could not but
give occasion for false interpretations). Moreover, even the
direct _constriction_ of “politics” was suggested for the June
resolutions, both by the deletion of the words “not for a moment” (to
forget the aim of overthrowing the autocracy) and by the addition of the
words “the economic struggle is the most widely applicable means of
drawing the masses into active political struggle”. Naturally, upon the
submission of such amendments, the speakers on our side refused, one
after another, to take the floor, considering it hopeless to continue
negotiations with people who were again turning towards Economism and
were striving to secure for themselves freedom to vacillate.

 

It was precisely the preservation of the independent features and the
autonomy of _Rabocheye Dyelo_, considered by the Union to be the _sine
qua non_ of the durability of our future agreement,
that _Iskra_ regarded as the stumbling-block to agreement" _(Two
Conferences, p. 25). _This is most inexact. We never had any designs
against _Rabocheye Dyelo’s_ autonomy. ^(¹⁴²)We did indeed _absolutely
refuse to recognise _the independence of its features, if by
“independent features” is meant independence on questions of principle
in theory and tactics. The June resolutions contain an utter repudiation
of _such _independence of features, because, in practice, such
“independence of features” has always meant, as we have pointed out, all
manner of vacillations fostering the disunity which prevails among us
and which is intolerable from the Party point of view. _Rabocheye
Dyelo’s_ articles in its tenth issue, together with its “amendments”
clearly revealed its desire to preserve this kind of independence of
features, and such a desire naturally and inevitably led to a rupture
and a declaration of war. But all of us were ready to
recognise _Rabocheye Dyelo’s_ “independence of features” in the sense
that it should concentrate on definite literary functions. A proper
distribution of these functions naturally called for: (1) a theoretical
magazine, (2) a political newspaper, and (3) popular collections of
articles and popular pamphlets. Only by agreeing to such a distribution
of functions would _Rabocheye Dyelo_ have proved that
it _sincerely_ desired to abandon once and for all its errors, against
which the June resolutions were directed. Only such a distribution of
functions would have removed all possibility of friction, effectively
guaranteed a durable agreement, and, at the same time, served as a basis
for a revival and for new successes of our movement.

 

At present not a single Russian Social-Democrat can have any doubts that
the final rupture between the revolutionary and the opportunist
tendencies was caused, not by any “organisational” circumstances, but by
the desire of the opportunists to consolidate the independent features
of opportunism and to continue to cause confusion of mind by the
disquisitions of the Krichevskys and Martynovs.

 



CORRECTION TO _WHAT IS TO BE DONE?_


 

The Initiators’ Group of whom I speak in the pamphlet _What Is To Be
Done?_ p. 141,^(¹⁴³) have asked me to make the following correction to
my description of the part they played in the attempt to reconcile the
Social-Democratic organisations abroad: “Of the three members of this
group, only one left the Union Abroad at the end of 1900; the others
left in 1901, only after becoming convinced that it was impossible to
obtain the Union’s consent to a conference with the _Iskra_ organisation
abroad and the revolutionary _Sotsial-Demokrat_ organisation, which the
Initiators’ Group had proposed. The Administrative Committee of the
Union Abroad at first rejected this proposal, contending that the
persons comprising the Initiators’ Group were ‘not competent’ to act as
mediators, and it expressed the desire to enter into direct contact with
the _Iskra_ organisation abroad. Soon thereafter, however, the
Administrative Committee of the Union Abroad informed the Initiators’
Group that following the appearance of the first number
of _Iskra_ containing the report of the split in the Union, it had
altered its decision and no longer desired to maintain relations
with _Iskra_. After this, how can one explain the statement made by a
member of the Administrative Committee of the Union Abroad that the
latter’s rejection of a conference was called forth _entirely_ by its
dissatisfaction with the composition of the Initiators’ Group? It is
true that it is equally difficult to explain why the Administrative
Committee of the Union Abroad agreed to a conference in June of last
year, still remained in force and _Iskra’s_ ‘negative’ attitude to the
Union Abroad was still more strongly expressed in the first issue
of _Zarya_, and in No. 4 of _Iskra_, both of which appeared prior to the
June Conference.”

 

N. Lenin

Iskra, No. 19, April 1, 1902

 

 

 



NOTES


[←1]

     See present volume [5], pp. 13–24.—Ed.

[←2]

     Rabochaya Gazeta (Workers’ Gazette)—an illegal newspaper issued by
    the Kiev group of Social-Democrats. Two issues appeared—No. 1 in
    August and No. 2 in December (dated November) 1897. The First
    Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. adopted Rabochaya Gazeta as the official
    organ of the Party, but the newspaper discontinued publication
    shortly after the Congress, as a result of a police raid on the
    printing-press and the arrest of the Central Committee.

[←3]

     See present volume [5], pp. 313–20.—Ed.

[←4]

     Incidentally, in the history of modern socialism this is a
    phenomenon, perhaps unique and in its way very consoling, namely,
    that the strife of the various trends within the socialist movement
    has from national become international. Formerly, the disputes
    between Lassalleans and Eisenachers, between Guesdists and
    Possibilists, between Fabians and Social-Democrats, and between
    Narodnaya Volya adherents and Social-Democrats, remained confined
    within purely national frameworks, reflecting purely national
    features, and proceeding, as it were, on different planes. At the
    present time (as is now evident), the English Fabians, the French
    Ministerialists, the German Bernsteinians, and the Russian Critics –
    all belong to the same family, all extol each other, learn from each
    other, and together take up arms against “dogmatic” Marxism. In this
    first really international battle with socialist opportunism,
    international revolutionary Social-Democracy will perhaps become
    sufficiently strengthened to put an end to the political reaction
    that has long reigned in Europe? —Lenin

[←5]

     Karl Marx, The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte, Marx and
    Engels, Selected Works, Vol. I, Moscow, 1959, p. 245.

[←6]

     A comparison of the two trends within the revolutionary proletariat
    (the revolutionary and the opportunist), and the two trends within
    the revolutionary bourgeoisie in the eighteenth century (the
    Jacobin, known as the Mountain, and the Girondist) was made in the
    leading article in No. 2 of Iskra (February 1901). The article was
    written by Plekhanov. The Cadets, the Bezzaglavtsi, and the
    Mensheviks to this day love to refer to Jacobinism in Russian
    Social-Democracy. But how Plekhanov came to apply this concept for
    the first time against the Right wing of Social-Democracy – about
    this they prefer to keep silent or to forget. (Author’s note to the
    1907 edition – Ed.) —Lenin

[←7]

     Ilovaisky, D. I. (1832–1920)—historian; author of numerous official
    textbooks of history that were extensively used in primary and
    secondary schools in pre-revolutionary Russia. In Ilovaisky’s texts
    history was reduced mainly to acts of kings and generals; the
    historical process was explained through secondary and fortuitous
    circumstances.

[←8]

     At the time Engels dealt his blows at Duhring, many representatives
    of German Social-Democracy inclined towards the latter’s views, and
    accusations of acerbity, intolerance, uncomradely polemics, etc.,
    were hurled at Engels even publicly at a Party Congress. At the
    Congress of 1877, Most, and his supporters, introduced a resolution
    to prohibit the publication of Engels’s articles in Vorwarts because
    “they do not interest the overwhelming majority of the readers”, and
    VahIteich declared that their publication had caused great damage to
    the Party, that Duhring too had rendered services to
    Social-Democracy: “We must utilise everyone in the interests of the
    Party; let the professors engage in polemics if they care to do so,
    but Vorwarts is not the place in which to conduct them” (Vorwarts,
    No. 65, June 6, 1877). Here we have another example of the defence
    of “freedom of criticism”, and our legal critics and illegal
    opportunists, who love so much to cite the example of the Germans,
    would do well to ponder it! —Lenin

[←9]

     Katheder-Socialism—a trend in bourgeois political economy that
    emerged in Germany in the seventies and eighties of the nineteenth
    century. Under the guise of socialism the Katheder-Socialists
    preached bourgeois-liberal reformism from university chairs
    (Katheder). They maintained that the bourgeois state was above
    classes, that it was capable of reconciling hostile classes and
    gradually introducing “socialism”, without affecting the interests
    of the capitalists, while, at the same time, taking the demands of
    the workers as far as possible into consideration. In Russia
    the views of the Katheder-Socialists were disseminated by the “legal
    Marxists”.

[←10]

     Nozdryov—a character In Gogol’s Dead Souls whom the author called
    “an historical personage” for the reason that wherever he went he
    left behind him a scandalous “history”.

[←11]

     The Hanover resolution—resolution on “Attacks on the Fundamental
    Views and Tactics of the Party”, adopted by the German
    Social-Democratic Party Congress at Hanover, September 27–October 2
    (October 9–14), 1899. A discussion of this question at the Congress
    and the adoption of a special resolution were necessitated by the
    fact that the opportunists, led by Bernstein, launched a revisionist
    attack on Marxist theory and demanded a reconsideration of
    Social-Democratic revolutionary policy and tactics. The resolution
    adopted by the Congress rejected the demands of the revisionists,
    but failed to criticise and expose Bernsteinism. Bernstein’s
    supporters also voted for the resolution.

[←12]

     It should be observed that Rabocheye Dyelo has always confined
    itself to a bare statement of facts concerning Bernsteinism in the
    German party and completely “refrained” from expressing its own
    opinion. See, for instance, the reports of the Stuttgart Congress in
    No. 2-3 (p. 66), in which all the disagreements are reduced to
    “tactics” and the statement is merely made that the overwhelming
    majority remain true to the previous revolutionary tactics. Or, No.
    4-5 (p. 25, et seq.), in which we have nothing but a paraphrasing of
    the speeches delivered at the Hanover Congress, with a reprint of
    Bebel’s resolution. An exposition and a criticism of Bernstein’s
    views are again put olf (as was the case in No. 2-8) to be dealt
    with in a “special article”. Curiously enough, in No. 4-5 (p. 33),
    we read the following: “...the views expounded by Bebel have the
    support of the vast majority of the Congress,” and a few lines
    thereafter: “ ..David defended Bernstein’s views.... First of all,
    he tried to show that ... Bernstein and his friends, after all is
    said and done (sic!), stand on the basis of the class struggle...”
    This was written in December 1899, and in September 1901 Rabocheye
    Dyelo, apparently no longer believing that Bebel was right, repeats
    David’s views as its own! —Lenin

[←13]

     Starover (Old Believer)—the pseudonym of A. N. Potresov, a member
    of the Iskra Editorial Board; he subsequently became a Menshevik.

[←14]

     “The Author Who Got a Swelled Head”—the title of one of Maxim
    Gorky’s early stories.

[←15]

     The reference is to an article by K. Tulin directed against Struve.
    (See Collected Works, Vol. 1, pp. 333-507. – Ed.) The article was
    based on an essay entitled “The Reflection of Marxism in Bourgeois
    Literature”. (Author’s note to the 1907 edition – Ed.) —Lenin

[←16]

     The reference is to the collection Material for a Characterisation
    of Our Economic Development, printed legally in an edition of 2,000
    copies in April 1895. The collection included Lenin’s article
    (signed K. Tulin) “The Economic Content of Narodism and the
    Criticism of It in Mr. Struve’s Book (The Reflection of Marxism in
    Bourgeois Literature)”, directed against the “legal Marxists” (see
    present edition, Vol. 1, pp. 333–507).

[←17]

     The reference is to the Protest of the Seventeen against the
    Credo. The present writer took part in drawing up this protest (the
    end of 1899). The Protest and the Credo were published abroad in the
    spring of 1900. (See “A Protest of Russian
    Social-Democrats”, Collected Works, Vol. 4, pp. 167-82 –Ed.) It is
    now known from the article written by Madame Kuskova (I think
    in Byloye^([30])) that she was the author of the Credo and that Mr.
    Prokopovich was very prominent among the Economists abroad at the
    time. (Author’s note to the 1907 edition – Ed.) —Lenin

[←18]

     Vademecum for the Editors of Rabocheye Dyelo—a collection of
    articles and documents compiled and prefaced by G. V. Plekhanov and
    published by the Emancipation of Labour group in Geneva in 1900; it
    exposed the opportunist views of the Union of Russian
    Social-Democrats Abroad and of the Editorial Board of its
    periodical, Rabocheye Dyelo.

[←19]

     Confession of faith. —Lenin

[←20]

     As far as our information goes, the composition of the Kiev
    Committee has changed since then. —Lenin

[←21]

     The fact alone of the absence of public party ties and party
    traditions, representing as it does a cardinal difference between
    Russia and Germany, should have warned all sensible socialists
    against blind imitation. But here is an instance of the lengths to
    which “freedom of criticism” goes in Russia. Mr. Bulgakov, the
    Russian Critic, utters the following reprimand to the Austrian
    Critic, Hertz: “Notwithstanding the independence of his conclusions,
    Hertz on this point on the question of co-operative societies)
    apparently remains excessively bound by the opinions of his party,
    and although he disagrees with it in details, he dare not reject the
    common principle” (_Capitalism and Agriculture_, Vol. II, p. 287).
    The subject of a politically enslaved state, in which nine hundred
    and ninety-nine out of a thousand of the population are corrupted to
    the marrow by political subservience and completely lack the
    conception of party honour and party ties, superciliously reproves a
    citizen of a constitutional state for being excessively “bound by
    the opinions of his party”! Our illegal organisations have nothing
    else to do, of course, but draw up resolutions on freedom of
    criticism.... —_Lenin_

[←22]

     See present edition, Vol. 4, p. 354.—Ed.

[←23]

     Byloye (The Past)—a monthly journal on historical problems
    published in St. Petersburg in 1906–07; in 1908 it changed its name
    to Minuvshiye Cody (Years Past). It was banned by the tsarist
    government in 1908, but resumed publication in Petrograd in
    July 1917 and continued in existence until 1926.

[←24]

     The Gotha Programme—the programme adopted by the German
    Social-Democratic Party at the Gotha Congress in 1875 when the
    Eisenachers and Lassalleans united. The programme suffered from
    eclecticism and opportunism, since the Eisenachers made concessions
    to the Lassalleans on the most important points and accepted their
    formulations. Marx and Engels subjected the Gotha Programme to
    scathing criticism and characterised it as a retrograde step as
    compared with the Eisenach Programme of 1869 (See Karl
    Marx, Critique of the Gotha Programme, Marx and Engels, Selected
    Works, Vol. II, Moscow, 1958, pp. 13–48).

[←25]

     Dritter Abdruck, Leipzig, 1875. Verlag der
    Genossenschaftsbuchdruckerei. (The Peasant War in Germany. Third
    impression. Co-operative Publishers, Leipzig, 1875.—Ed.) —Lenin

[←26]

     See Marx and Engels, Selected Works, Vol. I, Moscow, 1958,
    pp. 652-54.

[←27]

     Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10, September 1901, pp. 17-18. Rabocheye
    Dyelo’s italics.—Lenin

[←28]

     Trade-unionism does not exclude “politics” altogether, as some
    imagine. Trade unions have always conducted some political (but not
    Social-Democratic) agitation and struggle. We shall deal with the
    difference between trade union politics and Social-Democratic
    politics in the next chapter.—Lenin

[←29]

     The pamphlet On Agitation was written by A. Kremer (later an
    organiser of the Bund) and edited by Y. 0. Tsederbaum (Martov) in
    Vilno in 1894; it was at first circulated in handwritten and
    hectographed copies, but at the end of 1897 it was printed in Geneva
    and supplied with a preface and a concluding piece by P. B. Axelrod.
    The pamphlet summarised the experiences gained in Social-Democratic
    work in Vilno and exerted a great influence on Russian
    Social-Democrats, since it called on them to reject narrow
    study-circle propaganda and to go over to mass agitation among the
    workers on issues of their everyday needs and demands. It
    exaggerated the role of the purely economic struggle, however, to
    the detriment of political agitation on issues of general democratic
    demands, and was the embryo of the future “Economism”. P. B. Axelrod
    not ed the one-sidedness of the “Vilno Economism” in his concluding
    piece to the Geneva edition; G. V. Plekhanov made a critical
    analysis of the pamphlet On Agitation in his Once More on Socialism
    and the Political Struggle.

[←30]

     A. A. Vaneyev died in Eastern Siberia in 1899 from consumption,
    which he contracted during solitary confinement in prison prior to
    his banishment. That is why we considered it possible to publish the
    above information, the authenticity of which we guarantee, for it
    comes from persons who were closely and directly acquainted with A.
    A. Vaneyev.—Lenin

[←31]

     Russkaya Starina (The Russian Antiquary)—a monthly magazine dealing
    with historical problems published in St. Petersburg from 1870
    to 1918.

[←32]

     See present edition, Vol. 2, pp. 87-92.—Ed.

[←33]

     S. Peterburgsky Rabochy Listok (St.Petersburg Workers’ Paper)—an
    illegal newspaper, organ of the St. Petersburg League of Struggle
    for the Emancipation of the Working Class. Two issues appeared: No.
    1 in February 1897 (dated January and mimeographed in Russia in an
    edition of 300—400 copies) and No. 2 in September 1897 in Geneva.

[←34]

     “In adopting a hostile attitude towards the activities of the
    Social-Democrats of the late nineties, Iskra ignores the absence at
    that time of conditions for any work other than the struggle for
    petty demands,” declare the Economists in their “Letter to Russian
    Social-Democratic Organs” (Iskra No. 12). The facts given above show
    that the assertion about “absence of conditions” is diametrically
    opposed to the truth. Not only at the end, but even in the
    mid-nineties, all the conditions existed for other work, besides the
    struggle for petty demands — all the conditions except adequate
    training of leaders. Instead of frankly admitting that we,
    the ideologists, the leaders, lacked sufficient training — the
    Economists seek to shift the blame entirely upon the “absence of
    conditions”, upon the effect of material environment that determines
    the road from which no ideologist will be able to divert the
    movement. What is this but slavish cringing before spontaneity, what
    but the infatuation of the “ideologists” with their own
    shortcomings?—Lenin

[←35]

     A private meeting referred to here was held in St. Petersburg
    between February 14 and 17 (February 26 and March 1), 1897. It was
    attended by V. I. Lenin, A. A. Vaneyev, G. M. Krzhizhanovsky, and
    other members of the St. Petersburg League of Struggle for the
    Emancipation of the Working Class, that is, by the “veterans” who
    had been released from prison for three days before being sent into
    exile to Siberia, as well as by the “young” leaders of the League of
    Struggle who had taken over the leadership of the League after
    Lenin’s arrest in December 1895.

[←36]

     “Listok” Rabotnika (The Workingman’s Paper)—published in Geneva by
    the Union of Russian Social-Democrats Abroad from 1896 to 1899;
    altogether there appeared 10 issues. Issues 1—8 were edited by the
    Emancipation of Labour group. But after the majority of the Union
    Abroad went over to “Economism”, the Emancipation of Labour group
    refused to continue editing the paper. Nos. 9 and 10 were issued by
    a new editorial board set up by the Union of Russian
    Social-Democrats Abroad.

[←37]

     The “article by V. I.”—an article by V. P. Ivanshin.

[←38]

     It should be stated in passing that the praise of Rabochaya Mysl in
    November 1898, when Economism had become fully defined, especially
    abroad, emanated from the selfsame V. I, who very soon after became
    one of the editors of Rabocheye Dyelo. And yet Rabocheye
    Dyelo denied that there were two trends in Russian Social-Democracy,
    and continues to deny It to this day!—Lenin

[←39]

     The tsarist gendarmes wore blue uniforms.—Tr.

[←40]

     That this simile is a correct one is shown by the following
    characteristic fact. When, after the arrest of the “Decembrists”,
    the news spread among the workers of the Schlüsselburg Highway that
    the discovery and arrest were facilitated by an agent
    provocateur, N. N. Mikhailov, a dentist, who had been in contact
    with a group associated with the “Decembrists”, the workers were so
    enraged that they decided to kill him.—Lenin

[←41]

     These quotations are taken from the same leading article in the
    first number of Rabochaya Mysl. One can judge from this the degree
    of theoretical training possessed by these “V. V.s of Russian
    Social-Democracy”, who kept repeating the crude vulgarisation of
    “economic materialism” at a time when the Marxists were carrying on
    a literary war against the real Mr. V. V., who had long ago been
    dubbed “a past master of reactionary deeds” for holding similar
    views on the relations between politics and economics!—Lenin

[←42]

     The Germans even have a special expression, Nur-Gewerkschaftler,
    which means an advocate of the “pure trade union” struggle.—Lenin

[←43]

     We emphasise the word _contemporary_ for the benefit of those who
    may pharisaically shrug their shoulders and say: It is easy enough
    to attack_Rabochaya Mysl_ now, but is not all this ancient
    history? _Mutato nomine de te fabula narratur_ (change the name and
    the tale is about you—_Ed_.) is our answer to such contemporary
    Pharisees, whose complete subjection to the ideas of Rabochaya Mysl
    will be _proved _further on. —_Lenin_

[←44]

     Letter of the Economists, in Iskra, No. 12.—Lenin

[←45]

     Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10.—Lenin

[←46]

     Neue Zeit, 1901-02, XX, I, No. 3, p. 79. The committee’s draft to
    which Kautsky refers was adopted by the Vienna Congress (at the end
    of last year) in a slightly amended form.—Lenin

[←47]

     This does not mean, of course, that the workers have no part in
    creating such an ideology. They take part, however, not as workers,
    but as socialist theoreticians, as Proudhons and Weitlings; in other
    words, they take part only when they are able, and to the extent
    that they are able, more or less, to acquire the knowledge of their
    age and develop that knowledge. But in order that working men _may
    succeed in this more often_, every effort must be made to raise the
    level of the consciousness of the workers in general; it is
    necessary that the workers do not confine themselves to the
    artificially restricted limits of “_literature for workers_” but
    that they learn to an increasing degree to master _general
    literature_. It would be even truer to say “are not confined”,
    instead of “do not confine themselves”, because the workers
    themselves wish to read and do read all that is written for the
    intelligentsia, and only a few (bad) intellectuals believe that it
    is enough “for workers” to be told a few things about factory
    conditions and to have repeated to them over and over again what has
    long been known. —_Lenin_

[←48]

     The Hirsch-Duncker Unions were established in Germany in 1868 by
    Hirsch and Duncker, two bourgeois liberals. They preached the
    “harmony of class interests”, drew the workers away from the
    revolutionary class struggle against the bourgeoisie, and restricted
    the role of the trade unions to that of mutual benefit societies and
    educational bodies.

[←49]

     It is often said that the working class _spontaneously_ gravitates
    towards socialism. This is perfectly true in the sense that
    socialist theory reveals the causes of the misery of the working
    class more profoundly and more correctly than any other theory, and
    for that reason the workers are able to assimilate it so
    easily, _provided_, however, this theory does not itself yield to
    spontaneity, _provided_ it subordinates spontaneity to itself.
    Usually this is taken for granted, but it is precisely this
    which _Rabocheye Dyelo_ forgets or distorts. The working class
    spontaneously gravitates towards socialism; nevertheless, most
    widespread (and continuously and diversely revived) bourgeois
    ideology spontaneously imposes itself upon the working class to a
    still greater degree. —_Lenin_

[←50]

     The Self-Emancipation of the Workers Group—a small group of
    “Economists” formed in St. Petersburg in the autumn of 1898; it
    existed for only a few months and published a manifesto setting
    forth its aims [published in Nakanune (On the Eve) in London], a set
    of rules and several leaflets addressed to the workers.

[←51]

     Nakanune (On the Eve)—a journal expressing Narodnik views. It was
    published in Russian in London from January 1899 to February
    1902—altogether 37 issues. The journal was a rallying point for
    representatives of various petty-bourgeois parties.

[←52]

     Present Tasks and Tactics of the Russian Social-Democracy,
    Geneva, 1898. Two letters to Rabochaya Gazeta, written in
    1897.—Lenin

[←53]

     See present edition, Vol. 2, pp. 323—51.—Ed.

[←54]

     In defending its first untruth (“we do not know to which young
    comrades Axelrod referred”), Rabocheye Dyelo added a second, when it
    wrote in its Reply: “Since the review of The Tasks was published,
    tendencies have arisen, or become more or less clearly defined,
    among certain Russian Social-Democrats, towards economic
    one-sidedness, which represent a step backwards from the state of
    our movement as described in The Tasks” (p. 9). This, in the Reply,
    published in 1900. But the first issue of Rabocheye
    Dyelo (containing the review) appeared in April 1899. Did Economism
    really arise only in 1899? No. The year 1899 saw the first protest
    of the Russian Social-Democrats against Economism (the protest
    against the Credo). Economism arose in 1897, as Rabocheye Dyelo very
    well knows, for already in November 1898, V. I. was praising
    Rabochaya Mysl (see “Listok” Rabotnika, No. 9-10).—Lenin

[←55]

     The “stages theory”, or the theory of “timid zigzags”, in the
    political struggle is expressed, for example, in this article, in
    the following way: “Political demands, which in their character are
    common to the whole of Russia, should, however, at first (this was
    written in August 1900!) correspond to the experience gained by the
    given stratum (sic!) of workers in the economic struggle. Only [!]
    on the basis of this experience can and should political agitation
    be taken up,” etc. (p. 11). On page 4, the author, protesting
    against what he regards as the absolutely unfounded charge of
    Economist heresy, pathetically exclaims: “What Social-Democrat does
    not know that according to the theories of Marx and Engels the
    economic interests of certain classes play a decisive role in
    history, and, consequently, that particularly the proletariat’s
    struggle for its economic interests must be of paramount importance
    in its class development and struggle for emancipation?” (Our
    italics.) The word “consequently” is completely irrelevant. The fact
    that economic interests play a decisive role does not in the least
    imply that the economic (i.e., trade union) struggle is of prime
    importance; for the most essential, the “decisive” interests of
    classes can be satisfied only by radical political changes in
    general. In particular the fundamental economic interests of the
    proletariat can be satisfied only by a political revolution that
    will replace the dictatorship of the bourgeoisie by the dictatorship
    of the proletariat. Krichevsky repeats the arguments of the “V. V.’s
    of Russian Social-Democracy” (viz., that politics follows economics,
    etc.) and of the Bernsteinians of German Social-Democracy (e.g., by
    similar arguments Woltmann sought to prove that the workers must
    first of all acquire “economic power” before they can think about
    political revolution).—Lenin

[←56]

     See present edition, Vol. 4, pp. 370—71.—Ed.

[←57]

     See present edition, Vol. 5, p. 18.—Ed.

[←58]

     “Ein Jahr der Verwirrung” (“A Year of Confusion”) is the title
    Mehring gave to the chapter of his History of German
    Social-Democracy in which he describes the hesitancy and lack of
    determination displayed at first by the socialists in selecting the
    “tactics-as-plan” for the new situation.—Lenin

[←59]

     Leading article in Iskra, No. 1. (See Collected Works, Vol. 4, p.
    369 —Ed.)—Lenin

[←60]

     G. V. Plekhanov published his well-known work The Development of
    the Monist View of History legally in St. Petersburg in 1895 under
    the pseudonym of N. Beltov.

[←61]

     Nartsis Tuporylov (Narcissus Blunt-Snout) was the pseudonym under
    which Y. O. Martov published his satirical poem “Hymn of the
    Contemporary Russian Socialist” in Zarya, No. 1, April 1901. The
    “Hymn” ridiculed the “Economists” and their adaptations to
    spontaneous events.

[←62]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 5, pp. 18-20.—Ed.

[←63]

     Nor must it be forgotten that in solving “theoretically” the
    problem of terror, the Emancipation of Labour group generalised the
    experience of the antecedent revolutionary movement.—Lenin

[←64]

     To avoid misunderstanding, we must point out that here, and
    throughout this pamphlet, by economic struggle, we imply (in keeping
    with the accepted usage among us) the “practical economic struggle”,
    which Engels, in the passage quoted above, described as “resistance
    to the capitalists”, and which in free countries is known as the
    organised-labour syndical, or trade union struggle.—_Lenin_

[←65]

     In the present chapter we deal only with the political struggle, in
    its broader or narrower meaning. Therefore, we note only in passing,
    merely as a curiosity, _Rabocheye Dyelo_’s charge that_Iskra_ is
    “too restrained” in regard to the economic struggle (_Two
    Conferences_, p. 27, rehashed by Martynov in his
    pamphlet, _Social-Democracy and the Working Class_). If the accusers
    computed by the hundredweights or reams (as they are so fond of
    doing) any given year’s discussion of the economic struggle in the
    industrial section of _Iskra_, in comparison with the corresponding
    sections of _Rabocheye Dyelo_ and _Rabochaya Mysl_ combined, they
    would easily see that the latter lag behind even in this respect.
    Apparently, the realisation of this simple truth compels them to
    resort to arguments that clearly reveal their confusion. “_Iskra_,”
    they write, “willy-nilly [!] is compelled [!] to reckon with the
    imperative demands of life and to publish at least [!!]
    correspondence about the working-class movement” (_Two
    Conferences_, p. 27). Now this is really a crushing
    argument!—_Lenin_

     

[←66]

     We say “in general”, because Rabocheye Dyelo speaks of general
    principles and of the general tasks of the Party as a whole.
    Undoubtedly, cases occur in practice when politics reallymust follow
    economics, but only Economists can speak of this in a resolution
    intended to apply to the whole of Russia. Cases do occur when it is
    possible “right from the beginning” to carry on political agitation
    “exclusively on an economic basis”; yet Rabocheye Dyelo came in the
    end to the conclusion that “there is no need for this whatever” (Two
    Conferences, p. 11). In the following chapter, we shall show that
    the tactics of the “politicians” and revolutionaries not only do not
    ignore the trade union tasks of Social-Democracy, but that, on the
    contrary, they alonecan secure their consistent fulfilment.—Lenin

[←67]

     These are the precise expressions used in Two Conferences, pp. 31,
    32, 28 and 80.—Lenin

[←68]

     Two Conferences, p. 32.—Lenin

[←69]

     Rabocheye Dyelo, No. 10, p. 60. This is the Martynov variation of
    the application, which we have characterised above, of the thesis
    “every step of real movement is more important than a dozen
    programmes” to the present chaotic state of our movement. In fact,
    this is merely a translation into Russian of the notorious
    Bernsteinian sentence: “The movement is everything, the final aim is
    nothing.”—Lenin

[←70]

     P. 43. “Of course, when we advise the workers to present certain
    economic demands to the government, we do so because in
    the economic sphere the autocratic government is, of necessity,
    prepared to make certain concessions!”—Lenin

[←71]

     See Collected Works, Vol 5, pp. 253—74.—Ed.

[←72]

     Rabochaya Mysl, “Separate Supplement”, p. 14.—Lenin

[←73]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 4, pp. 414-19—Ed

[←74]

     The demand “to lend the economic struggle itself a political
    character” most strikingly expresses _subservience to
    spontaneity_ in the sphere of political activity. Very often the
    economic struggle _spontaneously_ assumes a political character,
    that is to say, without the intervention of the “revolutionary
    bacilli — the intelligentsia”, without the intervention of the
    class-conscious Social-Democrats. The economic struggle of the
    English workers, for instance, also assumed a political character
    without any intervention on the part of the socialists. The task of
    the Social-Democrats, however, is not exhausted by political
    agitation on an economic basis; their task is _to
    convert_ trade-unionist politics into Social-Democratic political
    struggle, _to utilise_ the sparks of political consciousness which
    the economic struggle generates among the workers, for the purpose
    of _raising_ the workers to the level
    of _Social-Democratic_ political consciousness. The Martynovs,
    however, instead of raising and stimulating the spontaneously
    awakening political consciousness of the workers, _bow to
    spontaneity_ and repeat over and over _ad nauseam_, that the
    economic struggle “Impels” the workers to realise their own lack of
    political rights. It is unfortunate, gentlemen, that the
    spontaneously awakening trade-unionist political consciousness does
    not “_impel_” you to an understanding of your Social-Democratic
    tasks.—_Lenin_

[←75]

     To prove that this imaginary speech of a worker to an Economist is
    based on fact, we shall refer to two witnesses who undoubtedly have
    direct knowledge of the working-class movement and who are least of
    all inclined to be partial towards us “doctrinaires”; for one
    witness is an Economist (who regards even Rabocheye Dyelo as a
    political organ!), and the other is a terrorist. The first witness
    is the author of a remarkably truthful and vivid article entitled
    “The St. Petersburg Working-Class Movement and the Practical Tasks
    of Social-Democracy”, published in Rabocheye Dyelo No. 6. He divides
    the workers into the following categories: (1) class-conscious
    revolutionaries; (2) intermediate stratum; (3) the remaining masses.
    The intermediate stratum, he says, “is often more interested in
    questions of political life than in its own immediate economic
    interests, the connection between which and the general social
    conditions it has long understood” ... Rabochaya Mysl “is sharply
    criticised”: “It keeps on repeating the same thing over and over
    again, things we have long known, read long ago.” “Again nothing in
    the political review!” (pp. 30-31). But even the third stratum, “the
    younger and more sensitive section of the workers, less corrupted by
    the tavern and the church, who hardly ever have the opportunity of
    getting hold of political literature, discuss political events in a
    rambling way and ponder over the fragmentary news they get about
    student riots”, etc. The terrorist writes as follows: They read over
    once or twice the petty details of factory life in other towns, not
    their own, and then they read no more ... dull, they find it.... To
    say nothing in a workers’ paper about the government ... is to
    regard the workers as being little children.... The workers are not
    little children" (Svoboda, published by the Revolutionary-Socialist
    Group,. pp. 69-70).—Lenin

[←76]

     Martynov “conceives of another, more realistic [?] dilemma”
    (Social-Democracy and the Working Class, p. 19): “Either
    Social-Democracy takes over the direct leadership of the economic
    struggle of the proletariat and by that [!] transforms it into a
    revolutionary class struggle....” “By that”, i.e., apparently by the
    direct leadership of the economic struggle. Can Martynov cite an
    instance in which leading the trade-union struggle alone has
    succeeded in transforming a trade-unionist movement into a
    revolutionary class movement? Can he not understand that in order to
    bring about this “transformation” we must actively take up the
    “direct leadership” of all-sided political agitation?... “Or the
    other perspective: Social-Democracy refrains from assuming the
    leadership of the economic struggle of the workers and so ... clips
    its own wings ... ” In Rabocheye Dyelo’s opinion, quoted above, it
    is Iskra that “refrains”. We have seen, however, that the
    latter does far more than Rabocheye Dyelo to lead the economic
    struggle, but that, moreover, it does not confine itself thereto
    and does not narrow down its political tasks for its sake.—Lenin

[←77]

     The big street demonstrations which began in the spring of 1901.
    (Author’s note to the 1907 edition.—Ed.)—Lenin

[←78]

     For example, during the Franco-Prussian War, Liebknecht dictated a
    programme of action for the whole of democracy; to an even greater
    extent Marx and Engels did this in 1848.—Lenin

[←79]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 5, pp. 21-22—Ed.

[←80]

     The letter in _Iskra_, No. 7 (August 1901), was from a weaver. It
    was published in the section “Workers’ Movement and Letters from the
    Factories”. The letter testified to the great influence of
    Lenin’s _Iskra_ among the advanced workers.

    The letter reads in part:

    “...I showed _Iskra_ to many fellow-workers and the copy was read to
    tatters; but we treasure it.... _Iskra_ writes about our cause,
    about the All-Russian cause which cannot be evaluated in kopeks or
    measured in hours; when you read the paper you understand why the
    gendarmes and the police are afraid of us workers and of the
    intellectuals whom we follow. It is a fact that they are a threat,
    not only to the bosses’ pockets, but to the tsar, the employers, and
    all the rest.... It will not take much now to set the working people
    aflame. All that is wanted is a spark, and the fire will break out.
    How true are the words ‘The Spark will kindle a flame!’ (The motto
    of _Iskra_.—_Ed._) In the past every strike was an important event,
    but today everyone sees that strikes alone are not enough and that
    we must now fight for freedom, gain it through struggle. Today
    everyone, old and young, is eager to read but the sad thing is that
    there are no books. Last Sunday I gathered eleven people and read to
    them ‘Where To Begin’. We discussed it until late in the evening.
    How well it expressed everything, how it gets to the very heart of
    things.... And we would like to write a letter to your _Iskra_ and
    ask you to teach us, not only how to begin, but how to live and how
    to die.”

     

[←81]

     Lack of space has prevented us from replying in detail, in _Iskra_,
    to this letter, which is highly characteristic of the Economists. We
    were very glad at its appearance, for the allegations
    that _Iskra_ did not maintain a consistent class point of view had
    reached us long before that from various sources, and we were
    waiting for an appropriate occasion, or for a formulated expression
    of this fashionable charge, to give our reply. Moreover, it is our
    habit to reply to attacks, not by defence, but by
    counter-attack.—_Lenin_

[←82]

     In the interval between these articles there was one (Iskra, No.
    3), which dealt especially with class antagonisms in the
    countryside. (See Collected Works, Vol. 4, pp. 420-28 —Ed.)—Lenin

[←83]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 4, pp. 414-19—Ed.

[←84]

     Ibid., pp. 420-28—Ed.

[←85]

     Ibid., Vol. 5, pp. 95-100—Ed.

[←86]

     Ibid., pp. 101-02—Ed.

[←87]

     Rossiya (Russia)—a moderate liberal newspaper published in
    St. Petersburg from 1899 to 1902.

[←88]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 5, pp. 87-88—Ed.

[←89]

     There follows a reference to the “concrete Russian conditions which
    fatalistically impel the working-class movement on to the
    revolutionary path”. But these people refuse to understand that the
    revolutionary path of the working-class movement might not be a
    Social-Democratic path. When absolutism reigned, the entire
    West-European bourgeoisie “impelled”, deliberately impelled, the
    workers on to the path of revolution. We Social-Democrats, however,
    cannot be satisfied with that. And if we, by any means whatever,
    degrade Social-Democratic politics to the level of spontaneous
    trade-unionist politics, we thereby play into the hands of bourgeois
    democracy.—_Lenin_

[←90]

     S. Peterburgskiye Vedomosti (St. Petersburg Recorder)—a newspaper
    that began publication in St. Petersburg in 1728 as a continuation
    of the first Russian newspaper Vedomosti, founded in 1703. From 1728
    to 1874 the S. Peterburgskiye Vedomosti was published by the Academy
    of Sciences and from 1875 onwards by the Ministry of Education; it
    continued publication until the end of 1917.

[←91]

     L. Brentano—a German bourgeois economist, a champion of so-called
    “state socialism”, who tried to prove the possibility of achieving
    social equality within the framework of capitalism by reforms and
    through the reconciliation of the interests of the capitalists and
    of the workers. Using Marxist phraseology as a cover, Brentano and
    his followers tried to subordinate the working-class movement to the
    interests of the bourgeoisie.

[←92]

     Rabochaya Mysl and Rabocheye Dyelo, especially the Reply to
    Plekhanov.—Lenin

[←93]

     See “Who Will Bring About the Political Revolution?” in the
    collection published in Russia, entitled The Proletarian
    Struggle. Re-issued by the Kiev Committee.—Lenin

[←94]

     Regeneration of Revolutionism and the journal Svoboda.—Lenin

[←95]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 5, p. 18 —Ed.

[←96]

     N. N.—pseudonym of S. N. Prokopovich, an active “Economist” who
    later became a Cadet.

[←97]

     German “loose”.—Ed.

[←98]

     Afanasy Ivanovich and Pulkheria Ivanovna—a patriarchal family of
    petty provincial landlords in Gogol’s Old-Time Landowners.

[←99]

     Iskra’s campaign against the tares evoked the following angry
    outburst from Rabocheye Dyelo: “For Iskra, the signs of the times
    lie not so much in great events [of the spring], as in the miserable
    attempts of the agents of Zubatov to ’legalise’ the working-class
    movement. It fails to see that these facts tell against it; for they
    testify that the working-class movement has assumed menacing
    proportions in the eyes of the government” (Two Conferences, p. 27).
    For all this we have to blame the “dogmatism” of the orthodox who
    “turn a deaf ear to the imperative demands of life”. They
    obstinately refuse to see the yard-high wheat and are combating
    inch-high tares! Does this not reveal a “distorted sense of
    perspective in regard to the Russian working-class movement”
    (ibid., p. 27)?—Lenin

[←100]

     Of wages earned.—Tr.

[←101]

     For the moment let us observe merely that our remarks on “pushing
    on from outside” and Svoboda’s other disquisitions on organisation
    apply in their entirety to all the Economists, including the
    adherents of Rabocheye Dyelo; for some of them have actively
    preached and defended such views on organisation, while others among
    them have drifted into them.—Lenin

[←102]

     This term is perhaps more applicable to Svoboda than the former,
    for in an article entitled “The Regeneration of Revolutionisin” the
    publication defends terrorism, while in the article at present under
    review it defends Economism. One might say of Svoboda that “it would
    if it could, but it can’t”. Its wishes and intentions are of the
    very best — but the result is utter confusion; this is chiefly due
    to the fact that, while Svoboda advocates continuity of
    organisation, it refuses to recognise continuity of revolutionary
    thought and Social-Democratic theory. It wants to revive the
    professional revolutionary (“The Regeneration of Revolutionism”),
    and to that end proposes, first, excitative terrorism, and,
    secondly, — an organisation of average workers" (Svoboda, No. 1, p.
    66, et seq.), as less likely to be “pushed on from outside”. In
    other words, it proposes to pull the house down to use the timber
    for heating it.—Lenin

[←103]

     Lenin refers here to his own revolutionary activity in St.
    Petersburg in 1893-95.

[←104]

     Thus, an undoubted revival of the democratic spirit has recently
    been observed among persons in military service, partly as a
    consequence of the more frequent street battles with “enemies” like
    workers and students. As soon as our available forces permit, we
    must without fail devote the most serious attention to propaganda
    and agitation among soldiers and officers, and to the creation of
    “military organisations” affiliated to our Party.—_Lenin_

[←105]

     I recall that once a comrade told me of a factory inspector who
    wanted to help the Social-Democrats, and actually did, but
    complained bitterly that he did not know whether his “information”
    reached the proper revolutionary centre, how much his help was
    really required, and what possibilities there were for utilising his
    small and petty services. Every practical worker can, of course,
    cite many similar instances in which our primitiveness deprived us
    of allies. These services, each “small” in itself, but invaluable
    when taken in the mass, could and would be rendered to us by office
    employees and officials, not only in factories, but in the postal
    service, on the railways, in the Customs, among the nobility, among
    the clergy, and in _every_ other walk of life, including even the
    police and the Court! Had we a real party, a real militant
    organisation of revolutionaries, we would not make undue demands on
    every one of these “aides”, we would not hasten always and
    invariably to bring them right into the very heart of our
    “illegality”, but, on the contrary, we would husband them most
    carefully and would even train people especially for such functions,
    bearing in mind that many students could be of much greater service
    to the Party as “aides” holding some official post than as
    “short-term” revolutionaries. But, I repeat, only an organisation
    that is firmly established and has no lack of active forces would
    have the right to apply such tactics.—_Lenin_

[←106]

     Svoboda, No. 1, p. 66, in the article “Organisation”: “The heavy
    tread of the army of workers will reinforce all the demands that
    will be advanced in behalf of Russian Labour” — Labour with a
    capital L, of course. And the author exclaims: “I am not in the
    least hostile towards the intelligentsia, but [but — the word that
    Shchedrin translated as meaning: The ears never grow higher than the
    forehead!] — but I always get frightfully annoyed when a man comes
    to me uttering beautiful and charming words and demands that they be
    accepted for their [his?] beauty and other virtues” (p. 62). Yes, I
    always get “frightfully annoyed”, too.—Lenin

[←107]

     Cf. The Tasks of the Russian Social-Democrats, p. 21, polemics
    against P. L. Lavrov. (See Collected Works, Vol. 2, pp. 340-41.
    —Ed.)—Lenin

[←108]

     The Tasks of the Russian Social-Democrats, p. 23. (See Collected
    Works, Vol. 2, p. 342. —Ed.) Apropos, we shall give another
    illustration of the fact that Rabocheye Dyeloeither does not
    understand what it is talking about or changes its views “with the
    wind”. In No. 1 of Rabocheye Dyelo, we find the following passage in
    italics: “The substance set forth in the pamphlet accords entirely
    with the editorial programme of ’Rabocheye Dyelo’” (p. 142). Really?
    Does the view that the overthrow of the autocracy must not be set as
    the first task of the mass movement accord with the views expressed
    in The Tasks of the Russian Social-Democrats? Do the theory of “the
    economic struggle against the employers and the government” and the
    stages theory accord with the views expressed in that pamphlet? We
    leave it to the reader to judge whether a periodical that
    understands the meaning of “accordance in opinion” in this peculiar
    manner can have firm principles.—Lenin

[←109]

     See Report to the Paris Congress, p. 14. From that time (1897) to
    the spring of 1900, thirty issues of various papers were published
    in various places.... On an average, over one issue per month was
    published".—Lenin

[←110]

     This difficulty is more apparent than real. In fact, _there is
    not_ a single local study circle that lacks the opportunity of
    taking up some function or other in connection with all-Russia work.
    “Don’t say, I can’t; say, I won’t.”—_Lenin_

[←111]

     That is why even examples of exceptionally good local newspapers
    fully confirm our point of view. For example, Yuzhny Rabochy is an
    excellent newspaper, entirely free of instability of principle. But
    it has been unable to provide what it desired for the local
    movement, owing to the infrequency of its publication and to
    extensive police raids. Principled presentation of the fundamental
    questions of the movement and wide political agitation, which our
    Party most urgently requires at the present time, has proved too big
    a job for the local newspaper. The material of particular value it
    has published, like the articles on the mine owners’ convention and
    on unemployment, was not strictly local material, it was required
    for the whole of Russia, not for the South alone. No such articles
    have appeared in any of our Social-Democratic newspapers.—Lenin

[←112]

     Legal material is particularly important in this connection, and we
    are particularly behind in our ability to gather and utilise it
    systematically. It would not be an exaggeration to say that one
    could somehow compile a trade union pamphlet on the basis solely of
    legal material, but it could not be done on the basis of illegal
    material alone. In gathering illegal material from Workers oil
    questions like those dealt with in the publications of _Rabochaya
    Mysl_, we waste a great deal of the efforts of revolutionaries
    (whose place in this work could very easily be taken by legal
    workers), and yet we never obtain good material. The reason is that
    a worker who very often knows only a single department of a large
    factory and almost always the economic results, but not the general
    conditions and standards of his work, cannot acquire the knowledge
    which is possessed by the office staff of a factory, by inspectors,
    doctors, etc., and which is scattered in petty newspaper reports and
    in special industrial, medical, Zemstvo, and other publications.

    I vividly recall my “first experiment”, which I would never like to
    repeat. I spent many weeks “examining” a worker, who would often
    visit me, regarding every aspect of the conditions prevailing in the
    enormous factory at which he was employed. True, after great effort,
    I managed to obtain material for a description (of the one single
    factory!), but at the end of the interview the worker would wipe the
    sweat from his brow, and say to me smilingly: ’I find it easier to
    work overtime than to answer your questions.”

    The more energetically we carry on our revolutionary struggle, the
    more the government will be compelled to legalise part of the “trade
    union” work, thereby relieving us of part of our burden.—_Lenin_

[←113]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 5, pp. 13-24 —Ed.

[←114]

     Iskra, No. 8.The reply of the Central Committee of the General
    Jewish Union of Russia and Poland to our article on the national
    question.—Lenin

[←115]

     We deliberately refrain from relating these facts in the sequence
    of their occurrence.—Lenin

[←116]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 2, pp. 323-51 and 267-315 —Ed.

[←117]

     The reference is to the negotiations between the St. Petersburg
    League of Struggle for the Emancipation of the Working Class and
    Lenin who, in the second half of 1897, wrote the two pamphlets
    mentioned.

[←118]

     The author requests me to state that, like his previous pamphlets,
    this one was sent to the Union Abroad on the assumption that its
    publications were edited by the Emancipation of Labour group (owing
    to certain circumstances, he could not then — February 1899 — know
    of the change in editorship). The pamphlet will be republished by
    the League at an early date.—Lenin

[←119]

     The reference is to the negotiations between Lenin and the Central
    Committee of the Bund.

[←120]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 4, pp. 210-14, 215-20, 221-26 —Ed.

[←121]

     The “fourth fact” of which Lenin speaks was the attempt of the
    Union of Russian Social-Democrats Abroad and the Bund to convene the
    Second Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. in the spring of 1900. The “member
    of the committee” referred to was I. H. Lalayants (a member of the
    Ekaterinoslav Social-Democratic Committee) who came to Moscow in
    February 1900 for talks with Lenin.

[←122]

     Comrade Krichevsky and Comrade Martynov! I call your attention to
    this outrageous manifestation of “autocracy”, “uncontrolled
    authority”, “supreme regulating”, etc. just think of it: a desire
    to possess the whole chain!! Send in a complaint at once. Here you
    have a ready-made topic for two leading articles for No. 12
    of Rabocheye Dyelo!—Lenin

[←123]

     Martynov, in quoting the first sentence of this passage
    in Rabocheye Dyelo (No. 10, p. 62), omitted the second, as if
    desiring to emphasise either his unwillingness to discuss the
    essentials of the question or his inability to understand
    them.—Lenin

[←124]

     A reservation: that is, if a given study circle sympathises with
    the policy of the newspaper and considers it useful to become a
    collaborator, meaning by that, not only for literary collaboration,
    but for revolutionary collaboration generally. Note for Rabocheye
    Dyelo: Among revolutionaries who attach value to the cause and not
    to playing at democracy, who do not separate “sympathy” from the
    most active and lively participation, this reservation is taken for
    granted.—Lenin

[←125]

     Lenin cites the article by D. I. Pisarev “Blunders of Immature
    Thinking”.

[←126]

     Tkachov, P. N. (1844-1885)—one of the ideologists of revolutionary
    Narodism, a follower of the Auguste Blanqui.

[←127]

     Lenin refers to the following passage from Marx’s The Eighteenth
    Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte: “Hegel remarks somewhere that all facts
    and personages of great importance in world history occur, as it
    were, twice. He forgot to add: the first time as tragedy, the second
    as farce” (see Marx and Engels, Selected Works, Vol. 1, Moscow,
    1958, p. 247).

[←128]

     The Eve of the Revolution, p. 62.—Lenin

[←129]

     In his _Review of Questions of Theory_, Nadezhdin, by the way, made
    almost no contribution whatever to the discussion of questions of
    theory, apart, perhaps, from the following passage, a most peculiar
    one from the “eve-of-the-revolution point of view”: “Bernsteinism,
    on the whole, is losing its acuteness for us at the present moment,
    as is the question whether Mr. Adamovich will prove that Mr. Struve
    has already earned a lacing, or, on the contrary, whether Mr. Struve
    will refute Mr. Adamovich and will refuse to resign — it really
    makes no difference, because the hour of revolution has struck” (p.
    110). One can hardly imagine a more glaring illustration of
    Nadezhdin’s infinite disregard for theory. We have proclaimed “the
    eve of the revolution”, _therefore_ “it really makes no difference”
    whether or not the orthodox will succeed in finally driving the
    Critics from their positions! Our wiseacre fails to see that it is
    precisely during the revolution that we shall stand in need of the
    results of our theoretical battles with the Critics in order to be
    able resolutely to combat their _practical_ positions!—_Lenin_

[←130]

     Iskra, No. 4, “Where To Begin”. “Revolutionary culturists, who do
    not accept the eve-of-the-revolution point of view, are not in the
    least perturbed by the prospect of working for a long period of
    time,” writes Nadezhdin (p. 62). This brings us to observe: Unless
    we are able to devise political tactics and an organisational plan
    for work over a very long period, while ensuring, in the very
    process of this work, our Party’s readiness to be at its post and
    fulfil its duty in every contingency whenever the march of events is
    accelerated — unless we succeed in doing this, we shall prove to he
    but miserable political adventurers. Only Nadezhdin, who began but
    yesterday to describe himself as a Social-Democrat, can forget that
    the aim of Social-Democracy is to transform radically the conditions
    of life of the whole of mankind and that for this reason it is not
    permissible for a Social-Democrat to be “perturbed” by the question
    of the duration of the work.—Lenin

[←131]

     Janizaries—privileged Turkish infantry, abolished in 1826. The
    janizaries plundered the population and were known for their unusual
    brutality. Lenin called the tsarist police “janizaries”

[←132]

     Alas, alas! Again I have let slip that awful word “agents”, which
    jars so much on the democratic cars of the Martynovs! I wonder why
    this word did not offend the heroes of the seventies and yet off
    ends the amateurs of the nineties? I like the word, because it
    clearly and trenchantly indicates the common cause to which all the
    agents bend their thoughts and actions, and if I had to replace this
    word by another, the only word I might select would be the word
    “collaborator”, if it did not suggest a certain bookishness and
    vagueness. The thing we need is a military organisation of agents.
    However, the numerous Martynovs (particularly abroad), whose
    favourite pastime is “mutual grants of generalships to one another”,
    may instead of saying “passport agent” prefer to say, “Chief of the
    Special Department for Supplying Revolutionaries with Passports”.
    etc.—Lenin

[←133]

     I could also reply with the German proverb: Den Sack schldgt man,
    den Esel meint man (you beat the sack, but you mean the donkey).
    Not Rabocheye Dyelo alone, but also the broad mass of practical
    workers and theoreticians was carried away by the “criticism” a la
    mode, becoming confused in regard to the question of spontaneity and
    lapsing from the Social-Democratic to the trade-unionist conception
    of our political and organisational tasks. —Lenin

[←134]

     Lenin omitted this appendix when What Is To Be Done? was
    republished in the collection Twelve Years in 1907. p. 521

[←135]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 4, pp. 378-79 –Ed. —Lenin

[←136]

     The International Socialist Bureau—the executive body of the Second
    International established by decision of the Paris Congress in 1900.
    From 1905 onwards Lenin was a member of the Bureau as a
    representative of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party.

[←137]

     Our judgement of the split was based, not only upon a study of the
    literature on the subject, but also on information gathered abroad
    by several members of our organisation. —Lenin

[←138]

     See Collected Works, Vol. 4, pp. 13-24 –Ed. —Lenin

[←139]

     This assertion is repeated in Two Conferences, p. 25. —Lenin

[←140]

     Precisely: In the introduction to the June resolutions we said that
    Russian Social-Democracy as a whole always stood by the principles
    of the Emancipation of Labour group and that the particular service
    of the Union Abroad was its publishing and organising activity. In
    other words, we expressed our complete readiness to forget, the past
    and to recognise the usefulness (for the cause) of the work of our
    comrades of the Union Abroad provided it completely ceased the
    vacillation we tried to “catch”. Any impartial person reading the
    June resolutions will only thus interpret them. If the Union Abroad,
    after having caused a split by its new turn towards Economism (in
    its articles in No. 10 and in the amendments), now solemnly charges
    us with untruth (Two Conferences, p. 30), because of what we said
    about its services, then, of course, such an accusation can only
    evoke a smile. —Lenin

[←141]

     A polemic on the subject started in Vorwarts between its present
    editor, Kautsky, and the Editorial Board of Zarya. We shall not fail
    to acquaint the Russian reader with this controversy. —Lenin

    Iskra, No. 18 (March 10, 1902) published in the section “From the
    Party” An item entitled “Zarya’s Polemic with Vorwarts”, summing up
    the controversy.

[←142]

     That is, if the editorial consultations in connection with the
    establishment of a joint supreme council of the combined
    organisations are not to be regarded as a restriction of autonomy.
    But in June Rabocheye Dyelo agreed to this. —Lenin

[←143]

     See present volume, p. 521–22.—Ed.
